Comparison of diagnostic accuracy of Heidelberg Retina Tomograph II and Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 to discriminate glaucomatous and nonglaucomatous eyes.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of the Moorfields regression analysis (MRA), parameters, and glaucoma probability score (GPS) from Heidelberg Retinal Tomograph (HRT) 3 (Heidelberg Engineering, Heidelberg, Germany) with MRA and parameters from HRT II in discriminating glaucomatous and healthy eyes in subjects of African and European ancestry.Case-control institutional setting.Seventy-eight glaucoma patients (44 of African ancestry, 34 of European ancestry) and 89 age-matched controls (46 of African ancestry, 33 European ancestry), defined by visual fields and self-reported race were included. Imaging was obtained with HRT II, and data were exported to a computer with the HRT 3 software using the same contour line. Area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves (AUCs), sensitivity, and specificity were evaluated for the entire group, the African ancestry group, and the European ancestry group separately. Mean disk area was compared between correctly and incorrectly diagnosed eyes by each technique.Disk, cup, and rim areas from HRT 3 were lower than HRT II (P < .0001). AUC (sensitivity at 95% specificity) was 0.85 (54%) for vertical cup-to-disk ratio (VCDR) HRT 3, 0.84 (45%) for VCDR HRT II, and 0.81 (44%) for GPS at the temporal sector. MRA HRT 3 showed greater sensitivity but lower specificity than HRT II for the entire group, the African ancestry group, and the European ancestry group. GPS classification had the lowest specificity. Glaucomatous eyes incorrectly classified by GPS had smaller mean disk area (P = .0002); control eyes incorrectly classified had greater mean disk area (P = .015).VCDR from HRT 3 showed higher sensitivity than HRT II and GPS for the entire group and for those of African ancestry and of European ancestry separately. Sensitivity of MRA improved in HRT 3 with some trade-off in specificity compared with MRA of HRT II. GPS yielded erroneous classification associated to optic disk size.Comparison of different spectral domain OCT scanning protocols for diagnosing preperimetric glaucoma.To compare the ability of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SDOCT) retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), optic nerve head (ONH), and macular measurements to detect preperimetric glaucomatous damage.The study included 142 eyes from 91 patients suspected of having the disease based on the appearance of the optic disc. All eyes had normal visual fields before the imaging session. Forty-eight eyes with progressive glaucomatous damage were included in the preperimetric glaucoma group. Ninety-four eyes without any evidence of progressive glaucomatous damage and followed untreated for 12.8 ± 3.6 years were used as controls. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) were calculated to summarize diagnostic accuracies of the parameters.The three RNFL parameters with the largest AUCs were average RNFL thickness (0.89 ± 0.03), inferior hemisphere average thickness (0.87 ± 0.03), and inferior quadrant average thickness (0.85 ± 0.03). The three ONH parameters with the largest AUCs were vertical cup-to-disc ratio (0.74 ± 0.04), rim area (0.72 ± 0.05), and rim volume (0.72 ± 0.05). The three macular parameters with the largest AUCs were GCC average thickness (0.79 ± 0.04), GCC inferior thickness (0.79 ± 0.05), and GCC superior thickness (0.76 ± 0.05). Average RNFL thickness performed better than vertical cup-to-disc ratio (0.89 vs. 0.74; P = 0.007) and GCC average thickness (0.89 vs. 0.79; P = 0.015).SDOCT RNFL measurements performed better than ONH and macular measurements for detecting preperimetric glaucomatous damage in a cohort of glaucoma suspects. (ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00221897.).Comparison between GDx VCC scanning laser polarimetry and Stratus OCT optical coherence tomography in the diagnosis of chronic glaucoma.To compare the abilities of scanning laser polarimetry with the variable corneal compensator (GDx VCC) with those of optical coherence tomography (Stratus OCT) in discriminating between healthy and early-to-moderate perimetric glaucomatous eyes.A total of 95 glaucomatous patients (mean deviation - 3.7 +/- 3.0 dB, pattern standard deviation 4.5 +/- 2.7 dB) and 62 control subjects underwent imaging by the GDx VCC and Stratus OCT using both optic nerve head (ONH) and retinal nerve fibre layer (RNFL) scan protocols. One eye per patient was considered. Sensitivity at > or = 90% specificity and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROC) were calculated for each GDx VCC and Stratus OCT index.The largest AROCs with Stratus OCT were associated with cup : disc area ratio (0.88) for ONH scan indices, and with average thickness (0.84) for RNFL scan indices. The nerve fibre indicator provided the greatest AROC for the GDx VCC indices (0.85).Both the GDx VCC and Stratus OCT instruments were shown to be useful in the detection of glaucomatous damage. The best performing indices for the GDx VCC and Stratus OCT with both ONH and RNFL scans gave similar AROCs, showing a moderate sensitivity in early-to-moderate glaucoma patients.Diagnostic ability of retinal nerve fiber layer imaging by swept-source optical coherence tomography in glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracies of swept-source optical coherence tomography (OCT) wide-angle and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements for glaucoma detection.Cross-sectional case-control study.In this study we enrolled 144 glaucomatous eyes of 106 subjects and 66 eyes of 42 healthy subjects from the Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study. Glaucoma was defined by the presence of repeatable abnormal standard automated perimetry results and/or progressive glaucomatous optic disc change on masked grading of stereophotographs. Wide-angle and peripapillary RNFL thicknesses were assessed using swept-source OCT. Peripapillary RNFL thickness was also evaluated using spectral-domain OCT. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were calculated to evaluate the ability of the different swept-source OCT and spectral-domain OCT parameters to discriminate between glaucomatous and healthy eyes.Mean (± standard deviation) average spectral-domain OCT wide-angle RNFL thicknesses were 50.5 ± 5.8 μm and 35.0 ± 9.6 μm in healthy and glaucomatous eyes, respectively (P < 0.001). Corresponding values for swept-source OCT peripapillary RNFL thicknesses were 103.5 ± 12.3 μm and 72.9 ± 16.5 μm, respectively (P < 0.001). Areas under the ROC curves of swept-source OCT wide-angle and peripapillary RNFL thickness were 0.88 and 0.89, respectively. Swept-source OCT performed similar to average peripapillary RNFL thickness obtained by spectral-domain OCT (area under the ROC curve of 0.90).Swept-source OCT wide-angle and peripapillary RNFL thickness measurements performed well for detecting glaucomatous damage. The diagnostic accuracies of the swept-source OCT and spectral-domain OCT RNFL imaging protocols evaluated in this study were similar.Comparative study of macular ganglion cell complex thickness measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in healthy eyes, eyes with preperimetric glaucoma, and eyes with early glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of Topcon 3D spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) for measuring the macular inner retinal layers and the circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (cpRNFL) in order to detect preperimetric glaucoma.Two hundred four eyes, including 64 healthy eyes, 68 eyes with preperimetric glaucoma, and 72 eyes with early glaucoma were analyzed. Patients had a comprehensive ocular examination including visual field testing and SD-OCT imaging (3D OCT-2000; Topcon Corporation, Tokyo, Japan) in the macular and peripapillary regions. OCT macular scans were segmented into the macular nerve fiber layer (mNFL), ganglion cell layer with the inner plexiform layer (GCIP), and ganglion cell complex (GCC) (composed of the mNFL and GCIP). Ability to discriminate preperimetric glaucoma was assessed using the area under the receiver operating curve for all macular parameters and the cpRNFL.The median visual field MD was -0.78 ± 1.19 dB for the healthy group, -1.02 ± 1.29 dB for the preperimetric glaucoma group, and -3.08 ± 1.61 dB for the early glaucoma group. There were significant differences between the preperimetric and healthy groups for GCIP and GCC and for almost all cpRNFL thickness parameters (P < 0.05), except for the mNFL and cpRNFL (nasal, 3, 4, 8, 9, and 10 o'clock sectors). The comparisons among the AUCs of the cpRNFL parameters (0.772), the GCIP parameters (0.727) and the GCC parameters (0.720) showed no significant differences in their abilities to detect preperimetric glaucoma.The capacity of Topcon 3D-OCT macular intraretinal parameters (GCIP and GCC measurements, not mNFL measurements) to diagnose preperimetric glaucoma is similar to that of the cpRNFL.Evaluation of macular thickness and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer thickness for detection of early glaucoma using spectral domain optical coherence tomography.To evaluate the diagnostic ability of macular parameters and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters for early glaucoma using spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT).One eye from 32 early glaucoma patients (including preperimetric glaucoma) and 32 normal participants underwent macular scans and peripapillary RNFL scans with SD-OCT 3 times on the same day. The discrimination power of each parameter to detect early glaucoma was determined by areas under receiver operating characteristics curve (AROC) and sensitivity at fixed specificity. Correlation of OCT data with visual field defects was evaluated by linear regression analysis. Reproducibility was also evaluated.Significant differences between early glaucoma and normal participants were found for all parameters except fovea in macular scans and in the superior and inferior quadrants, at 12, 3, 6, 7, 11 o'clock, and average RNFL thickness in RNFL scans. The best parameters based on AROC and sensitivity at a specificity of >90% were temporal outer macula thickness (AROC, 0.79; sensitivity, 63%) in macular parameters and inferior quadrant (AROC, 0.82; sensitivity, 53%) in RNFL parameters. The highest correlation with mean deviation was found in inferior inner macular volume (r=0.50, P<0.001). The mean intraclass correlation coefficient was 0.96 in macular scans and 0.84 in RNFL scans. Test-retest variability ranged from 2.3 to 10.1 μm in macular thickness, 0 to 0.06 mm in macular volume, and 5.8 to 18.9 μm in RNFL thickness.For the diagnosis of early glaucoma by SD-OCT, macular parameters had high discriminating power and high reproducibility comparable with peripapillary RNFL parameters.Early glaucoma detection using the Humphrey Matrix Perimeter, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and retinal nerve fiber layer photography.To compare the effectiveness of Humphrey Matrix perimetry, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) photography using the Heidelberg Retina Angiograph 1 (HRA1) for early glaucoma detection.Cross-sectional comparative study.Seventy-two primary open-angle glaucoma patients with early-stage visual field defects and 48 healthy controls were included.Measurements using Humphrey Matrix perimetry, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and RNFL photography using HRA1, as well as standard automated perimetry, were obtained. We constructed receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves for all available parameters and calculated the area under the ROC curves (AUC) to seek the best discriminating parameter of each test. Subsequently, the ROC curves were calculated for the combinations of the best discriminating parameters of each test to seek the most effective combination for early glaucoma detection.The AUC for various parameters of Humphrey Matrix perimetry, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and RNFL photography using HRA1.The AUCs of Humphrey Matrix perimetry, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and RNFL photography using HRA1 with the best discriminating parameter were 0.990, 0.906, 0.794, and 0.751, respectively. The AUC of the following best combination was 0.972, more than 5 points depressed below the level of 5% on the pattern deviation plot from Humphrey Matrix perimetry, and the nerve fiber indicator was larger than 20 from GDx VCC.The AUC of the Humphrey Matrix perimetry was greater than that of the GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and RNFL photography using HRA1.Optic nerve head changes in early glaucoma: a comparison between stereophotography and Heidelberg retina tomography.To evaluate and compare the diagnostic accuracy of the Heidelberg retina tomograph (HRT) version 3 with that of glaucoma specialists using stereophotography in discriminating between normal eyes and patients with early glaucomatous visual field loss.A total of 105 eyes of 105 individuals were prospectively and consecutively recruited. The sample comprised 51 normal and 54 early glaucomatous eyes, as defined by intraocular pressure and standard automated perimetry results, regardless of optic disc appearance. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were plotted for the HRT3 parameters and a linear discriminant function (LDF) developed in our hospital. Best sensitivity-specificity pairs were compared between the HRT3 parameters, with the highest areas under the ROC curve (AUCs) and evaluation of optic disc stereophotographs. Agreement between methods for measuring vertical cup-to-disc ratio was evaluated with the Bland-Altman plot.The average visual field mean deviation was -2.90 dB. The HRT3 parameters with the largest AUCs were our LDF (0.900), rim volume (0.883), and vertical cup/disk ratio (0.880), with no significant differences between these parameters. Sensitivity-specificity pairs were 79.6-100% (clinical evaluation), 83.3-86.3% (our LDF), 64.8-96.1% (final glaucoma probability score), and 68.5-90.2% (global Moorfields regression analysis).The diagnostic accuracy for differentiating normal eyes from those with early visual field defects was similar between clinical evaluation of the optic disc and evaluation with the HRT3. The use of our LDF increased the sensitivity-specificity balance with respect to the HRT-provided parameters. The diagnostic accuracy of the HRT classifications was comparable to that of an experienced glaucoma specialist.Combining structural and functional testing for detection of glaucoma.To assess whether the combined use of both structural and functional tests improves discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes over either type of testing alone.Observational cross-sectional study.One hundred twenty-three eyes of 123 participants enrolled in the Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study.Because both structural and functional tests were evaluated, 2 definitions of glaucoma were used: glaucomatous visual field (VF) damage based on repeatable abnormal standard automated perimetry results (n = 43) and glaucomatous optic disc (glaucomatous optic neuropathy [GON]) based on masked assessment of optic disc stereophotographs (n = 65). Participants had scanning laser polarimetry, optical coherence tomography (OCT), and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy imaging in addition to frequency-doubling technology (FDT) perimetry and short-wavelength automated perimetry (SWAP) testing completed within a 6-month interval.For each glaucoma definition, sensitivities and specificities were calculated for the best structural parameters, FDT perimetry pattern standard deviation (PSD), and SWAP PSD/glaucoma hemifield test, and then for each possible pairwise combination of one structural and one functional parameter.The best structural parameters for discriminating between glaucoma and control eyes were nerve fiber indicator for scanning laser polarimetry, inferior average retinal nerve fiber layer thickness for OCT, and Moorfields regression classification for confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy. Sensitivities and specificities for detecting glaucomatous VF damage for scanning laser polarimetry, OCT, confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy, FDT perimetry, and SWAP were 41.9% and 98.3%, 58.1% and 98.3%, 58.1% and 84.5%, 44.2% and 98.3%, and 65.1% and 86.2%, respectively. Adding FDT perimetry to each of the best structural parameters led to a significant (P<0.05) increase in sensitivity without a significant change in specificity compared with structural parameters alone. Adding SWAP to each of the best structural parameters led to a significant increase in sensitivity and also a significant decrease in specificity compared with each structural parameter alone.A combination of parameters from structural tests and functional tests can improve the sensitivity of glaucoma detection. The sensitivity and specificity desired for a particular clinical application will determine the selection of the particular diagnostic tests.Optic disk and nerve fiber layer imaging to detect glaucoma.To compare optic disk and retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) imaging methods to discriminate eyes with early glaucoma from normal eyes.Retrospective, cross-sectional study.In a tertiary care academic glaucoma center, 92 eyes of 92 subjects (46 with early perimetric open-angle glaucoma and 46 controls) were studied. Diagnostic performance of optical coherence tomography (StratusOCT; Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, California, USA), scanning laser polarimetry (GDx VCC; Laser Diagnostic Technologies, San Diego, California, USA), confocal laser ophthalmoscopy (Heidelberg Retinal Tomograph [HRT] III; Heidelberg Engineering GmbH, Heidelberg, Germany), and qualitative assessment of stereoscopic optic disk photographs were compared. Outcome measures were areas under receiver operator characteristic curves (AUCs) and sensitivities at fixed specificities. Classification and regression tree (CART) analysis was used to evaluate combinations of quantitative parameters.The average (+/- standard deviation) visual field mean deviation for glaucomatous eyes was -4.0 +/- 2.5 dB (decibels). Parameters with largest AUCs (+/- standard error) were: average RNFL thickness for StratusOCT (0.96 +/- 0.02), nerve fiber indicator for GDx VCC (0.92 +/- 0.03), Frederick S. Mikelberg (FSM) discriminant function for HRT III (0.91 +/- 0.03), and 0.97 +/- 0.02 for disk photograph evaluation. At 95% specificity, sensitivity of disk photograph evaluation (90%) was greater than GDx VCC (P = .05) and HRT III (P = .002) results, but not significantly different than those of StratusOCT (P > .05). The combination of StratusOCT average RNFL thickness and HRT III cup-to-disk area with CART produced a sensitivity of 91% and specificity of 96%.StratusOCT, GDx VCC, and HRT III performed as well as, but not better than, qualitative evaluation of optic disk stereophotographs for detection of early perimetric glaucoma. The combination of StratusOCT average RNFL thickness and HRT III cup-to-disk area ratio provided a high diagnostic precision.Discrimination between normal and early glaucomatous eyes with scanning laser polarimeter with fixed and variable corneal compensator settings.To evaluate the ability of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) with a fixed corneal polarization compensator (GDx-FCC Nerve Fiber Analyzer) compared to one with a variable one (GDx-VCC) in the discrimination between healthy and early glaucomatous eyes.Forty patients with early glaucomatous visual field defects, having a mean deviation of 3.1-/+1.6 dB and a pattern standard deviation of 3.1-/+0.9 dB, and 40 controls underwent both GDx-FCC and GDx-VCC. One eye per patient was considered. The cut-off point, taken as the value dividing healthy from glaucomatous eyes with highest probability, was determined for each GDx parameter. Linear discriminant functions (LDFs) were separately developed for GDx-FCC and GDx-VCC parameters. Sensitivity, specificity, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROC) for discriminating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes were calculated for each GDx parameter, both according to the GDx normative database and after the selection of new cut-off points, and for the LDFs.All software-provided parameters showed low sensitivity and high specificity. The selection of new cut-off points improved the performance of all GDx parameters: VCC parameters performed better than FCC parameters; the largest AROCs were associated with the superior/nasal ratio for the GDx-FCC (0.86) and with the Number for the GDx-VCC (0.87). The LDFs provided an AROC of 0.89 with both the GDx-FCC and the GDx-VCC parameters.The GDx-VCC showed a higher ability in the early diagnosis of glaucoma when compared with the GDx-FCC. The individuation of the right cut-off point of selected parameters with both GDx settings performed better than the software-provided parameters, and comparably to the GDx parameters-based LDFs.Comparative assessment for the ability of Cirrus, RTVue, and 3D-OCT to diagnose glaucoma.We compared the ability of circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (cpRNFL) thickness and macular parameters obtained by three spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) instruments to detect glaucoma.We enrolled 87 normal eyes and 145 glaucomatous eyes (75 early glaucomatous eyes (EGs), mean deviation > -6 dB). Each participant was imaged using Cirrus, RTVue, and 3D-OCT to evaluate the average and quadrant cpRNFL thicknesses. The macular retinal nerve fiber layer (mRNFL), ganglion cell layer plus inner plexiform layer (GCL/IPL), and mRNFL + GCL/IPL (ganglion cell complex [GCC]) thicknesses were analyzed. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) were compared among the instruments.These instruments revealed similar AUCs for the average cpRNFL and GCC thicknesses in EGs, and total all-stage glaucomatous eyes (TGs). RTVue showed better performance in the nasal cpRNFL thickness than Cirrus and 3D-OCT, and better performance in the temporal cpRNFL thickness than 3D-OCT in TGs. RTVue had a higher AUC for the superior GCC thickness compared to Cirrus and 3D-OCT in EGs, and TGs. Cirrus had higher AUCs for GCL/IPL parameters in TGs, and lower AUCs for the mRNFL parameters in EGs and TGs compared to 3D-OCT.The average cpRNFL and GCC thicknesses measured using these OCT instruments exhibited similar abilities in the diagnosis of glaucoma, and RTVue exhibited better diagnostic abilities than Cirrus and 3D-OCT for nasal cpRNFL, and superior GCC thicknesses. The diagnostic performance of Cirrus and 3D-OCT was different for GCL/IPL and mRNFL parameters. (http://www.umin.ac.jp/ctr number, UMIN000006900.)Scanning the macula for detecting glaucoma.With the advent of spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SDOCT), there has been a renewed interest in macular region for detection of glaucoma. However, most macular SDOCT parameters currently are thickness parameters which evaluate thinning of the macular layers but do not quantify the extent of area over which the thinning has occurred. We therefore calculated a new macular parameter, "ganglion cell complex surface abnormality ratio (GCC SAR)" that represented the surface area over which the macular thickness was decreased.To evaluate the ability of SAR in detecting perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma.Retrospective image analysis.68 eyes with perimetric glaucoma, 62 eyes with preperimetric glaucoma and 165 control eyes underwent GCC imaging with SDOCT. SAR was calculated as the ratio of the abnormal to total area on the GCC significance map.Diagnostic ability of SAR in glaucoma was compared against that of the standard parameters generated by the SDOCT software using area under receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) and sensitivities at fixed specificities.AUC of SAR (0.91) was statistically significantly better than that of GCC average thickness (0.86, P = 0.001) and GCC global loss volume (GLV; 0.88, P = 0.01) in differentiating perimetric glaucoma from control eyes. In differentiating preperimetric glaucoma from control eyes, AUC of SAR (0.72) was comparable to that of GCC average thickness (0.70, P > 0.05) and GLV (0.72, P > 0.05). Sensitivities at specificities of 80% and 95% of SAR were comparable (P > 0.05 for all comparisons) to that of GCC average thickness and GLV in diagnosing perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma.GCC SAR had a better ability to diagnose perimetric glaucoma compared to the SDOCT software provided global GCC parameters. However, in diagnosing preperimetric glaucoma, the ability of SAR was similar to that of software provided global GCC parameters.Effect of spectrum bias on the diagnostic accuracy of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in glaucoma.To evaluate the influence of a control group on the diagnostic accuracy of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) in early glaucoma.In a diagnostic, case-control study, 119 eyes of 60 normal subjects with no findings suspicious for glaucoma (control cohort 1); 76 eyes of 41 subjects referred by general ophthalmologists as glaucoma suspects based on optic disc morphology, but found by glaucoma experts to be normal but with physiological variations in their optic nerves (control cohort 2); and 65 eyes of 46 early-glaucoma patients (cases) underwent imaging of the optic nerve head (ONH), retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), and ganglion cell complex (GCC) by SD-OCT.Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) of ONH parameters discriminating glaucomatous eyes from normal eyes of control cohort 2 were significantly lesser (P < 0.001) than those discriminating glaucomatous eyes from normal eyes of control cohort 1. AUCs of RNFL parameters discriminating glaucomatous eyes from normal eyes of control cohorts 2 and 1 were comparable. Although the AUCs of GCC thickness parameters were comparable, AUCs of GCC focal and global loss volume in control cohort 2 (0.684 and 0.671. respectively) were significantly less (P < 0.05) than in control cohort 1 (0.881 and 0.841, respectively).The effectiveness of most SD-OCT parameters in detecting glaucoma significantly decreased when evaluated against a clinically relevant control group with suspicious-looking optic nerves compared with that against a control group consisting of normal subjects with no findings suspicious for glaucoma.Diagnostic capability of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography for glaucoma.To determine the diagnostic capability of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in glaucoma patients with visual field defects.Prospective, cross-sectional study.Cirrus high-definition optical coherence tomography compared with Stratus optical coherence tomography in glaucoma diagnosis.To compare the retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) evaluation using Cirrus optical coherence tomography (OCT) and Stratus OCT in glaucoma diagnosis.One hundred thirty normal and 86 patients with glaucoma were included in this prospective study. The signal strengths of the OCTs were evaluated. The sensitivities and specificities of global RNFL average thickness were compared in the four quadrants and in each clock hour sector. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves, areas under the ROC (AUC), and the likelihood ratio (LR) were plotted for RNFL thickness. Agreement between the OCTs was calculated by using the Bland-Altman method and kappa (kappa) coefficient.Twenty-three percent of all cases examined with Stratus OCT and 1.9% examined with Cirrus OCT had a signal strength below 6 (P = 0.01). In cases with signal strengths > or =6, the mean signal strength was higher with Cirrus OCT than with Stratus OCT (P = 0.01). The RNFL measurements by Cirrus were thicker than those of Stratus OCT (P < 0.05). The AUCs were 0.829 for Stratus and 0.837 for Cirrus OCT (P = 0.706) for global RNFL average. LRs were similar in both OCTs in global RNFL classification but varied in quadrants. The widths of the limits of agreement varied between 42.16 and 97.79 microm. There was almost perfect agreement (kappa = 0.82) in the average RNFL classification.Cirrus OCT has better scan quality than Stratus OCT, especially in glaucomatous eyes. In cases with good-quality scans, the sensitivity and specificity, and AUCs were similar. The best agreement was in the global average RNFL classification. The widths of limits of agreements exceed the limits of resolution of the OCTs.Retinal nerve fiber layer and macular inner retina measurements by spectral domain optical coherence tomograph in Indian eyes with early glaucoma.To compare the diagnostic abilities of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) and macular inner retina (MIR) measurements by spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) in Indian eyes early glaucoma.In an observational, cross-sectional study, 125 eyes of 64 normal subjects and 91 eyes of 59 early glaucoma patients underwent RNFL and MIR imaging with SD-OCT. Glaucomatous eyes had characteristic optic nerve and RNFL abnormalities and correlating visual field defects and a mean deviation of better than or equal to -6 dB on standard automated perimetry. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC), sensitivities at a fixed specificity and likelihood ratios (LRs) were estimated for all RNFL and MIR parameters.The AUCs for the RNFL parameters ranged from 0.537 for the temporal quadrant thickness to 0.821 for the inferior quadrant RNFL thickness. AUCs for the MIR parameters ranged from 0.603 for the superior minus inferior MIR thickness average to 0.908 for ganglion cell complex focal loss volume (GCC-FLV). AUC for the best MIR parameter (GCC-FLV) was significantly better (P<0.001) than that of the best RNFL parameter (inferior quadrant thickness). The sensitivities of these parameters at high specificity of 95%, however, were comparable (52.7% vs58.2%). Evaluation of the LRs showed that outside normal limits results of most of the RNFL and MIR parameters were associated with large effects on the post-test probability of disease.MIR parameters with RTVue SD-OCT were as good as the RNFL parameters to detect early glaucoma.Glaucoma diagnostic accuracy of ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer thickness: comparison with nerve fiber layer and optic nerve head.To determine the diagnostic performance of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) thickness measured with the Cirrus high-definition optical coherence tomography (HD-OCT) ganglion cell analysis (GCA) algorithm (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA) to discriminate normal eyes and eyes with early glaucoma and to compare it with that of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness and optic nerve head (ONH) measurements.Evaluation of diagnostic test or technology.Fifty-eight patients with early glaucoma and 99 age-matched normal subjects.Macular GCIPL and peripapillary RNFL thicknesses and ONH parameters were measured in each participant, and their diagnostic abilities were compared.Area under the curve (AUC) of the receiver operating characteristic.The GCIPL parameters with the best AUCs were the minimum (0.959), inferotemporal (0.956), average (0.935), superotemporal (0.919), and inferior sector (0.918). There were no significant differences between these AUCs and those of inferior quadrant (0.939), average (0.936), and superior quadrant RNFL (0.933); vertical cup-to-disc diameter ratio (0.962); cup-to-disc area ratio (0.933); and rim area (0.910), all P>0.05.The ability of macular GCIPL parameters to discriminate normal eyes and eyes with early glaucoma is high and comparable to that of the best peripapillary RNFL and ONH parameters.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.Comparison of the diagnostic capability of the Heidelberg Retina Tomographs 2 and 3 for glaucoma in the Indian population.To compare the diagnostic capability of the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph (HRT) 2 and 3 (Heidelberg Engineering, GmBH, Dossenheim, Germany) for glaucoma in an Indian population.Evaluation of a diagnostic technology.Ninety-eight glaucoma subjects and 79 normal controls.All participants underwent imaging with HRT2. Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 2 examinations were exported to HRT3 software. The stereometric parameters of HRT2 and HRT3 were compared. The diagnostic capability of Moorfields Regression Analysis (MRA) in the HRT2, HRT3 with and without ethnicity correction, and Glaucoma Probability Score (GPS) of HRT3 were compared. Analysis was done with the borderline results of MRA and GPS considered as normal to derive the most specific criteria and as abnormal to derive the least specific criteria.Sensitivity, specificity, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUC).On standard automated perimetry (SAP), the mean deviation (mean+/-standard deviation) of the glaucoma and normal groups were -7.3+/-6.7 dB and -0.4+/-1.1 dB, respectively (P<0.001). The AUC for the individual stereometric parameters of HRT2 were similar to that of HRT3. The sensitivity and specificity (most specific criteria) were 56.1% and 96.2%, respectively, for MRA of HRT2 and 56.1% and 91.1%, respectively, for MRA of HRT3. The sensitivity and specificity (least specific criteria) were 88.8% and 88.6%, respectively, for MRA of HRT2 and 70.4% and 81%, respectively, for MRA of HRT3. By using the Indian specific normative database of HRT3, the sensitivity and specificity were 37.8% and 97.5%, respectively, for the most specific criteria, and 55.1% and 89.9%, respectively, for the least specific criteria. Sensitivity and specificity of GPS were 86.7% and 68.3%, respectively, for the most specific criteria, and 93.9% and 39.2%, respectively, for the least specific criteria.In this cohort, the diagnostic capability of HRT2 MRA was similar to that of HRT3 MRA; ethnicity correction did not improve results; GPS was more sensitive but less specific than MRA in diagnosing glaucoma.Glaucoma discrimination of segmented cirrus spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) macular scans.To evaluate the glaucoma discriminating ability of macular retinal layers as measured by spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT).Healthy, glaucoma suspect and glaucomatous subjects had a comprehensive ocular examination, visual field testing and SD-OCT imaging (Cirrus HD-OCT; Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, California, USA) in the macular and optic nerve head regions. OCT macular scans were segmented into macular nerve fibre layer (mNFL), ganglion cell layer with inner plexiform layer (GCIP), ganglion cell complex (GCC) (composed of mNFL and GCIP), outer retinal complex and total retina. Glaucoma discriminating ability was assessed using the area under the receiver operator characteristic curve (AUC) for all macular parameters and mean circumpapillary retinal nerve fibre layer (cpRNFL).Analysis was performed on 51 healthy, 49 glaucoma suspect and 63 glaucomatous eyes. The median visual field MD was -2.21 dB (IQR: -6.92 to -0.35) for the glaucoma group, -0.32 dB (IQR: -1.22 to 0.73) for the suspect group and -0.18 dB (IQR: -0.92 to 0.71) for the healthy group. Highest age adjusted AUCs were found for average GCC and GCIP (AUC=0.901 and 0.900, respectively) and their sectoral measurements: infero-temporal (0.922 and 0.913), inferior (0.904 and 0.912) and supero-temporal (0.910 and 0.897). These values were similar to the discriminating ability of the mean cpRNFL (AUC=0.913). Comparison of these AUCs did not yield any statistically significant difference (all p>0.05).SD-OCT GCIP and GCC measurements showed similar glaucoma diagnostic ability and were comparable with that of cpRNFL.Scanning laser polarimetry with enhanced corneal compensation and optical coherence tomography in normal and glaucomatous eyes.To examine the association between scanning laser polarimetry (SLP), using enhanced (ECC) and variable corneal compensation (VCC) with optical coherence tomography (OCT), and to compare their discriminating ability in the diagnosis of glaucoma.Normal and glaucomatous eyes enrolled from four clinical sites underwent complete examination, automated perimetry, SLP-ECC, SLP-VCC, and OCT. Eyes were characterized in two groups based on the typical scan score (TSS): Normal birefringence pattern (NBP) was defined as a TSS of 80 to 100 and abnormal birefringence pattern (ABP) as TSS <or= 79. For each of the six SLP parameters and five OCT parameters the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROCs) were calculated to compare the discriminating ability of each imaging modality, to differentiate between normal and glaucomatous eyes.Ninety-five normal volunteers and 63 patients with glaucoma were enrolled. Average visual field mean deviation was -4.2 +/- 4.3 dB in the glaucoma group. In eyes with NBP, SLP-ECC had significantly (all P <or= 0.001) greater correlation with OCT average, superior, and inferior retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL; r = 0.79, 0.67, 0.74) compared with SLP-VCC (r = 0.71, 0.43, 0.37). In eyes with ABP, SLP-ECC had a significantly greater (all P <or= 0.001) correlation with OCT average, superior, and inferior RNFL (r = 0.75, 0.73, 0.83) compared with SLP-VCC (r = 0.51, 0.22, 0.18). The AUROC for OCT inferior average thickness (0.91) was similar (P = 0.26) to the TSNIT (temporal, superior, nasal, inferior, temporal) average obtained using SLP-ECC (0.87) and significantly (P = 0.02) greater than SLP-VCC (0.81).Compared with SLP-VCC, SLP-ECC has significantly stronger correlations with OCT and may improve the discriminating ability for early glaucoma diagnosis.GDx-VCC performance in discriminating normal from glaucomatous eyes with early visual field loss.To evaluate the ability of scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation (GDx-VCC) in separating healthy from glaucomatous patients with early visual field (VF) loss.Sixty-two healthy and 48 glaucomatous age-matched patients with early glaucoma [mean deviation (MD): -1.74dB +/-1.69] underwent complete ophthalmological evaluation, automated achromatic perimetry (AAP) and retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) measurement with GDx-VCC. One randomly selected eye from each subject was considered. Glaucomatous VF defects had either Glaucoma Hemifield Test (GHT) outside normal limits or pattern standard deviation (PSD) outside 95% confidence limits. Mean (+/-SD) MD, PSD and GDx-VCC parameters in the two groups were compared by t-test. For each GDx-VCC parameter, area under receiver operating characteristics (AUROC) curve and sensitivity at predetermined specificity > or =80% and > or =95% were calculated. Moreover, the parameter with largest AUROC was evaluated by likelihood ratios (LRs).Mean values for MD, PSD and ten of 14 GDx-VCC parameters were significantly different between the two groups (P<0.001). The three parameters with largest AUROCs were the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) (0.870), superior average (0.817) and normalized superior area (0.816) (P=0.08 for differences between AUROCs). NFI displayed sensitivity values of 80.2% and 60.4% for specificity > or =80% and > or =95%, respectively. At NFI cutoff value of 30, positive LR was 34.9 (95% CI: 4.9-247.6) and negative LR was 0.45 (95% CI: 0.32-0.61). Interval LRs showed large effect on post-test probability for NFI values < or =18 or > or =31.In our sample of eyes with early VF loss, GDx-VCC showed moderate-to-good discriminating ability. Among the best performing parameters, NFI had the largest AUROC, but several glaucomatous eyes (21, 43.8%) had NFI <30. This suggests that algorithm for NFI calculation requires some refinement when eyes with early VF loss are evaluated.Ability of different scanning protocols of spectral domain optical coherence tomography to diagnose preperimetric glaucoma.To evaluate the ability of the optic nerve head (ONH), retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), and ganglion cell complex (GCC) parameters of spectral domain optical coherence tomograph (SDOCT) in detecting preperimetric glaucoma.In a cross-sectional study, 34 preperimetric glaucoma eyes (34 patients) and 72 control eyes (72 subjects) with large physiologic optic disc cupping underwent ONH, RNFL, and GCC imaging with SDOCT. Preperimetric glaucoma was diagnosed in the presence of glaucomatous optic neuropathy on masked evaluation of optic disc photographs by two glaucoma experts and normal visual fields. The ability of SDOCT parameters to discriminate preperimetric glaucoma eyes from eyes with large physiologic cups was evaluated by areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC), sensitivities at fixed specificities, and likelihood ratios (LR).All SDOCT parameters were significantly different (P < 0.05) between the two groups. The ONH, RNFL, and GCC parameters with best AUCs to differentiate preperimetric glaucoma from eyes with large physiologic cups were vertical cup to disc ratio (0.76), inferior quadrant RNFL thickness (0.76), and inferior quadrant GCC thickness (0.75), respectively. Sensitivities at 95% specificity of SDOCT parameters ranged between 15% and 29%. Likelihood ratios of outside normal limits category of parameters ranged between 3 and 11, and within normal limits category between 0.5 and 0.8.Diagnostic abilities of ONH, RNFL, and GCC parameters of SDOCT to differentiate preperimetric glaucoma eyes from control eyes with large physiologic cupping were only moderate.Macular and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer measurements by spectral domain optical coherence tomography in normal-tension glaucoma.To evaluate and compare the glaucoma discrimination ability of macular inner retinal layer (MIRL) thickness with that of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (pRNFL) thickness measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (RTVue-100; Optovue Inc, Fremont, CA) in patients with normal-tension glaucoma (NTG).Sixty-five healthy subjects and 102 with NTG were enrolled. MIRL thickness provided by a ganglion cell complex (GCC) scan and two RNFL thicknesses measured by the NHM4 (RNFL1) and RNFL 3.45 (RNFL2) modes of the RTVue-100 system were analyzed. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) of MIRL and pRNFL thicknesses for discriminating patients with NTG from control subjects were determined. The AUCs were compared between patients with central visual field (VF) defects (VF; <or=10 degrees of fixation) and peripheral VF defects (>10 degrees from fixation).The average MIRL thickness showed a strong correlation with both RNFL1 and -2 thicknesses (R(2) = 0.773, 0.774, both P < 0.0001). The AUCs for average MIRL, RNFL1, and RNFL2 thicknesses were not significantly different at 0.945, 0.973, and 0.976, respectively. However, the AUCs of the average and superior MIRL thicknesses were significantly less than that of the pRNFL thickness in eyes with moderate-to-advanced glaucoma and eyes with peripheral VF defects.The average MIRL thickness showed a strong correlation with pRNFL thickness, because patients with NTG at an early stage showed paracentral VF defects near the fixation point. MIRL thickness showed glaucoma discrimination ability comparable to that of pRNFL thickness in patients with NTG with early VF defects. In eyes with advanced or peripheral VF defect, pRNFL measurement showed a better glaucoma diagnostic ability than did MIRL measurement.Comparing glaucomatous optic neuropathy in primary open angle and primary angle closure glaucoma eyes by scanning laser polarimetry-variable corneal compensation.To study the retinal nerve fiber layer thickness difference between high-tension primary open angle glaucoma (HT-POAG) and primary angle closure glaucoma (PACG) eyes using scanning laser polarimetry-variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC) in Taiwan-Chinese population; to evaluate the usefulness of the GDx VCC for detecting POAG and PACG eyes in Taiwan-Chinese population.The study comprised 88 early to moderate glaucomatous eyes (one randomly selected eye from 47 HT-POAG patients and 41 PACG patients) and the control group consisted of 45 age-matched eyes from 45 normal individuals. Each subject underwent retinal nerve fiber layer thickness measurement by GDx VCC and Humphrey Field Analyzer visual field testing. Measured GDx VCC parameters were compared among groups. We also calculated the area under the receive operator characteristic (AROC) curve, corresponding sensitivity/specificity and best cut off value for each parameter in differentiating normal from POAG and PACG eyes.There was no significant difference between HT-POAG and PACG eyes in each parameter. The parameter with the best AROC curve for differentiating normal from POAG eye was nerve fiber indicator (AROC, 0.779; sensitivity=57.4%, specificity=100%; best cut off value >27). The parameter with the best AROC curves for differentiating normal from PACG eyes was temporal-superior-nasal-inferior-temporal average (AROC, 0.829; sensitivity=46.3%, specificity=100%, best cut off value <51.7).There was no significant difference between the HT-POAG and PACG eyes as far as the various parameters were concerned. GDx VCC shows fair discriminating ability in distinguishing normal from POAG and PACG eyes in Taiwan Chinese population.Diagnostic ability of the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 for glaucoma.To compare the diagnostic ability of the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 (HRT3) and the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 2 (HRT2) for discriminating between healthy eyes and eyes with glaucomatous visual field loss.Retrospective cross-sectional study.Participants were 93 healthy subjects and 90 patients with open-angle glaucoma. All participants underwent imaging of the optic nerve head with the HRT2. Afterward, HRT data also were analyzed using version 3 of the software without modifying the optic disk contour line. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves between normal and glaucomatous subjects were plotted for the global stereometric parameters of both software versions. Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) and glaucoma probability score (GPS) diagnostic abilities also were compared.The parameters with the largest areas under the ROC curve were the Frederick S. Mikelberg (FSM) discriminant function for the HRT3 (0.948) and the vertical cup-to-disk ratio (0.914) for the HRT2. At a fixed specificity of 95%, the best sensitivity was 74.4% for the Reinhard O.W. Burk (RB) discriminant function of the HRT2 and 83.3% for the FSM discriminant function of the HRT3. The best sensitivity and specificity pairs for the HRT classifications were 85.5% and 76.3%, respectively, for overall MRA2, 84.4% and 83.8%, respectively, for overall MRA3, 93.3% and 58.0%, respectively, for the global color-coded GPS, and 84.4% and 74.1%, respectively, for the global GPS numerical value.At 95% fixed specificity, most HRT3 parameters exhibited at least the same sensitivity for glaucoma diagnosis as the analogous parameters for the HRT2. The diagnostic ability overall of MRA3 was similar to that of the previous version. GPS exhibited higher sensitivity and somewhat lower specificity than the MRA.Optic nerve head assessment: comparison of Cirrus optic coherence tomography and Heidelberg Retinal Tomograph 3.The purpose of this study was to analyse the relationship between optic nerve head (ONH) parameters measured by spectral domain optical coherence tomography and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscope.Prospective, cross-sectional study. Hospital setting.One hundred seventy-three subjects (85 glaucoma and 88 normal subjects).One eye from each individual was selected randomly for ONH imaging by the spectral domain Cirrus OCT and Heidelberg Retinal Tomograph 3 (HRT3).Four ONH parameters that are measured by both technologies (average cup-to-disc ratio [CDR], rim area, disc area and cup volume) were analysed and compared for differences, agreement of the categorical classification, diagnostic sensitivities and specificities and the area under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC).ONH parameters, as determined by the two technologies were significantly different but strongly correlated. Proportional bias was demonstrated for all measurements. The agreement of categorical classification was excellent for CDR (κ = 0.94) and good for rim area and cup volume (κ = 0.63 and 0.71, respectively). The highest sensitivities at fixed specificities were achieved by Cirrus OCT. AUCs for CDR, rim area, disc area and cup volume were not significantly different between the two technologies.The diagnostic capability of ONH measurements by both technologies is similar. Paired ONH measurements by Cirrus OCT and HRT3 are strongly correlated but significantly different and proportionally biased. The results preclude interchangeable use of the absolute values, but categorical classification of ONH parameters may be interchangeable in clinical practice.Evaluation of retinal nerve fiber layer thickness measurements for glaucoma detection: GDx ECC versus spectral-domain OCT.To assess the ability of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements obtained using GDx-enhanced corneal compensation (ECC) or spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (RTVue), and that of ganglion cell complex (GCC) scan available on RTVue, to detect glaucoma.One randomly selected eye of 205 subjects (70 normal, 65 ocular hypertension, and 70 glaucoma) underwent a complete clinical and instrumental examination. RTVue spectral-domain optical coherence tomography was used to assess RNFL thickness and GCC parameters, GDx ECC to assess RNFL thickness. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) and sensitivity of the RNFL and GCC parameters were calculated at a fixed specificity of 95%, and the diagnostic abilities of the RNFL values obtained using the 2 instruments were compared. We also compared the results obtained in the normal, ocular hypertensive, and glaucomatous subjects.Best GDx RNFL parameter was nerve fiber indicator (NFI) (AUC 0.99, sensitivity 96%); the best RTVue parameters were average (AUC 0.98, sensitivity 90%), inferior-temporal (AUC 0.97, sensitivity 89%), and superior-temporal RNFL thickness (AUC 0.96, sensitivity 87%). There were no significant differences between the 2 devices (P>0.05). Best GCC parameters were focal loss volume (AUC 0.98, sensitivity 91%) and global loss volume (AUC 0.96, sensitivity 87%).GDx ECC and RTVue show a very good diagnostic ability to detect glaucoma. Most of the RNFL parameters had high AUCs and sensitivities. The diagnostic validity of GCC was comparable with that of the RNFL parameters, and they may be very useful in detecting RNFL damage.Glaucoma detection ability of ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer thickness by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in high myopia.To compare the glaucoma detection ability of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) thickness measured with Cirrus spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) with that of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness in high myopia.In 49 highly myopic and 54 nonhighly myopic glaucoma patients--along with 78 healthy myopic subjects--two scans, including one macular scan and one peripapillary RNFL scan, were obtained using Cirrus SD-OCT. For 44 randomly selected glaucoma patients, three macular scans were taken for reproducibility measurements. The glaucoma detection abilities of macular GCIPL and peripapillary RNFL thicknesses were compared between the highly myopic and nonhighly myopic groups. Diagnostic power was assessed by area under the receiver operating characteristic (AUROC) curves and sensitivity. Repeatability was assessed by intraclass correlation coefficient (ICC) and coefficient of variation (CV).All of the macular GCIPL and peripapillary RNFL thickness measurements excepting the 3 o'clock peripapillary RNFL sector showed an AUROC over 0.5. The best parameters for discriminating normal from glaucomatous eyes were inferior RNFL (0.906) and inferotemporal GCIPL (0.852) thickness in the highly myopic group, and average RNFL (0.920) and minimum GCIPL (0.908) thickness in the nonhighly myopic group. The best peripapillary RNFL and macular GCIPL thickness parameters showed no statistically significant differences. All of the ICCs of the macular GCIPL ranged between 0.96 and 0.99, and the CV was <3%.In cases of high myopia, the glaucoma detection ability of macular GCIPL thickness was high and comparable with that of peripapillary RNFL thickness.Structure-function relationships using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography: comparison with scanning laser polarimetry.To evaluate and compare the regional relationships between visual field sensitivity and retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness as measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (OCT) and scanning laser polarimetry.Prospective cross-sectional study.One hundred and twenty eyes of 120 patients (40 with healthy eyes, 40 with suspected glaucoma, and 40 with glaucoma) were tested on Cirrus-OCT, GDx VCC, and standard automated perimetry. Raw data on RNFL thickness were extracted for 256 peripapillary sectors of 1.40625 degrees each for the OCT measurement ellipse and 64 peripapillary sectors of 5.625 degrees each for the GDx VCC measurement ellipse. Correlations between peripapillary RNFL thickness in 6 sectors and visual field sensitivity in the 6 corresponding areas were evaluated using linear and logarithmic regression analysis. Receiver operating curve areas were calculated for each instrument.With spectral-domain OCT, the correlations (r(2)) between RNFL thickness and visual field sensitivity ranged from 0.082 (nasal RNFL and corresponding visual field area, linear regression) to 0.726 (supratemporal RNFL and corresponding visual field area, logarithmic regression). By comparison, with GDx-VCC, the correlations ranged from 0.062 (temporal RNFL and corresponding visual field area, linear regression) to 0.362 (supratemporal RNFL and corresponding visual field area, logarithmic regression). In pairwise comparisons, these structure-function correlations were generally stronger with spectral-domain OCT than with GDx VCC and with logarithmic regression than with linear regression. The largest areas under the receiver operating curve were seen for OCT superior thickness (0.963 ± 0.022; P < .001) in eyes with glaucoma and for OCT average thickness (0.888 ± 0.072; P < .001) in eyes with suspected glaucoma.The structure-function relationship was significantly stronger with spectral-domain OCT than with scanning laser polarimetry, and was better expressed logarithmically than linearly. Measurements with these 2 instruments should not be considered to be interchangeable.Retinal nerve fiber layer imaging with spectral-domain optical coherence tomography: analysis of the retinal nerve fiber layer map for glaucoma detection.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of the retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness deviation map imaged by a spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (OCT; Cirrus HD-OCT, Carl Zeiss Meditec Inc, Dublin, CA) and compare its sensitivity and specificity for glaucoma detection with circumpapillary RNFL measurement derived from the standard 3.46 mm diameter circle scan.Prospective, cross-sectional study.We included 102 normal subjects and 121 glaucoma patients.One eye from each individual was imaged with Cirrus HD-OCT and Stratus OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec Inc.). Glaucoma was defined based on the presence of visual field defects with the Humphrey visual field analyzer (Carl Zeiss Meditec Inc.). A scoring system (0-5) was developed to analyze the RNFL thickness deviation map taking the defect size, shape, depth, location, and distance from the disc margin into consideration. Each of these features was scored independently by a masked observer with a highest total score of 5 (glaucomatous RNFL defect) and a lowest score of 0 (no RNFL defect). Sensitivity and specificity were computed with a score of > or =3, > or =4, or =5. The diagnostic performance of circumpapillary RNFL measurement was analyzed with clock-hour and average RNFL thickness categorical classification.Diagnostic sensitivity and specificity.The sensitivities of the RNFL thickness deviation map ranged between 95.0% and 97.5%. There were significant differences in specificity between a map score of 5, a map score of > or =4 (87.3%), and a map score > or =3 (72.5%; P< or =0.014). A map score of 5 attained a significantly higher sensitivity (95.0%) compared with clock-hour or average RNFL thickness categorical classification by Stratus OCT or Cirrus HD-OCT (46.3%-88.4%; P< or =0.033) at a comparable level of specificity (95.1%), except when glaucoma was detected as having > or =1 clock-hour at the < or =5% level by Cirrus HD-OCT in which an equally high sensitivity (93.4%) was found but at the expense of a significantly lower specificity (83.3%; P<0.001).Analysis of the RNFL thickness deviation map provides additional spatial and morphologic information of RNFL damage and significantly improves the diagnostic sensitivity for glaucoma detection compared with conventional circumpapillary RNFL measurement.Relevance vector machine and support vector machine classifier analysis of scanning laser polarimetry retinal nerve fiber layer measurements.To classify healthy and glaucomatous eyes using relevance vector machine (RVM) and support vector machine (SVM) learning classifiers trained on retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements obtained by scanning laser polarimetry (SLP).Seventy-two eyes of 72 healthy control subjects (average age = 64.3 +/- 8.8 years, visual field mean deviation = -0.71 +/- 1.2 dB) and 92 eyes of 92 patients with glaucoma (average age = 66.9 +/- 8.9 years, visual field mean deviation = -5.32 +/- 4.0 dB) were imaged with SLP with variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC; Laser Diagnostic Technologies, San Diego, CA). RVM and SVM learning classifiers were trained and tested on SLP-determined RNFL thickness measurements from 14 standard parameters and 64 sectors (approximately 5.6 degrees each) obtained in the circumpapillary area under the instrument-defined measurement ellipse (total 78 parameters). Ten-fold cross-validation was used to train and test RVM and SVM classifiers on unique subsets of the full 164-eye data set and areas under the receiver operating characteristic (AUROC) curve for the classification of eyes in the test set were generated. AUROC curve results from RVM and SVM were compared to those for 14 SLP software-generated global and regional RNFL thickness parameters. Also reported was the AUROC curve for the GDx VCC software-generated nerve fiber indicator (NFI).The AUROC curves for RVM and SVM were 0.90 and 0.91, respectively, and increased to 0.93 and 0.94 when the training sets were optimized with sequential forward and backward selection (resulting in reduced dimensional data sets). AUROC curves for optimized RVM and SVM were significantly larger than those for all individual SLP parameters. The AUROC curve for the NFI was 0.87.Results from RVM and SVM trained on SLP RNFL thickness measurements are similar and provide accurate classification of glaucomatous and healthy eyes. RVM may be preferable to SVM, because it provides a Bayesian-derived probability of glaucoma as an output. These results suggest that these machine learning classifiers show good potential for glaucoma diagnosis.Glaucoma detection using scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal polarization compensation.To compare the ability of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) to discriminate between healthy and glaucomatous eyes with manufacturer-assumed fixed and subject-specific variable corneal polarization magnitude (CPM) and corneal polarization axis (CPA) values.An SLP was modified to enable the measurement of CPM and CPA values so that compensation for corneal birefringence could be corrected on a subject-specific variable basis. We examined 40 healthy eyes and 54 glaucomatous eyes with repeatable visual field damage (average +/- SD mean deviation, -6.5 +/- 4.9 dB) were examined by SLP using the manufacturer-assumed fixed corneal compensation (FCC-SLP) values and subject-specific variable corneal compensation (VCC-SLP) values. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve for discriminating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes using FCC-SLP and VCC-SLP parameters were compared.The areas under the ROC curve increased with VCC-SLP compared with FCC-SLP, particularly for all thickness parameters. The parameters with which the area under the ROC curve improved significantly from FCC-SLP to VCC-SLP included average thickness (ROC curve area, 0.62 vs 0.75), superior integral (0.66 vs 0.79), ellipse average (0.65 vs 0.80), inferior average (0.66 vs 0.80), and superior average (0.68 vs 0.83).Variable corneal compensation to correct for subject-specific CPM and CPA can improve the ability of SLP to discriminate between healthy and glaucomatous eyes.Glaucoma diagnostic performance of GDxVCC and spectralis OCT on eyes with atypical retardation pattern.To investigate the impact of typical scan score (TSS) on discriminating glaucomatous and healthy eyes by scanning laser polarimetry and spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) in 32 peripapillary sectors.One hundred two glaucoma patients and 32 healthy controls underwent standard automated perimetry, 24-hour intraocular pressure profile, optic disc photography, GDxVCC, and SD-OCT measurements. For controls, only very typical scans (TSS=100) were accepted. Glaucoma patients were divided into 3 subgroups (very typical: TSS=100; typical: 99≥TSS≥80, atypical: TSS<80). Receiver operating characteristic curves were constructed for mean retinal nerve fiber layer values, sector data, and nerve fiber indicator (NFI). Sensitivity was estimated at ≥90% specificity to compare the discriminating ability of each imaging modality.For discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes with very typical scans, the NFI and inferior sector analyses 26 to 27 demonstrated the highest sensitivity at ≥90% specificity in GDxVCC and SD-OCT, respectively. For the typical and atypical groups, sensitivity at ≥90% specificity decreased for all 32 peripapillary sectors on an average by 10.9% and 17.9% for GDxVCC and by 4.9% and 0.8% for SD-OCT. For GDxVCC, diagnostic performance of peripapillary sectors decreased with lower TSS, especially in temporosuperior and inferotemporal sectors (sensitivity at ≥90% specificity decreased by 55.3% and by 37.8% in the atypical group).Diagnostic accuracy is comparable for SD-OCT and GDxVCC if typical scans (TSS=100) are investigated. Decreasing TSS is associated with a decrease in diagnostic accuracy for discriminating healthy and glaucomatous eyes by scanning laser polarimetry. NFI is less influenced than the global or sector retinal nerve fiber layer thickness. The TSS score should be included in the standard printout. Diagnostic accuracy of SD-OCT is barely influenced by low TSS.Use of progressive glaucomatous optic disk change as the reference standard for evaluation of diagnostic tests in glaucoma.Progressive change in optic disk appearance has been suggested as the best available reference standard for glaucoma diagnosis. We evaluated the accuracy of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) with variable corneal compensation to discriminate patients with documented progressive optic disk change from healthy subjects.Observational case-control study.Glaucoma patients with documented evidence of progressive optic disk change as assessed by stereoscopic photographs were selected. Healthy control subjects had normal visual fields and normal clinical examination. All subjects underwent imaging with the GDx VCC scanning laser polarimeter. Receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) curves, sensitivities at fixed specificities, and likelihood ratios were calculated.Sixty-five eyes were healthy control patients. Seventy-one eyes had progressive optic disk change, of which 41 (58%) had abnormal visual field tests closest to the imaging date (perimetric glaucomatous optic neuropathy [GON]), and 30 (42%) eyes had normal visual fields (preperimetric GON). The GDx VCC parameter nerve fiber indicator performed best for discrimination between perimetric GON and normal eyes (AUC = 0.94; sensitivity = 93% for specificity > or =80%) as well as for the discrimination between preperimetric GON and normal eyes (AUC = 0.89; sensitivity = 83% for specificity > or =80%).SLP differentiated patients with documented progressive optic disk change from normal subjects and detected abnormalities in patients with confirmed diagnosis of preperimetric GON, suggesting that it may be useful for early glaucoma diagnosis. We suggest that progressive optic disk change should be used in the evaluation of diagnostic accuracy of imaging instruments for glaucoma.Glaucoma diagnostic ability of quadrant and clock-hour neuroretinal rim assessment using cirrus HD optical coherence tomography.The aim of this study was to investigate the glaucoma diagnostic ability of quadrant and clock-hour neuroretinal rim assessment by Cirrus HD spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (OCT).Eighty eyes of 80 glaucoma patients and 80 eyes of 80 healthy subjects were enrolled. Peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness was measured by Cirrus HD-OCT. Quadrant and clock-hour rim areas and thicknesses were obtained from optic nerve head images and 360° circumferential rim thickness curve of Cirrus HD-OCT, respectively. Area under receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) and sensitivities of RNFL thicknesses, rim areas, and rim thicknesses at a 90% specificity level were calculated.Quadrant and clock-hour rim area and thickness showed good diagnostic ability for glaucoma in all areas (AUCs, 0.877-0.969; sensitivities, 67.5%-96.3%). When the AUCs of RNFL thicknesses, rim areas, and rim thicknesses were compared, no significant difference was found in global area and superior and inferior quadrants (P > 0.05). However, in nasal and temporal quadrants, rim area and thickness had greater AUCs (AUCs, 0.919-0.945; sensitivities, 82.5%-86.3%) than RNFL thickness (AUCs, 0.749-0.776; sensitivities, 12.5%-33.8%; P < 0.001). Eyes with moderate to advanced glaucoma (mean deviation < -6 dB) had thinner RNFL than mild glaucoma (mean deviation ≥ -6 dB) in global area, superior, inferior, and temporal quadrants (P < 0.003); rim area and thickness showed no significant difference in all areas (P > 0.003).Neuroretinal rim assessment in nasal and temporal areas by Cirrus HD-OCT may enhance glaucoma diagnostic ability. RNFL and rim changes measured by Cirrus HD-OCT may be different according to the stages of glaucomatous damage.Detection of glaucoma using operator-dependent versus operator-independent classification in the Heidelberg retinal tomograph-III.To compare the abilities of a new Glaucoma Probability Scoring (GPS) system and Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) to differentiate between glaucomatous and normal eyes using Heidelberg retinal tomograph (HRT)-III software and race-specific databases.In this prospective study, one eye (refractive error < or =5 D) each of consecutive normal patients and those with glaucoma was enrolled. All patients underwent a full eye examination, standard achromatic perimetry (Swedish Interactive Threshold Algorithm-standard automated perimetry (SITA-SAP), program 24-2) and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (HRT-II) within 1 month. Normal patients had two normal visual fields in both eyes (pattern standard deviation (PSD) >5% and Glaucoma Hemifield Test within 97% normal limits) and a normal clinical examination. Glaucoma was defined on the basis of SITA-SAP visual field loss (PSD<5% or Glaucoma Hemifield Test outside normal limits) on two consecutive visual fields. HRT-II examinations were exported to the HRT-III software (V.3.0), which uses an enlarged race-specific database, consisting of 733 eyes of white people and 215 eyes of black people. Race-adjusted MRA for the most abnormal sector (operator-dependent contour line placement) was compared with the global race-adjusted GPS (operator independent). MRA sectors outside the 99.9% confidence interval limits (outside normal limits) and GPS > or =0.64 were considered abnormal.136 normal patients (72 black and 64 white patients) and 84 patients with glaucoma (52 black and 32 white patients) were enrolled (mean age 50.4 (SD 14.4) years). The average visual field mean deviation was (-)0.4 (SD 1.1) db for the normal group and (-)7.3 (SD 6.7) db for the glaucoma group (p<0.001). Mean GPS values were 0.21 (SD 0.23) and 0.73 (SD 0.27) for normal and glaucomatous eyes, respectively (p<0.001). Sensitivity and specificity values were 77.1% and 90.3% for GPS, and 71.4% and 91.9% for MRA, respectively.In this cohort, GPS software sensitivity and specificity values are similar to those of MRA, which requires placement of an operator-dependent contour line. The development of software to detect glaucoma without a contour line is critical to improving the potential use of HRT as a tool for glaucoma detection and screening.Comparison of Cirrus OCT and Stratus OCT on the ability to detect localized retinal nerve fiber layer defects in preperimetric glaucoma.To evaluate and compare the diagnostic ability of Cirrus and Stratus optical coherence tomography (OCT) to detect localized retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defects in patients with normal standard automated perimetry.This study included 55 eyes of 55 subjects with preperimetric localized RNFL defects and 55 normal control eyes of 55 age- and sex-matched subjects. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) were calculated and compared. Based on the internal normative database from each device, the sensitivity and specificity for detecting preperimetric localized RNFL defects were calculated.There was no statistically significant difference between the AUROCs for the best parameters from the Cirrus OCT (inferior thickness, AUROC = 0.728) and Stratus OCT (7 o'clock sector, AUROC = 0.760; P = 0.477). The sensitivity of the Cirrus OCT parameters ranged from 21.0% to 87.1% and that of the Stratus OCT parameters ranged from 4.8% to 30.7%, with the criterion of abnormal at the 5% level. Based on the normative database, the highest Cirrus OCT sensitivity was obtained with the deviation-from-normal map (sensitivity 87.1% and specificity 61.8%), and the highest Stratus OCT sensitivity was obtained with the TSNIT thickness graph (sensitivity 30.7% and specificity 85.5%).There were no significant differences between the AUROCs for Cirrus and Stratus OCT, indicating that the two devices have similar diagnostic potentials in preperimetric glaucoma. After comparison with their normative databases, Cirrus OCT had generally higher sensitivities; however, this was largely at the cost of lower specificities than Stratus OCT.Detection of macular ganglion cell loss in preperimetric glaucoma patients with localized retinal nerve fibre defects by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography.To evaluate and compare the utility of ganglion cell complex with peripapillary retinal nerve fibre layer and optic nerve head measurements for detection of localized defects in patients with preperimetric glaucoma using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography.Prospective study.Preperimetric glaucoma patients.A total of 105 eyes with preperimetric glaucoma and 68 age- and refractive error-matched control eyes were enrolled. The ability to detect localized retinal nerve fibre layer defects by RTVue-100 spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Optovue, Inc., Fremont, CA, USA) was assessed calculating the areas under receiver operating characteristic curves.The ability to detect localized retinal nerve fibre layer defects by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography.Global volume loss and superior ganglion cell complex thickness showed the largest area under receiver operating characteristic curve values (both areas under receiver operating characteristic curves 0.84, P < 0.001) among ganglion cell complex parameters. Average peripapillary retinal nerve fibre layer thickness afforded the best diagnostic capability (area under receiver operating characteristic curve 0.89, P < 0.001), whereas among optic nerve head parameters, the horizontal cup:disc ratio yielded the highest area under receiver operating characteristic curve (0.85, P < 0.001). No statistical difference was evident between the areas under receiver operating characteristic curves of the most informative parameters when the data were gathered from the three different sites (ganglion cell complex, peripapillary retinal nerve fibre layer, and optic nerve head) (P > 0.02).Ganglion cell complex thickness was significantly reduced in eyes with preperimetric glaucoma. Ganglion cell complex imaging using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography may be a useful ancillary modality for detection of early macular changes in glaucomatous eyes with localized retinal nerve fibre layer defects.Influence of disc size on optic nerve head versus retinal nerve fiber layer assessment for diagnosing glaucoma.To explore and compare the influence of optic disc size on the diagnostic accuracy of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness and optic nerve head (ONH) quantitative assessment.Observational, cross-sectional evaluation of diagnostic tests.We included 120 eyes from 50 normal subjects and 70 glaucomatous patients classified by the presence of a repeatable visual field defect for the analysis.The RNFL thickness was measured by scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensator (GDx-VCC, Carl-Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA) and spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Cirrus HD-OCT, Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc). We obtained ONH imaging by means of confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (HRT3; Heidelberg Engineering, GmbH, Dossenheim, Germany).Sensitivity and specificity for normative classifications, sensitivity at fixed specificity and area under the receiver operating characteristics curve (AUC) for continuous parameters. A logistic marginal regression model and coefficients of variation (CoV) have been used to test and quantify the influence of optic disc size on the diagnostic accuracy of the 3 technologies under investigation.Among continuous parameters average RNFL thickness for Cirrus HD-OCT, nerve fiber indicator for GDx-VCC and cup shape measure for the HRT3 showed the best diagnostic accuracy with an AUC of 0.97, 0.94, and 0.94, respectively. Among normative classifications, the highest sensitivity and specificity were found for OCT average RNFL thickness (75.8% and 94.7%), for GDx superior thickness (77.1% and 97.5%), for HRT3 Moorfields regression analysis result (89.4% and 73.7%) and for HRT3 GPS global (92.3% and 76.5%). The diagnostic performance of HRT3 parameters seemed to be significantly influenced by optic disc size, although the same was not true for Cirrus HD-OCT and GDx VCC. The most steady performers for each imaging device across disc size groups were Cirrus HD-OCT average thickness (CoV, 1.6%), GDx-VCC inferior thickness (CoV, 2.5%), and HRT3 GPS temporal and nasal (CoV, 21.4%).The diagnostic accuracy of quantitative RNFL assessment as performed by Cirrus HD-OCT and GDx-VCC is high and virtually unaffected or only minimally affected by the size of the optic disc and may provide more consistent diagnostic outcomes across small and large discs than ONH assessment as performed by HRT3.Analysis of GDx-VCC polarimetry data by Wavelet-Fourier analysis across glaucoma stages.The purpose of this study was to apply shape-based analysis techniques of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness to GDx-VCC (variable corneal and lens compensator; Laser Diagnostic Technologies, Inc., San Diego, CA) polarimetry data and to evaluate the techniques' ability to detect glaucoma in its earliest stages. Wavelet-based (wavelet-Fourier analysis [WFA]), Fourier-based (fast Fourier analysis [FFA]), and several previous variations of shape-based analysis were considered, as well as the standard metric nerve fiber indicator (NFI), and all were compared as a function of disease stage.GDx-VCC scans of one eye of each of 67 patients with glaucoma and each of 67 healthy age-matched subjects provided RNFL thickness estimates at a fixed distance from the optic disc. Severity of disease was graded according to the Glaucoma Staging System and also by mean deviation (MD) from standard automated perimetry. WFA, FFA, and NFI procedures were performed including the following variations: use of signed or unsigned phase, inclusion of interocular or intraocular asymmetry of analysis parameters, and combination of features by principle components analysis or Wilks lambda. Independent samples (k-fold variation) were used for training and testing. Sensitivity, specificity, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) area were obtained.Classification performance of WFA (ROC = 0.978) was significantly better than FFA (ROC = 0.938) and NFI (ROC = 0.900). This difference was largest for the earliest stages of glaucoma. Shape-based analysis methods performed better than NFI overall. Adding between-eye asymmetry measures helped FFA but not WFA.Shape-based analysis, and WFA in particular, makes an important improvement in detecting earliest glaucoma with polarimetry.[Diagnostic ability of GDx VCC for glaucoma diagnosis].To assess the diagnostic ability of scanning laser polarimetry (GDx VCC) to differentiate between normal and glaucomatous eyes.417 eyes of 417 consecutive subjects were prospectively selected. They were classified into 60 healthy controls, 218 ocular hypertensive eyes, 68 glaucoma suspects, and 71 glaucomatous eyes, depending on intraocular pressure, optic nerve head morphology and standard automated perimetry results. All underwent a scanning laser polarimetry with the GDx VCC. Retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters of the GDx-VCC were compared among the four groups. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were plotted between normal and glaucomatous eyes. The best parameters were defined according to the area under the ROC curve and the best sensitivity/specificity balance.Most parameters of GDx-VCC exhibited differences between the glaucoma group and the rest of the groups. Some parameters were also different between healthy patients and glaucoma suspects. The best parameter was the nerve fiber indicator (NFI; area under the ROC curve: 0.876). NFI, superior normalized area, and inferior normalized area yielded the highest sensitivities at 85% and 90% fixed specificity.Most RNFL parameters measured with the GDx-VCC provided good diagnostic ability for open-angle glaucoma. The best GDx-VCC parameter in differentiating between normal and glaucomatous eyes was the NFI.The glaucoma detection capability of spectral-domain OCT and GDx-VCC deviation maps in early glaucoma patients with localized visual field defects.To evaluate and compare the glaucoma detection capabilities afforded by retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness and deviation maps obtained using Cirrus spectral domain optical coherence tomography (Cirrus OCT), and GDx employing variable corneal compensation (GDx-VCC) in glaucoma patients with early, localized visual field (VF) loss.This prospective controlled, comparative study was performed on 42 eyes with localized VF defects, and 42 age/refractive error-matched healthy eyes. All participants were imaged by both imaging devices at the same visit. The area of the RNFL defect in each deviation map, corresponding to a VF defect, was analyzed by direct counting of color-coded superpixels in each device. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed and compared between Cirrus OCT and GDx-VCC.The areas under the ROCs (AUCs) of RNFL quadrant thicknesses in hemifields with visual field (VF) defects did not differ significantly (Cirrus OCT; 0.961, GDx-VCC; 0.919, P = 0.07). However, Cirrus OCT afforded a better diagnostic ability, by deviation map analysis, than did GDx-VCC (0.972 vs 0.887, P = 0.02).The RNFL thicknesses assessed by either Cirrus OCT or GDx-VCC were comparable in terms of early glaucoma diagnostic capability. However, when areas containing RNFL defects were analyzed via deviation mapping, Cirrus OCT was better than GDx-VCC.Comparison of the diagnostic accuracies of the Spectralis, Cirrus, and RTVue optical coherence tomography devices in glaucoma.To compare the diagnostic accuracies of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements obtained with the Spectralis (Heidelberg Engineering, Dossenheim, Germany), Cirrus (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA), and RTVue (Optovue Inc., Fremont, CA) devices for the detection of glaucoma.Diagnostic, case-control study.A total of 233 (107 healthy, 126 glaucomatous) of 149 participants from the longitudinal Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study (DIGS) and from the African Descent and Glaucoma Evaluation Study (ADAGES).All participants underwent RNFL thickness imaging with the Spectralis, Cirrus, and RTVue devices in the same visit. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves adjusted for age and race were obtained for quadrants (superior, nasal, inferior, temporal) and global RNFL thickness for all instruments. Areas under ROC (AUC) and sensitivities at fixed specificities (80% and 95%) were calculated and compared.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy using AUCs and sensitivities at fixed specificities of 80% and 95%.The RNFL thickness parameter with the largest AUCs was the superior quadrant for the Spectralis (0.88) and the global RNFL thickness for the Cirrus (0.88) and the RTVue (0.87). The pairwise comparison among the ROC curves showed no statistical difference for all parameters except for the nasal quadrant, which had significantly larger AUC in the Spectralis and RTVue compared with the Cirrus (P<0.03 for both comparisons). There were no significant differences in sensitivities among the best parameters from each instrument (P>0.05). The superior quadrant thickness measured with the Spectralis had sensitivity of 81.9% at a fixed specificity of 80% and 70% at a fixed specificity of 95%. The global thickness measured by the Cirrus had a sensitivity of 80.3% at a fixed specificity of 80% and 65.6% at a fixed specificity of 95%. For the RTVue, the global thickness had a sensitivity of 77.9% at a fixed specificity of 80% and 62.1% at a fixed specificity of 95%.Although the spectral-domain optic coherence tomography (SD-OCT) instruments have different resolution and acquisition rates, their ability to detect glaucoma was similar.Glaucoma probability score vs Moorfields classification in normal, ocular hypertensive, and glaucomatous eyes.To evaluate the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph III (HRT III) glaucoma probability score in differentiating normal from pathologic eyes and to compare the glaucoma probability score with Moorfields regression analysis (MRA).Prospective cross-sectional study.Fifty-nine normal, 40 hypertensive, and 83 glaucomatous eyes were examined with Swedish interactive threshold algorithm standard 24-2 visual fields and HRT III. Sensitivity and specificity were evaluated using global and sectorial glaucoma probability score and MRA compared with damage in visual fields. Areas under receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were evaluated. Agreement between MRA and glaucoma probability score was calculated using the kappa coefficient. Glaucoma probability score was considered to be displaced when a symbol was outside and the opposite symbol was inside the optic disk.MRA sensitivity and specificity were 39.8% and 93.2% (most specific criteria) and 68.7% and 83.1% (least specific criteria), respectively. Glaucoma probability score sensitivity and specificity were 71.1% and 69.5% (most specific criteria) and 85.5% and 54.2% (least specific criteria), respectively. Visual field parameters were related to the global (P = .001) and sectorial (P < .05) glaucoma probability score. A displaced glaucoma probability score was found in 35 eyes, but with unchanged glaucoma probability score sensitivity and specificity. Areas under the ROC curves of glaucoma probability score was 0.77. The kappa coefficient was 0.34.Glaucoma probability score analysis tends to be more sensitive but less specific than MRA. Glaucoma probability score did not differentiate normal and hypertensives eyes. When displaced, glaucoma probability score sensitivity and specificity were unchanged. MRA and glaucoma probability score agreement was low. Glaucoma probability score is advantageous over MRA in early-stage glaucoma.Comparison of two different spectral domain optical coherence tomography devices in the detection of localized retinal nerve fiber layer defects.To compare the detection of localized retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defects by two different spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) devices.Eyes of 42 normal control subjects and 48 patients with a localized RNFL defect on red-free fundus photographs were imaged by the Cirrus (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA, USA) and 3D OCT (Topcon, Tokyo, Japan) devices. We compared sensitivities, specificities, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) of circumpapillary RNFL (cpRNFL) thickness and ganglion cell complex (GCC) parameters between the two devices.The devices provided different cpRNFL thickness measurements. The highest sensitivities at fixed specificities of 80 % (Cirrus: 83.3 %; 3D OCT: 77.1 %) and 95 % (Cirrus: 69.8 %; 3D OCT: 68.8 %) and the largest AUCs (Cirrus: 0.90; 3D OCT: 0.88) obtained by the cpRNFL parameters of the two devices were similar. Based on the internal normative database, the deviation-from-normal map of the Cirrus OCT device and the 36-segment map of the 3D OCT device had the highest sensitivity (89.6 and 91.7 %, respectively). Among the macular GCC parameters of the 3D OCT device, inferior macular RNFL thickness had the highest sensitivity (81.2 % at a specificity of 80 %) and the largest AUC (0.89).Although the two SD-OCT devices have different measurement protocols, they showed similar abilities for the detection of a localized RNFL defect.Ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer thickness of high definition optical coherence tomography in perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma.We determined the diagnostic performance of ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) parameters of high definition optical coherence tomography (HD-OCT) in perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma, and compared it to optic nerve head (ONH) and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters.In a cross-sectional study, 53 eyes of normal subjects and 83 eyes of glaucoma patients (62 perimetric and 21 preperimetric) from the Longitudinal Glaucoma Evaluation Study (LOGES) underwent HD-OCT imaging with Optic Disc and Macular Cube protocols. Diagnostic abilities of GCIPL, ONH, and RNFL parameters were determined using area under receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) and likelihood ratios (LR).The AUCs of GCIPL parameters to diagnose perimetric glaucoma ranged from 0.84 to 0.90. The same of ONH and RNFL parameters ranged from 0.88 to 0.97 and 0.56 to 0.94, respectively. The AUCs of GCIPL, ONH, and RNFL parameters to diagnose preperimetric glaucoma ranged from 0.55 to 0.63, 0.77 to 0.92, and 0.39 to 0.80, respectively. For diagnosing preperimetric glaucoma, AUCs of all GCIPL parameters were significantly lower (P < 0.05) than those of the global ONH (vertical cup-to-disc ratio [CDR]; AUC, 0.92) and RNFL (average RNFL; AUC, 0.79) parameters. Outside normal limits category of GCIPL parameters also were associated with significantly smaller effects on the posttest probability of perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma.The diagnostic ability of GCIPL parameters was similar to that of ONH and peripapillary RNFL parameters in perimetric glaucoma. However, in preperimetric glaucoma, the diagnostic ability of GCIPL parameters was significantly lower than that of ONH and RNFL parameters.Diagnostic accuracy of nerve fibre layer, macular thickness and optic disc measurements made with the RTVue-100 optical coherence tomograph to detect glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of retinal nerve fibre layer thickness (RNFLT), ganglion cell complex (GCC), and optic disc measurements made with the RTVue-100 Fourier-domain optical coherence tomography (OCT) to detect glaucoma in a Caucasian referral population.One randomly selected eye of 286 Caucasian patients (93 healthy, 36 ocular hypertensive, 46 preperimetric glaucoma, and 111 perimetric glaucoma eyes) was evaluated.Using the software-provided classification, for the total population sensitivity did not exceed 73.6% for the optic nerve head parameters, and 62.7% for the other parameters. Specificity was high (94.6-100%) for most RNFLT and GCC parameters, but low (72.0-76.3%) for the optic disc parameters. Positive predictive value varied between 98.1 and 100% for the main RNFLT parameters, 92.6 and 100% for the 16 RNFLT sectors, 92.4 and 99.0% for the GCC parameters, but did not exceed 86.3% for any of the optic disc parameters. Positive likelihood ratio (PLR) was higher than 10 for average, inferior and superior RNFLT (25.5 to infinite), 12 of the 16 RNFLT sectors (12.6 to infinite), and three of the four GCC parameters (40.0 to 48.6). No optic disc parameter had a PLR higher than 3.0.RNFLT and GCC parameters of the RTVue-100 Fourier-domain OCT showed moderate sensitive but high specificity, positive predictive value and PLR for detection of glaucoma. The optic disc parameters had lower diagnostic accuracy than the RNFLT and GCC parameters.Diagnostic accuracy of the GDx VCC for glaucoma.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of the GDx VCC in the diagnosis of glaucoma.Prospective, comparative, observational, clinic-based case series.One eye each of 77 healthy subjects and 162 patients with primary open-angle glaucoma of Caucasian racial origin. Healthy subjects had normal visual fields (VFs), healthy-looking optic discs, and intraocular pressures of < or =21 mmHg in both eyes. Glaucoma patients had a reproducible glaucomatous VF defect and a glaucomatous appearance of the optic disc in at least one eye.All subjects were measured with the GDx VCC with an automated variable corneal compensator. We constructed receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves for all available parameters. Subsequently, we calculated sensitivity, specificity, and multilevel likelihood ratios for the best discriminating parameter in the entire group. In addition, we calculated sensitivity and specificity in patients with mild, moderate, and severe glaucomatous damage separately.Software-derived parameters TSNIT (temporal, superior, nasal, inferior, temporal) Average, Superior Average, Inferior Average, TSNIT Std. Dev. (standard deviation), and Nerve Fiber Indicator (NFI).The areas under the ROC curve for TSNIT Average, Superior Average, Inferior Average, TSNIT Std. Dev., and NFI were 0.93, 0.94, 0.90, 0.92, and 0.98, respectively. For the best discriminating parameter NFI, the sensitivity and specificity with a cutoff point of > or =40 were 89.0% and 95.9%, respectively. The multilevel likelihood ratios for glaucoma were 0.07 at NFI values of <35, 1.30 at values between 35 and 44, and 61.50 at values of > or =44. At the cutoff level of > or =40, the sensitivities of the NFI for correctly identifying glaucoma patients with mild, moderate, and severe damage were 83.8%, 92.9%, and 90.1%, respectively.The GDx VCC allowed easy, rapid, and accurate discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes. The NFI was the best discriminating parameter. The GDx VCC seems to fulfill criteria for a glaucoma screening device.Diagnostic power of optic disc morphology, peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer thickness, and macular inner retinal layer thickness in glaucoma diagnosis with fourier-domain optical coherence tomography.To evaluate the capability of the optic disc, peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (P-RNFL), macular inner retinal layer (M-IRL) parameters, and their combination obtained by Fourier-domain optical coherent tomography (OCT) in differentiating a glaucoma suspect from perimetric glaucoma.Two hundred and twenty eyes from 220 patients were enrolled in this study. The optic disc morphology, P-RNFL, and M-IRL were assessed by the Fourier-domain OCT (RTVue OCT, Model RT100, Optovue, Fremont, CA). A linear discriminant function was generated by stepwise linear discriminant analysis on the basis of OCT parameters and demographic factors. The diagnostic power of these parameters was evaluated with receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis. The diagnostic power in the clinically relevant range (specificity ≥ 80%) was presented as the partial area under the ROC curve (partial AROC).The individual OCT parameter with the largest AROC and partial AROC in the high specificity (≥ 80%) range were cup/disc vertical ratio (AROC = 0.854 and partial AROC = 0.142) for the optic disc parameters, average thickness (AROC = 0.919 and partial AROC = 0.147) for P-RNFL parameters, inferior hemisphere thickness (AROC = 0.871 and partial AROC = 0.138) for M-IRL parameters, respectively. The linear discriminant function further enhanced the ability in detecting perimetric glaucoma (AROC = 0.970 and partial AROC = 0.172).Average P-RNFL thickness is the optimal individual OCT parameter to detect perimetric glaucoma. Simultaneous evaluation on disc morphology, P-RNFL, and M-IRL thickness can improve the diagnostic accuracy in diagnosing glaucoma.Comparing the ganglion cell complex and retinal nerve fibre layer measurements by Fourier domain OCT to detect glaucoma in high myopia.To compare the diagnostic ability to detect glaucomatous changes between peripapillary retinal nerve fibre layer (RNFL) thickness and the macular ganglion cell complex (GCC) in highly myopic patients using Fourier domain optical coherence tomography.Participants, consecutively enrolled from January 2009 to June 2009, were imaged with RTVue-100 (NHM4 and MM7 scan). The sensitivity and specificity of a colour code less than 5% (red or yellow) for glaucoma diagnosis were calculated. Area under the receiver operator characteristic (AUROC) curves were generated to assess the ability of each parameter to detect glaucomatous changes.73 normal controls and 77 glaucoma patients were included. Participants were categorised as 105 non-high myopes (spherical equivalent >-6.0 dioptres) and 45 high myopes (Spherical equivalent ≤-6.0 dioptres). The GCC thickness showed a strong correlation with RNFL thickness (correlation coefficient=0.763, p<0.001) in all participants. The sensitivity from superior GCC colour code was significantly higher than that from superior RNFL (p=0.019). The ability to detect glaucomatous changes in the highly myopic group by examining the average GCC thickness (AUROC, GCC; 0.889) was higher than when examining RNFL thickness (AUROC, RNFL; 0.825); however, there was no statistical significance (p=0.442).The ability to diagnose glaucoma with macular GCC thickness was comparable with that with peripapillary RNFL thickness in high-myopia patients. Macular GCC thickness measurements may be a good alternative or a complementary measurement to RNFL thickness assessment in the clinical evaluation of glaucoma in patients with high myopia.Comparison of different spectral domain optical coherence tomography scanning areas for glaucoma diagnosis.To evaluate retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), optic nerve head (ONH), and macular thickness measurements for glaucoma detection using the RTVue spectral domain optical coherence tomograph.Diagnostic, case-control study.One hundred forty eyes of 106 glaucoma patients and 74 eyes of 40 healthy subjects from the Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study (DIGS).All patients underwent ocular imaging with the commercially available RTVue. Optic nerve head, RNFL thickness, and macular thickness scans were obtained during the same visit. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves and sensitivities at fixed specificities (80% and 95%) were calculated for each parameter.Areas under the ROC curves (AUC) and sensitivities at fixed specificities of 80% and 95%.The AUC for the RNFL parameter with best performance, inferior quadrant thickness, was significantly higher than that of the best-performing ONH parameter, inferior rim area (0.884 vs 0.812, respectively; P = 0.04). There was no difference between ROC curve areas of the best RNFL thickness parameters and the best inner macular thickness measurement, ganglion cell complex root mean square (ROC curve area = 0.870).The RTVue RNFL and inner retinal macular thickness measurements had good ability to detect eyes with glaucomatous visual field loss and performed significantly better than ONH parameters.Cirrus high-definition optical coherence tomography versus spectral optical coherence tomography/scanning laser ophthalmoscopy in the diagnosis of glaucoma.This study was performed to compare the positive predictive value of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements obtained using Cirrus high-definition optical coherence tomography (Cirrus HD-OCT; Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA) and spectral OCT/scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (SLO) (OPKO/OTI, Miami, FL) in the diagnosis of glaucoma.A total of 50 eyes of 50 healthy subjects and 60 eyes of 60 subjects with glaucoma were included. All participants underwent RNFL thickness measurement using Cirrus HD-OCT and spectral OCT/SLO on the same day. Average, quadrant, clock-hour RNFL thicknesses, area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUC), and sensitivities at fixed specificities (80% and 95%) were calculated for comparison.RNFL thickness as measured by spectral OCT/SLO was greater than that measured using Cirrus HD-OCT (p < 0.001). For both the Cirrus HD-OCT and spectral OCT/SLO, the parameter with the largest AUC was average RNFL thickness (0.954 and 0.944, respectively). The AUCs of RNFL thickness for the discrimination of glaucoma did not differ significantly between the devices (p > 0.05), with the exception of RNFL thickness in the nasal area (nasal quadrant, clock-hour sectors 3 and 4); in these areas, spectral OCL/SLO yielded greater AUCs than Cirrus HD-OCT (p < 0.05). Sensitivities varied similarly to AUCs.RNFL thicknesses measures using Cirrus HD-OCT and spectral OCT/SLO were not interchangeable. The utility of RNFL thickness measurements in the diagnosis of glaucoma was similar for both the devices.Oculus-Spark perimetry compared with 3 procedures of glaucoma morphologic analysis (GDx, HRT, and OCT).To compare diagnostic capabilities and agreement between Oculus-Spark perimetry and 3 procedures of glaucoma morphologic analysis.A total of 102 normal eyes and 104 consecutive eyes with suspected or confirmed glaucoma (1 eye per subject) were analyzed in a prospective observational case-control study, using Spark strategy (Oculus Easyfield Perimeter), Heidelberg retinal tomograph (HRT), Zeiss laser polarimetry (GDx), and Cirrus optical coherence tomography (OCT).Spark first phase lasted 37 seconds and all 4 phases 2:34 minutes. Specificities and sensitivities were as follows: Spark mean deviation (MD) first phase (95.1%, 85.6%), MD second and final phases (95.1%, 86.5%), GDx-nerve fiber indicator (95.1%, 57.4%), HRT-Reinhard Burk discriminant function (95.1%, 52.9%), HRT glaucoma probability score (95.1%, 71.2%), Cirrus OCT vertical cup/disc ratio (96.1%, 85.6%), and Cirrus OCT retinal nerve fiber layer thickness (95.1%, 68.0%). Diagnostic agreement between second and final Spark MD phases was kappa=0.92; between phase 1 Spark/MD and Cirrus OCT/vertical C/D ratio was kappa=0.78. Agreements between the 2 Cirrus OCT indices was kappa=0.69 and between the 2 HRT indices was kappa=0.559. The correlation coefficient between second and final MD and PSD was 0.99, and 0.98 between the number of scotomatous points. There was high concordance in scotoma position in both phases (kappa=0.86). The linear correlation coefficients between the morphologic indices were 0.48-0.78, and between morphologic and functional indices 0.51-0.76. Correlation coefficients comparing morphologic and functional indices were similar in the first and the last phase (p>0.05 in all cases).Spark perimetry appears to show useful sensitivity and specificity, even in the first phase, and good agreement with the morphology.Comparison between deviation map algorithm and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer measurements using Cirrus HD-OCT in the detection of localized glaucomatous visual field defects.To compare the capability of the deviation map algorithm and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (pRNFL) thickness measurements, both determined using Cirrus spectral domain optical coherence tomography (Carl Zeiss Meditec Inc., Dublin, CA), in discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes.This cross-sectional comparative prospective study included 54 patients with glaucoma with localized visual field (VF) defects confined to 1 hemifield and 54 normal controls. Mean pRNFL thickness corresponding to localized VF defect was calculated. A deviation Score (DS) was assigned by customized Image J software (Http://www.rsb.info.hih.gov/ij/18) calculating the number of abnormal superpixels in the deviation maps corresponding to localized VF defect. Correlations between DS and mean pRNFL thickness, and VF parameters were obtained. The areas under receiver operating characteristic curves of the DS and mean pRNFL thickness used for discriminating between controls and glaucomatous eyes were compared.DS and the average pRNFL thickness measurements showed a strong correlation (R, -0.844, P<0.0001). There were also significant correlations between DS, mean deviation (MD), and pattern standard deviation (R, -0.678, 0.699, respectively). The areas under receiver operating characteristic curves of the mean pRNFL thickness (0.892) and DS (0.958) differed significantly (P=0.0051). The sensitivities at 80%, 90%, and 95% specificities were 94.4%, 90.6%, and 88.6%, respectively, for DS and 74.5%, 58.8%, and 47.3%, for mean pRNFL thickness.The deviation map algorithm showed a superior capability for detection of localized glaucomatous VF defects when compared with traditional pRNFL thickness measurements. There were statistically significant correlations between the deviation map algorithm and VF indices.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy of the RTVue Fourier-domain OCT and the GDx-VCC/ECC polarimeter to detect glaucoma.To compare sensitivity and specificity of retinal nerve fiber layer thickness (RNFLT) measurements made using RTVue-100 Fourier-domain optical coherence tomography (RTVue-OCT) and scanning laser polarimetry with variable (GDx-VCC) or enhanced compensation (GDx-ECC).One eye of each of 177 consecutive patients was imaged. Healthy (n=50) and ocular hypertensive (n = 28) eyes were defined as structurally undamaged, preperimetric (n=33) and perimetric (n=66) glaucoma eyes as diseased.For average RNFLT, sensitivity was higher (χ(2) test, p=0.002) with RTVue-OCT (65.7%) than with GDx-VCC (49.5%). For superior and inferior RNFLT, sensitivity was similar with all methods. For the different nerve fiber bundle parameters, sensitivity of RTVue-OCT (64.6% to 84.8%) was consistently up to 35% higher (p<0.001) than that of GDx-VCC/ECC (28.3% to 72.7%). Specificity ranged from 84.6% to 98.7% with RTVue-OCT, 92.3% to 100% with GDx-VCC, and 94.9% to 100% with GDx-ECC, with no significant difference between the methods except for one nerve fiber bundle parameter, for which RTVue-OCT was less specific than either GDx method (p ≤ 0.004). Diagnostic accuracy of the GDx-VCC/ECC nerve fiber indicator (NFI) and RTVue-OCT average RNFLT were similar. Of the detected glaucoma cases, 87.7% were identified both by GDx-VCC/ECC NFI and average RNFLT of RTVue-OCT.In this clinical setting, all methods were similarly highly specific, but for localized RNFLT damage RTVue-OCT was statistically and clinically significantly more sensitive than GDx-VCC and GDx-ECC. Most detected glaucoma cases were identified with all 3 methods.Diagnostic capability of Fourier-Domain optical coherence tomography in early primary open angle glaucoma.Optical coherence tomography (OCT) is a high resolution noncontact imaging modality which can quantitatively detect the optic disc and retinal structure. This study was designed to evaluate the diagnostic capability of parameters of the optic disc, retinal nerve fiber layer thickness, and ganglion cell complex (GCC) using a new technology called Fourier-domain OCT (FD-OCT) for early primary open angle glaucoma (POAG) patients.Two groups of patients, early perimetric damage POAG and normal subjects were included in this observational cross-sectional study. All patients underwent FD-OCT and visual field examination in addition to full ophthalmic examinations. Receiver operating characteristic curves (ROC) were studied for all parameters. The sensitivity and specificity for distinguishing between normal and early glaucomatous eyes, the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AROC) and positive, negative likelihood ratios were evaluated for all the single parameters and selected combined parameters using arbitrary cutoffs.Thirty-four eyes of 34 early POAG patients and 42 eyes of 42 normal subjects were analyzed. Cup/disc (C/D) vertical ratio presented the best sensitivity and positive likelihood ratio for selected specificities (95% and 85%) which were 79.4% and 88.2%, 33.4 and 7.4, respectively. Among all single parameters, the C/D vertical ratio demonstrated the highest AROC which was at 0.930. The average thickness of circumpapillary RNFL on 3.45 mm showed the highest AROC among all of the peripapillary RNFL parameters. The sensitivity at selected specificity and AROC of GCC were not as high as C/D vertical ratio and RNFL AT on 3.45 mm. When the C/D vertical ratio, RNFL AT on 3.45 mm, and rim area were combined using a logistical diagnostic model, the AROC was raised to 0.949 but not significantly different from the top single parameter, C/D vertical ratio.The key parameters obtained by FD-OCT were able to show the significant differences of optic discs, thickness of RNFL and GCC between POAG patients and normal subjects. According to sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratio and AROC, the top three parameters from FD-OCT for early diagnosis of POAG were C/D vertical ratio, RNFL AT on 3.45 mm, and the rim area.Effect of optic disc size and disease severity on the diagnostic capability of glaucoma imaging technologies in an Indian population.To evaluate the influence of optic disc size and disease severity on the diagnostic validity of optical coherence tomography (Stratus OCT), scanning laser polarimetry [GDx variable corneal compensator (VCC)], and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy [Heidelberg retina tomograph II (HRT II)] in Indian eyes with glaucoma.Ninety-five normal and 125 glaucoma patients underwent imaging with Stratus OCT, GDx VCC, and HRT II. One eye of each person was randomly selected for analysis. Using disc area determined on HRT II, discs were classified as small (<2 mm), moderate (2 to 3 mm), and large (>3 mm). The parameter with the best sensitivity for each device, at a fixed specificity, was compared for different disc sizes. Logistic marginal regression was used to study the effect of disc size and disease severity (mean deviation on standard automated perimetry) on the diagnostic performance of these imaging devices.At a fixed specificity of 84.2%, the sensitivity of HRT II was significantly different for varying disc sizes (P=0.0004). The sensitivities for dissimilar disc sizes were not significantly different for the GDx VCC (P=0.928) or Stratus OCT (P=0.381). Logistic marginal regression also showed that sensitivity of HRT II increased with increasing disc size, whereas sensitivity of OCT and GDx were independent of the disc size. The sensitivity of all 3 technologies increased with increasing disease severity (decreasing mean deviation).Optic disc size affects the diagnostic capability of HRT II but not that of GDx VCC or Stratus OCT. The sensitivity of all 3 imaging technologies increased with increasing disease severity.Diagnostic ability of Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 classifications: glaucoma probability score versus Moorfields regression analysis.To evaluate the usefulness of the glaucoma probability score (GPS), which does not require manual outlining of the disc boundaries, and the Moorfields regression classification (MRA), which requires manual outlining of the disc boundaries, for discriminating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes, using the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph.Cross-sectional study.We prospectively selected 71 consecutive healthy subjects and 115 consecutive patients with open-angle glaucoma.Participants were divided into 2 groups depending on the results of standard automated perimetry and intraocular pressure. All participants underwent imaging of the optic nerve head with the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3. All tests were performed within 1 month of each subject's date of enrollment into the study by examiners masked to the other findings.The sensitivity and specificity of all parameters of the MRA and GPS classifications were calculated. The diagnostic accuracy at different severities of glaucoma and optic disc sizes was also evaluated. Receiver operating characteristic curves were plotted for the GPS values.The MRA global classification had a sensitivity of 73.9% and a specificity of 91.5%. The GPS global classification had a sensitivity of 58.2% and a specificity of 94.4%. The GPS had slightly higher sensitivity and somewhat lower specificity than the MRA when there was mild damage indicated by visual field tests. The MRA had the best discrimination capability for moderate and severe glaucoma. Both the GPS and MRA had lower sensitivity and higher specificity for small optic discs (<1.7 mm2) compared with medium and large discs.In general, the diagnostic performance of the GPS was similar to that of the MRA. The diagnostic accuracy of both classifications depends on the optic disc size and the glaucoma severity.Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography for early glaucoma assessment: analysis of macular ganglion cell complex versus peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer.We sought to compare the glaucoma discrimination ability of macular inner retinal layer (MIRL) thickness with that of conventional peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (pRNFL) thickness as measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) in patients with early glaucoma.Cross-sectional study.We studied 67 patients with early glaucoma (visual field mean deviation index ≥-6 dB), and 56 healthy subjects were prospectively enrolled.All patients underwent MIRL thickness measurement (ganglion cell complex [GCC] scan) and pRNFL thickness measurement (3.45 mm scan) by SD-OCT. Whenever both eyes were eligible, one was randomly selected. Receiver operating characteristic curves and sensitivities at fixed specificities were generated for different parameters. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) of each parameter were compared.The average mean deviation for the glaucomatous eyes was -2.5 ± 1.6 dB. The AUCs for average (0.815); superior (0.807); and inferior (0.788) MIRL thicknesses were not significantly different (p ≥ 0.18). The AUCs for average (0.735); superior (0.728); and inferior (0.697) pRNFL thicknesses were also similar (p ≥ 0.15). Average MIRL thickness had a significantly larger AUC compared to average pRNFL thickness analysis (0.815 vs 0.735; p = 0.03). Sensitivities at 80% specificity for average MIRL and pRNFL thicknesses were 66.7% (cutoff, 89.9 μm) and 62.9% (cutoff, 111.8 μm), respectively.The GCC scan showed a similar or even a slightly better ability to discriminate between healthy and early glaucomatous eyes compared to the pRNFL scan. Different from previous analyses considering total macular thickness, the GCC macular scan seems to be a useful tool for identification of early structural damage in patients with glaucoma.Linear discriminant analysis and artificial neural network for glaucoma diagnosis using scanning laser polarimetry-variable cornea compensation measurements in Taiwan Chinese population.To determine whether linear discriminant analysis (LDA) and artificial neural network (ANN) can improve the differentiation between glaucomatous and normal eyes in a Taiwan Chinese population, based on the retinal nerve fiber layer thickness measurement data from scanning laser polarimetry-variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC).This study comprised 79 glaucoma (visual field defect, mean deviation: -5.60 +/- 4.23 dB) and 86 healthy subjects (visual field defect, mean deviation: -1.44 +/- 1.72 dB). Each patient received complete ophthalmological evaluation, standard automated perimetry (SAP), and GDx VCC exam. One eye per subject was considered for further analysis. The area under the receiver operating characteristics (AROC) curve, sensitivity, specificity and the best cut-off value for each parameter were calculated. The diagnostic performance of artificial neural network (ANN) and linear discriminant analysis (LDA) for glaucoma detection using GDx VCC measurements will be compared in this study.The individual parameter with the best AROC curve for differentiating between normal and glaucomatous eye was nerve fiber indicator (NFI, 0.932). The highest AROCs for the LDA and ANN methods were 0.950 and 0.970 respectively.NFI, ANN and LDF method demonstrated equal diagnostic power in glaucoma detection in a Taiwan Chinese population.Scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation and detection of glaucomatous optic neuropathy.The aim of this study was to evaluate the ability of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) parameters provided by commercially available GDx with variable corneal compensator (VCC) to discriminate between healthy and glaucomatous eyes.Sixty-five healthy and 59 glaucomatous age-matched patients underwent a complete ophthalmological evaluation, an achromatic automated perimetry (AAP), and SLP with GDx-VCC. One randomly selected eye from each subject was considered. All glaucomatous eyes had reproducible visual field defects. Mean values (+/- SD) of all SLP-VCC parameters measured in the two groups were compared. Area under receiver operating characteristics (AUROC) curve and sensitivities at predetermined specificities of >or=80% and >or=95% for each single parameter were calculated. Moreover, the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) diagnostic accuracy was evaluated calculating positive, negative, and interval likelihood ratios (LRs) at different cutoff values.All SLP parameters were significantly different between the two groups (p<0.001). The NFI showed the best AUROC curve (0.938, SE 0.02) whereas temporal, superior, nasal, inferior, temporal (TSNIT) average was second best (0.897, SE 0.03), and normalized superior area was third (0.879, SE 0.04). At fixed specificity >or=95%, sensitivities ranged from 22% to 79.7% whereas for values >or=80%, sensitivities were in the 44.1-89.8% range. At a cutoff NFI value of 30, positive LR was 17.6 (95% CI: 5.8-53.6) and negative LR was 0.19 (95% CI: 0.11-0.33). Interval LRs for NFI showed that values <or=20 or >40 were associated with large effects on posttest probability.SLP-VCC allows good discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes. New software-provided parameters NFI, TSNIT average, and normalized superior and inferior areas appear to be reliable in the evaluation of glaucomatous disease. In particular, after evaluation on interval LRs, the NFI showed a high diagnostic accuracy for values <or=20 or >40.The applicability of ganglion cell complex parameters determined from SD-OCT images to detect glaucomatous eyes.To determine whether the thicknesses of the different parameters of the ganglion cell complex (GCC) and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer can be used to differentiate eyes with glaucoma from normal eyes.Two hundred sixty-one eyes, including 68 normal eyes and 32 preperimetric glaucoma, 81 early glaucoma, and 80 advanced glaucoma were analyzed in the present study. The thicknesses of the GCC and retinal nerve fiber layer were measured using RTVue spectral-domain optical coherence tomographic (SD-OCT) images. The area under the receiver operating characteristic (AUROC) curve and sensitivities at fixed specificities were calculated for each parameter. A logistic regression analysis was used to determine the risk factors for glaucoma.The 2 largest AUROC curves for all glaucoma stages were those for the GCC parameters. The global loss volume (GLV) was always one of the 2 highest values of the AUROC curve. The GLV also had the highest sensitivity at a fixed specificity to identify glaucoma at early and advanced stage. The focal loss volume (FLV) had the largest AUROC curve value and the highest sensitivity at a fixed specificity for advanced glaucoma. The logistic regression analysis showed that the GLV was one of the factors that predicted preperimetric glaucoma [odds ratio (OR)=1.74] and early glaucoma (OR=1.22), whereas the FLV was useful for detecting advanced glaucoma (OR=2.32).The SD-OCT-derived macular GCC parameters can be used to detect preperimetric and perimetric glaucoma. The new GCC parameters, GLV and FLV, performed well in discriminating glaucomatous eyes from normal eyes.Asymmetry analysis of macular inner retinal layers for glaucoma diagnosis.To determine if asymmetry in thickness of the retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), ganglion cell layer, ganglion cell complex, and total retina between upper and lower macula halves can predict glaucoma.Retrospective case-control series.One hundred twenty-two eyes of 122 patients (30 normal eyes and 30 preperimetric, 31 early, and 31 advanced glaucoma eyes) were studied. The RNFL, ganglion cell layer, ganglion cell complex, and total retina were segmented and measured on 10 vertical B-scans over a 30 × 15 degree macular area. The equation asymmetry index =|log10 (lower hemiretinal thickness/upper hemiretinal thickness)| was used to calculate asymmetry indices for 8 pairs of upper and lower 0.5-mm segments equidistant from the fovea on each scan. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROCs) for mean thickness and mean asymmetry index of 10 B-scans were compared.The overlap in values for normal and glaucomatous eyes was minimal for the ganglion cell layer asymmetry index. Thickness parameters decreased with the severity of glaucoma, whereas asymmetry indices did not. AROCs for thickness measurements tended to increase with increasing glaucoma severity (preperimetric, 0.746-0.808; early, 0.842-0.940; advanced, 0.943-0.995), whereas AROCs for asymmetry indices did not have distinct ranges according to glaucoma severity (advanced, 0.819-0.996; early, 0.861-0.998; preperimetric, 0.773-0.994). The AROC for the ganglion cell layer asymmetry index remained almost perfect regardless of glaucoma severity (0.994-0.998).Macular retinal layer thickness asymmetry indices, particularly for the ganglion cell layer, show promise as early indicators of glaucomatous retinal damage.Scanning laser polarimetry using variable corneal compensation in the detection of glaucoma with localized visual field defects.To evaluate the ability of scanning laser polarimetry parameters and a novel deviation map algorithm to discriminate between healthy and early glaucomatous eyes with localized visual field (VF) defects confined to one hemifield.Prospective case-control study.Seventy glaucomatous eyes with localized VF defects and 66 normal controls.A Humphrey field analyzer 24-2 full-threshold test and scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation were used.We assessed the sensitivity and specificity of scanning laser polarimetry parameters, sensitivity and cutoff values for scanning laser polarimetry deviation map algorithms at different specificity values (80%, 90%, and 95%) in the detection of glaucoma, and correlations between the algorithms of scanning laser polarimetry and of the pattern deviation derived from Humphrey field analyzer testing.There were significant differences between the glaucoma group and normal subjects in the mean parametric values of the temporal, superior, nasal, inferior, temporal (TSNIT) average, superior average, inferior average, and TSNIT standard deviation (SD) (P<0.05). The sensitivity and specificity of each scanning laser polarimetry variable was as follows: TSNIT, 44.3% (95% confidence interval [CI], 39.8%-49.8%) and 100% (95.4%-100%); superior average, 30% (25.5%-34.5%) and 97% (93.5%-100%); inferior average, 45.7% (42.2%-49.2%) and 100% (95.8%-100%); and TSNIT SD, 30% (25.9%-34.1%) and 97% (93.2%-100%), respectively (when abnormal was defined as P<0.05). Based on nerve fiber indicator cutoff values of > or =30 and > or =51 to indicate glaucoma, sensitivities were 54.3% (50.1%-58.5%) and 10% (6.4%-13.6%), and specificities were 97% (93.2%-100%) and 100% (95.8%-100%), respectively. The range of areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves using the scanning laser polarimetry deviation map algorithm was 0.790 to 0.879. Overall sensitivities combining each probability scale and severity score at 80%, 90%, and 95% specificities were 90.0% (95% CI, 86.4%-93.6%), 71.4% (67.4%-75.4%), and 60.0% (56.2%-63.8%), respectively. There was a statistically significant correlation between the scanning laser polarimetry severity score and the VF severity score (R2 = 0.360, P<0.001).Scanning laser polarimetry parameters may not be sufficiently sensitive to detect glaucomatous patients with localized VF damage. Our algorithm using the scanning laser polarimetry deviation map may enhance the understanding of scanning laser polarimetry printouts in terms of the locality, deviation size, and severity of localized retinal nerve fiber layer defects in eyes with localized VF loss.Diagnostic value of GDx polarimetry in a Taiwan Chinese population.To study the diagnostic ability of scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC) for early glaucomatous (EG) eyes and glaucoma-suspect (GS) eyes in a Taiwan Chinese population.This prospective cross-sectional study included 82 EG eyes (mean deviation, MD: -3.32 +/- 2.20 dB), 45 GS eyes (MD: -2.43 +/- 2.16 dB), and 62 normal eyes. Retinal nerve fiber layer thickness of each subject was measured using GDx VCC and Humphrey Field Analyzer visual field testing. Measured GDx VCC parameters were compared among groups. The area under the receiver operating characteristic (AROC) curve of each parameter was used to differentiate normal from EG eyes or GS eyes. The correlation between MD and each parameter was also evaluated.For both normal versus EG and normal versus GS, the largest AROC values were for nerve fiber indicator, superior average thickness, and inferior average thickness. There was no significant correlation between MD and GDx-VCC-measured parameters either in EG or GS eyes.GDx VCC shows only moderate ability to distinguish normal eyes from eyes with early glaucoma. However, its diagnostic role in eyes with suspicious discs and normal visual fields is uncertain at this moment in the Taiwan Chinese population. Further studies are needed to address this issue.Diagnostic accuracy of Heidelberg Retina Tomograph III classifications in a Turkish primary open-angle glaucoma population.This study aimed to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) and the glaucoma probability score (GPS) in primary open-angle glaucoma (POAG) and to measure the level of agreement between the two algorithms in classifying eyes as normal or abnormal in a Turkish population.We prospectively selected 184 healthy subjects and 158 subjects with POAG, who underwent an ophthalmological examination, visual field analysis and imaging with the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph II, using HRT III software, Version 3.0. The diagnostic accuracies of the two classifications were measured when the borderline was taken as either normal (highest specificity criteria) or abnormal (highest sensitivity criteria). The agreement between them was calculated using the unweighted kappa (kappa) coefficient.Optic nerve head topographic parameters showed statistically significant differences between the control and POAG groups (p < 0.001). The parameters with the highest area under the receiver operating characteristic curves were global GPS (0.86), cup : disc area (0.85), rim : disc area (0.85) and vertical cup : disc (0.85). According to the highest specificity criteria, MRA had a sensitivity of 67.7% and a specificity of 95.1%, whereas the GPS had a sensitivity of 70.9% and a specificity of 88.0%. According to the highest sensitivity criteria, MRA had a sensitivity of 81.0% and a specificity of 75.0%, whereas the GPS had a sensitivity of 89.2% and a specificity of 57.6%. A moderate agreement of 68% (233 eyes) with a kappa coefficient of 0.51 was found between MRA and the GPS.The GPS automated classification showed similar sensitivity to MRA, but considerably lower specificity, when applied in a Turkish population.Macular ganglion cell imaging study: glaucoma diagnostic accuracy of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography.We evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) measurements using a high-definition optical coherence tomography (Cirrus HD-OCT) ganglion cell analysis algorithm for detecting early and moderate-to-severe glaucoma.Totals of 119 normal subjects and 306 glaucoma patients (164 patients with early glaucoma and 142 with moderate-to-severe glaucoma) were enrolled from the Macular Ganglion Cell Imaging Study. Macular GCIPL, peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness, and optic nerve head (ONH) parameters were measured in each subject. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) were calculated and compared. Based on the internal normative database, the sensitivity and specificity for detecting early and moderate-to-severe glaucoma were calculated.There was no statistically significant difference between the AUROCs for the best OCT parameters. For detecting early glaucoma, the sensitivity of the Cirrus GCIPL parameters ranged from 26.8% to 73.2% and that of the Cirrus RNFL parameters ranged from 6.1% to 61.6%. For the early glaucoma group, the best parameter from the GCIPL generally had a higher sensitivity than those of the RNFL and ONH parameters with comparable specificity (P < 0.05, McNemar's test).There were no significant differences between the AUROCs for Cirrus GCIPL, RNFL, and ONH parameters, indicating that these maps have similar diagnostic potentials for glaucoma. The minimum GCIPL showed better glaucoma diagnostic performance than the other parameters at comparable specificities. However, other GCIPL parameters showed performances comparable to those of the RNFL parameters.[Diagnostic usefulness of optical coherence tomography (OCT), scanning laser tomography (HRT-II) and laser polarimetry (GDx) in open-angle glaucoma].To evaluate the diagnostic ability of three digital imaging technologies (HRT-II, OCT and GDx VCC) in detecting glaucomatous damage.A total of 427 eyes from 427 subjects were included in this cross-sectional study. Each subject was classified as healthy, ocular hypertensive or glaucomatous, according to intraocular pressure levels, standard automated perimetry and optic disc morphology. All of them underwent examination by means of HRT, OCT and GDx VCC. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were plotted and sensitivities at fixed specificities (85% and 95%) were calculated for each parameter assessed.The parameters with the higher diagnostic ability were: FSM discriminant function from HRT-II (AUC=0.899), retinal nerve fiber layer average thickness from OCT (AUC=0.929) and NFI from GDx VCC (AUC=0.879), with no statistically significant differences between them.The HRT-II, OCT and GDx VCC provide measurements of the retinal nerve fiber layer and the optic nerve head with high discriminating ability in open-angle glaucoma.Retinal nerve fiber layer evaluation of spectral domain optical coherence tomograph and scanning laser polarimeter to diagnose glaucoma.To compare the abilities of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters of spectral domain optical coherence tomograph (SDOCT) and scanning laser polarimeter (GDx enhanced corneal compensation; ECC) in detecting glaucoma.In a cross-sectional study, 215 eyes of 165 subjects (106 eyes of 79 glaucoma patients and 109 eyes of 86 controls) referred by general ophthalmologists for glaucoma evaluation underwent RNFL imaging with SDOCT and GDx ECC. Ability of RNFL parameters of SDOCT to discriminate glaucoma eyes from control eyes was compared with that of GDx ECC using area under operating characteristic curves (AUCs), sensitivities at fixed specificities, and likelihood ratios (LRs).AUC of the average RNFL thickness of SDOCT to differentiate glaucoma from control eyes (0.868) was comparable (P=0.32) to that of GDx ECC (0.855). Sensitivity at 95% specificity was 63.2% for average RNFL thickness of SDOCT and 48.1% for the average RNFL measurement of GDx ECC. LRs of outside normal limits category of SDOCT parameters ranged between 5.6 and 7.7 while the same of GDx ECC parameters ranged between 3.1 and 3.7. LRs of within normal limits category of SDOCT parameters ranged between 0.18 and 0.24 while the same of GDx ECC parameters ranged between 0.20 and 0.32.Though AUCs and sensitivities at fixed specificities were comparable between the RNFL parameters of SDOCT and GDx ECC in diagnosing glaucoma, LRs indicated that the RNFL parameters of SDOCT were better in 'ruling in' glaucoma.Discriminating between normal and glaucoma-damaged eyes with the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3.To determine and validate the diagnostic ability of a linear discriminant function (LDF) based on global stereometric parameters obtained using the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph version 3 (HRT3) for discriminating between healthy eyes and eyes with glaucomatous visual field loss.Cross-sectional study.The authors prospectively selected 81 consecutive healthy subjects and 85 consecutive patients with open-angle glaucoma. Another prospective sample of 225 normal eyes and 210 glaucoma eyes was used to evaluate how well the LDF performed in another population.Participants were divided into 2 groups depending on the results of standard automated perimetry and intraocular pressure. All participants underwent imaging of the optic nerve head with the HRT3.The LDF was calculated according to the stepwise logistic regression results of global optic nerve head parameters and glaucoma probability score numerical values. The diagnostic accuracy of the LDF and other parameters included in the software of the HRT3 was evaluated in another independent population.Based on the results of the stepwise binary logistic regression analysis, the function proposed was LDF = 8.23 - 8.00 x contour line modulation temporal superior + 9.41 x cup shape measure - 4.07 x rim area. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve were 0.875 for the LDF, 0.845 for the Frederick S. Mikelberg (FSM) discriminant function, and 0.838 for the Reinhard O. W. Burk (RB) discriminant function. There were no significant differences between these values. The LDF and the FSM and RB discriminant functions yielded sensitivities of 74.2%, 70.4%, and 67.6%, respectively, at a fixed specificity of 85%.Compared with the HRT-provided parameters, the proposed LDF exhibited higher diagnostic ability than most available analyses. The LDF had a better sensitivity and specificity balance than the FSM and RB discriminant functions, regardless of optic disc size.Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography and scanning laser polarimetry in glaucoma diagnosis.To evaluate glaucoma diagnostic capability of the retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) imaging by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Cirrus OCT) and scanning laser polarimetry (GDx VCC).We imaged 88 glaucomatous and 77 healthy eyes using both devices. Areas under the receiver-operating characteristic curves (area under the curves, AUCs) and sensitivities at fixed specificities of average, superior, and inferior RNFL thickness were compared. Likelihood ratios (LRs) and diagnostic agreement based on normative classifications yielded by both devices were determined.The best performing parameter was the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) in GDx VCC and inferior RNFL thickness in Cirrus OCT (AUC = 0.912, 0.961, P = 0.045). The AUCs of the Cirrus OCT were significantly higher than those of GDx VCC in all parameters. Most of the parameters in Cirrus OCT were more sensitive than GDx VCC in the detection of glaucoma at fixed specificity values. Cirrus OCT had an infinite LR with abnormal classification results in both average and superior RNFL thickness. There was good agreement between the two instruments with respect to abnormal classifications (kappa, 0.611-0.766)Both Cirrus OCT and GDx VCC RNFL measurements showed good glaucoma diagnostic capabilities. Cirrus OCT showed higher sensitivities than GDx VCC.Comparison of glaucoma diagnoses using Stratus and Cirrus optical coherence tomography in different glaucoma types in a Chinese population.To compare the glaucoma diagnostic power of Stratus and Cirrus optical coherence tomographies (OCTs) in a Taiwan Chinese population with different glaucoma types.One eye each was chosen from 21 ocular hypertension (OH) patients, 27 glaucoma-suspect (GS) patients, 35 primary open-angle glaucoma (POAG) patients, 26 primary angle-closure glaucoma (PACG) patients, and 52 normal subjects. Early glaucoma (EG) was identified among glaucomatous eyes on the basis of the visual field severity (better than -9 dB). All participants were imaged using 2 OCT units at the same visit. The area under the receiver operator characteristic (AROC) curve was used to differentiate normal eyes from OH, GS, POAG, PACG, and EG eyes, and the sensitivity and specificity of each parameter from internal normative classifications were analyzed.For normal versus OH eyes, the best AROC value was the average thickness (Stratus, 0.693; Cirrus, 0.697). For normal versus GS eyes, the best AROC value was the average thickness (Stratus, 0.807; Cirrus, 0.776). For normal versus POAG eyes, the best AROC value was the average thickness (Stratus, 0.943; Cirrus, 0.930). For normal versus PACG eyes, the best AROC value was the 5-o'clock hour (Stratus, 0.830; Cirrus, 0.817). For normal versus EG eyes, the best AROC value was the average thickness with Stratus (0.868) and the 5-o'clock hour with Cirrus (0.876). All sensitivities in the 5 groups were fair on the basis of the internal normal classification database of both OCTs.Cirrus and Stratus OCTs showed equal diagnostic power in EG, OH, GS, POAG, and PACG eyes in a Taiwan Chinese population. The utility of the current internal databases of both OCT units for the Chinese population is an interesting issue that needs to be addressed in the future.Relationship between ganglion cell layer thickness and estimated retinal ganglion cell counts in the glaucomatous macula.To investigate the relationship between macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (mGCIPL) thickness and estimated macular retinal ganglion cell (RGC) counts in glaucoma.Observational cohort study.Cross-sectional study of 77 healthy, 154 glaucoma suspect, and 159 glaucomatous eyes from the Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study.All eyes underwent 24-2 standard automated perimetry (SAP) and optic nerve and macular imaging using high-definition optical coherence tomography (OCT). The total number of RGCs was estimated using a previously described model that uses SAP and OCT circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (cpRNFL) measurements. The number of macular RGCs was estimated from the temporal cpRNFL and SAP test points within the central 10°.The correlation between mGCIPL thickness and estimates of macular RGC counts.The average estimated macular RGC count in glaucomatous eyes was 306 010 ± 109 449 cells, which was significantly lower than the estimate of 520 678 ± 106 843 cells in healthy eyes (P < 0.001). Glaucomatous eyes had 41% fewer estimated macular RGCs than healthy eyes and suspects had 21% fewer estimated macular RGCs. There was strong correlation between estimated macular RGC counts and mGCIPL thickness (R(2) = 0.67; P < 0.001). Macular RGC counts performed better than average mGCIPL thickness in discriminating healthy and glaucomatous eyes with receiver operating characteristic curve areas of 0.873 and 0.775, respectively (P = 0.015).The strong association between estimated macular RGC counts and mGCIPL thickness and the better diagnostic performance of the macular RGC counts compared with mGCIPL thickness provides further evidence that estimates of RGC number from cpRNFL thickness and SAP sensitivity can be used to assess neural losses in glaucoma.Macular ganglion cell/inner plexiform layer measurements by spectral domain optical coherence tomography for detection of early glaucoma and comparison to retinal nerve fiber layer measurements.To evaluate the performance of ganglion cell layer/inner plexiform layer (GCL/IPL) measurements with spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Cirrus HD-OCT) for detection of early glaucoma and to compare results to retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) measurements.Cross-sectional prospective diagnostic study.We enrolled 99 subjects, including 59 eyes with glaucoma (47 subjects) (mean deviation >-6.0 dB) and 91 normal eyes (52 subjects). Patients underwent biometry and peripapillary and macular OCT imaging. Performance of the GCL/IPL and RNFL algorithms was evaluated with area under receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC), likelihood ratios, and sensitivities/specificities adjusting for covariates. Combination of best parameters was explored.Average (SD) mean deviation in the glaucoma group was -2.5 (1.9) dB. On multivariate analyses, age (P < 0.001) and axial length (P = 0.03) predicted GC/IPL measurements in normal subjects. No significant correlation was found between average or regional GC/IPL thickness and respective outer retina (OR) thickness measurements (P > 0.05). Average RNFL thickness performed better than average GCL/IPL measurements for detection of glaucoma (AUC = 0.964 vs 0.937; P = 0.04). The best regional measures from each algorithm (inferior quadrant RNFL vs minimum GCL/IPL) had comparable performances (P = 0.78). Entering the GC/IPL to OR ratio into prediction models did not enhance the performance of the GCL/IPL measures. Combining the best parameters from each algorithm improved detection of glaucoma (P = 0.04).Regional GCL/IPL measures derived from Cirrus HD-OCT performed as well as regional RNFL outcomes for detection of early glaucoma. Using the GC/IPL to OR ratio did not enhance the performance of GCL/IPL parameters. Combining the best measures from the 2 algorithms improved detection of glaucoma.Improvement of diagnostic performance regarding retinal nerve fiber layer defect using shifting of the normative database according to vessel position.To evaluate the clinical efficacy of early detection of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defect in a Korean population using shifting of the normative RNFL thickness database according to vessel position.Retinal nerve fiber layer thickness data of 151 healthy eyes (normative group) and 120 validation subjects (validation group; additional healthy controls plus early glaucoma) were prospectively obtained using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) measurement. Clinical profiles and position of major retinal artery peaks (superotemporal, STa; inferotemporal, ITa) were investigated with position of RNFL peaks. Three different criteria for the lower 1% limit were adopted for the validation. Criterion 1 used normative data from the manufacturer. Criterion 2 used data from healthy volunteers. Criterion 3 used four combinations of two subgroups from data for volunteers, which were divided by the median value of STa in the superior region and that of ITa in the inferior region. The κ value was used to determine the diagnostic performance of each criterion (agreement with standard answer).Assessment of the validation group using criterion 3 showed greater accuracy than with criterion 1 or criterion 2 (κ = 0.571, 0.774, and 0.979). Although SD-OCT specificity for RNFL defect detection was similar among the criteria (100%, 98.8%, and 98.9%), sensitivity was highest with criterion 3 (42.4%, 72.7%, and 100%) (all values; criteria 1, 2, and 3, respectively).Shifting of the lower 1% reference line, according to vessel position, could remarkably improve the diagnostic performance regarding RNFL defect detection with SD-OCT.Comparison of confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy, scanning laser polarimetry and optical coherence tomography to discriminate ocular hypertension and glaucoma at an early stage.The aim was to compare the ability of confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (CSLO), scanning laser polarimetry (SLP), and optical coherence tomography (OCT) to discriminate eyes with ocular hypertension (OHT), glaucoma-suspect eyes (GS) or early glaucomatous eyes (EG) from normal eyes.Ocular hypertension, GS, and EG were defined as normal disc with intraocular pressure >21 mmHg, glaucomatous disc without visual field loss, and glaucomatous disc accompanying the early glaucomatous visual filed loss respectively. Ninety-three normal eyes, 26 OHT, 55 GS, and 67 EG were enrolled. Optic disc configuration was analyzed by CSLO (version 3.04), whereas retinal nerve fiber layer thickness was analyzed by SLP (GDx-VCC; version 5.3.2) and OCT-1 (version A6X1) in each individual. The measurements were compared in the four groups of patients. Receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) and area under the curve (AUC) discriminating OHT, GS or EG from normal eyes were compared for the three instruments.Most parameters in GS and EG eyes showed significant differences compared with normal eyes. However, there were few significant differences between normal and OHT eyes. No significant differences were observed in AUCs between SLP and OCT. In EG eyes, the greatest AUC parameter in OCT (inferior--120; 0.932) had a higher AUC than that in CSLO (vertical cup/disc ratio; 0.845; P=0.017). In GS, the greatest AUC parameter in OCT (average retinal nerve fiber layer [RNFL] thickness; 0.869; P=0.002) and SLP (nerve fiber indicator [NFI]; 0.875; P=0.002) had higher AUC than that in CSLO (vertical cup/disc ratio; 0.720).Three instruments were useful in identifying GS and EG eyes. For glaucomatous eyes with or without early visual field defects, SLP and OCT performed similarly or had better discriminating abilities compared with CSLO.Diagnostic validity of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer thickness deviation map algorithm using cirrus HD-OCT in preperimetric and early glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic validity of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (mGCIPL) thickness deviation map algorithm using Cirrus high definition-optical coherence tomography to discriminate between normal controls and patients with preperimetric or early glaucoma.Seventy-two normal controls, 37 patients with preperimetric glaucoma and 70 patients with early glaucoma were enrolled. mGCIPL thickness and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (pRNFL) thickness were measured by Cirrus high definition-optical coherence tomography. Areas showing abnormal color coding were obtained by customized Image J software calculating the number of abnormal superpixels at 1% and 5% level in each deviation map of measurements (GCIPL-DM1, GCIPL-DM5, RNFL-DM1, RNFL-DM5). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROC) of each parameter was calculated to provide diagnostic ability between normal controls and patients with preperimetric or early glaucoma.AROCs of the deviation map algorithms were higher than those of other parameters. Parameter with the best AROC was the GCIPL-DM5 (0.920 and 0.968) in both preperimetric and early glaucoma. The sensitivities of the GCIPL-DM5 at 80% and 95% specificities were 92% and 68% in preperimetric glaucoma and 98% and 90% in early glaucoma, respectively. Pairwise comparisons between AROCs of parameters from deviation map algorithms did not show statistically significant differences.mGCIPL thickness deviation map showed good diagnostic ability in detecting preperimetric and early glaucoma, and it was comparable with pRNFL thickness deviation map. Our findings suggest that it can be an important parameter in detecting subtle glaucomatous structural change.Diagnostic ability of retinal nerve fiber layer maps to detect localized retinal nerve fiber layer defects.To evaluate and compare the diagnostic ability of spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) for detecting localized retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defects in topographic RNFL maps and circumpapillary RNFL (cpRNFL) thickness measurements.Sixty-four eyes with localized RNFL defects in red-free RNFL photographs and 72 healthy eyes were included. All participants were imaged with SD-OCT. The area and angular width of the localized RNFL defects were measured with ImageJ software on RNFL thickness map, significance map (yellow pixels, <5% level), and red-free RNFL photographs. The sensitivity, specificity, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) were calculated for cpRNFL thickness, macular inner retina thickness, and RNFL maps (thickness, significance) according to the quantitative measurements and a <5% level of classification to distinguish eyes with localized RNFL defects from healthy eyes.RNFL thickness map (sensitivity 96.9-98.4%, specificity 86.1-98.6%, and AUCs 0.915-0.992) and significance map (sensitivity 96.9-98.4%, specificity 88.9-95.8%, and AUCs 0.937-0.983) showed superior performance in detecting localized RNFL defects compared with other parameters (P-value 0.001-0.024) except for 36 sector cpRNFL thickness (sensitivity 92.2%, specificity 87.5%, and AUCs 0.898; P-value 0.080-0.545). The sensitivity for detecting RNFL defects was related to the angular width, area, and depth of the RNFL defects in the cpRNFL (4 sector, 12 sector) and macular inner retinal measurements. RNFL thickness and significance maps showed a constant sensitivity regardless of variations in angular width, area, and depth of the RNFL defects.RNFL thickness and significance maps could be used to distinguish eyes with localized RNFL defects from healthy eyes more effectively than cpRNFL thickness and macular inner retina thickness measurements.Retinal nerve fiber layer images captured by GDx-VCC in early diagnosis of glaucoma.To compare differences in retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters between normal subjects and patients with various degrees of glaucoma, evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of GDx-VCC parameters, and determine the capability of GDx-VCC parameters and the most valuable indicators for the diagnosis of early glaucoma.GDx-VCC was used to measure RNFL in 80 patients with early glaucoma (130 eyes), 70 patients with advanced glaucoma (90 eyes) and 40 normal controls (80 eyes). All glaucoma patients were divided into an early glaucoma group and an advanced glaucoma group, according to the mean defect of the visual field. RNFL parameters were compared between normal subjects and patients with various degrees of glaucoma. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves of GDx parameters were drawn to determine the most valuable GDx parameters for the diagnosis of early glaucoma.The RNFLs were significantly thinner in patients with early glaucoma than those in normal subjects; they were also significantly thinner in patients with advanced glaucoma than those in patients with early glaucoma. The differences in all parameters reached statistical significance (p < 0.001). The mean defect of the visual field was significantly correlated with all RNFL parameters (p < 0.001). The areas under the ROC curves were >0.7 for all parameters, which could effectively differentiate early glaucoma from normal subjects. The areas under the ROC curves were 0.81 for nerve fiber indicator and inferior average with better differentiation capability.GDx-VCC can provide quantitative measurements of RNFL thickness for clinical use, which can effectively differentiate patients with early glaucoma from normal subjects, and will be clinically very helpful for the early diagnosis of glaucoma. Nerve fiber indicator and inferior average are the most effective indicators for the early diagnosis of glaucoma.Assessment of a race-specific normative HRT-III database to differentiate glaucomatous from normal eyes.To determine if a new, normative, race-specific database enhances the ability of confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy to differentiate normal from glaucomatous eyes.One eye of eligible normal and glaucoma patients was enrolled. All subjects underwent a complete ophthalmologic examination, standard achromatic perimetry (SITA-SAP, 24-2), and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy [Heidelberg retinal tomograph (HRT-II)] within 1 month of enrollment. Racial groups were defined by self-report. Glaucoma was defined by the existence of reproducible SAP loss (pattern standard deviation <5% and/or Glaucoma Hemifield Test outside normal limits) on 2 consecutive fields. Normal subjects had 2 normal visual fields (pattern standard deviation >5% and Glaucoma Hemifield Test within 97% normal limits) and a normal clinical examination. HRT-II examinations were exported to the HRT-III software, which includes a large race-specific normative database consisting of 733 white and 215 black eyes. Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) for the most abnormal optic disc sector was compared between the HRT-II (MRA2) and the HRT-III software before (MRA3-B) and after (MRA3-A) adjustment for race. Sectors outside the 99.9% confidence interval limits ("outside normal limits") were determined to be abnormal.We enrolled 124 black (52 glaucoma, 72 normal) and 96 white (32 glaucoma, 64 normal) subjects. Mean age was 51+/-13 years and 50+/-16 years for blacks and whites, respectively (P = 0.45). Visual field mean deviation was -7.3+/-6.7 db for glaucomatous eyes and -0.4+/-1.1 db for normal eyes (P < 0.001). Sensitivity and specificity for the HRT-II was 71.9% and 95.3%, respectively, for white subjects and 50.0% and 98.6%, respectively, for black subjects. Using the expanded HRT-III database, analysis yielded a sensitivity of 81.3% and specificity of 93.8% for whites and a sensitivity of 71.2% and specificity of 86.1% for blacks. After an adjustment for black ethnicity was made in the HRT-III program, the sensitivity and specificity for blacks was 65.4% and 90.3%, respectively.A new, larger, race-specific HRT-III database increases sensitivity while maintaining specificity for whites and increases sensitivity but decreases specificity for blacks. New software and databases based on race require careful scrutiny before use in clinical practice.Comparison of scanning laser polarimetry and optical coherence tomography in quantitative retinal nerve fiber assessment.To investigate the relationship between retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) measurements in corresponding areas obtained with scanning laser polarimetry and optical coherence tomography and to compare their discriminating ability in the diagnosis of preperimetric and perimetric glaucoma.Three hundred eighty-six subjects-57 healthy controls, 145 ocular hypertensive patients, 89 with preperimetric glaucoma, and 95 with perimetric glaucoma-were recruited from the Erlangen Glaucoma Registry. Perimetry, 24-hours intraocular pressure profile, stereographic optic disc slides, optical coherence tomography StratusOCT, and scanning laser polarimetry GDx VCC (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc, Dublin, CA) were performed in all patients. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed for mean RNFL values, sector data, and indices. Sensitivity was estimated at >or=90% and >or=80% of specificity to compare the discriminating ability of each imaging modality.For discrimination between glaucomatous and healthy eyes in GDx VCC the nerve fiber index demonstrated the largest area under the ROC curve (AUROC) (0.962+/-0.013), whereas in StratusOCT the largest AUROC (0.986+/-0.006) was found in the inferior quadrant. For preperimetric glaucoma detection the nerve fiber index achieved the largest AUROC (0.783+/-0.037). In contrast, the total RNFL average obtained using StratusOCT showed the largest AUROC (0.904+/-0.025). Bland-Altman plots showed good agreement between both instruments.Both the GDx VCC and StratusOCT demonstrate increasing RNFL loss with advanced glaucomatous damage and were comparable in the diagnosis of perimetric glaucoma. Preperimetric glaucomatous damage may be better assessed by StratusOCT.Diagnostic capability of scanning laser polarimetry with and without enhanced corneal compensation and optical coherence tomography.To compare the abilities of the current commercially available versions of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) and optical coherence tomography (OCT), SLP-variable corneal compensation (VCC), SLP-enhanced corneal compensation (ECC), and high-definition (HD) OCT, in discriminating between healthy eyes and those with early-to-moderate glaucomatous visual field loss.Healthy volunteers and patients with glaucoma who met the eligibility criteria were consecutively enrolled in this prospective, cross-sectional, observational study. Subjects underwent complete eye examination, automated perimetry, SLP-ECC, SLP-VCC, and HD-OCT. Scanning laser polarimetry parameters were recalculated in 90-degree segments (quadrants) in the calculation circle to be compared. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROCs) were calculated for every parameter in order to compare the ability of each imaging modality to differentiate between normal and glaucomatous eyes.Fifty-five normal volunteers (mean age 59.1 years) and 33 patients with glaucoma (mean age 63.8 years) were enrolled. Average visual field mean deviation was -6.69 dB (95% confidence interval -8.07 to -5.31) in the glaucoma group. The largest AUROCs were associated with nerve fiber indicator (0.880 and 0.888) for the SLP-VCC and SLP-ECC, respectively, and with the average thickness in the HD-OCT (0.897).The best performing indices for the SLP-VCC, SLP-ECC, and HD OCT gave similar AUROCs, showing moderate diagnostic accuracy in patients with early to moderate glaucoma. Further studies are needed to evaluate the ability of these technologies to discriminate between normal and glaucomatous eyes.Diagnostic precision of retinal nerve fiber layer and macular thickness asymmetry parameters for identifying early primary open-angle glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic capabilities of intereye and intraeye differences in retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness and macular thickness for identifying early primary open-angle glaucoma (POAG).Prospective, cross-sectional cohort study.All subjects were enrolled from an ongoing institutional glaucoma study. We used spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Spectralis; Heidelberg Engineering) to obtain macular thickness (posterior pole asymmetry scan) and RNFL thickness (circumpapillary scan) in both eyes of 50 early POAG and 50 control subjects. Early POAG subjects had glaucomatous optic neuropathy with mild, reproducible visual field loss in at least 1 eye, and control subjects had normal intraocular pressures, visual fields, and optic nerves. We recorded total, superior, and inferior RNFL and macular thicknesses and then calculated intereye and intraeye differences (asymmetry parameters). Statistical evaluation included receiver operating characteristic and multivariate logistic regression analyses.Intereye macular thickness asymmetry had the highest diagnostic sensitivity (88% at 80% specificity; 83% at 95% specificity), followed by total RNFL thickness (88% at 80% specificity; 75% at 95% specificity). Parameters with the largest areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves were: total RNFL thickness (0.937), intereye RNFL asymmetry (0.921), intereye macular thickness asymmetry (0.913), inferior RNFL thickness (0.905), superior RNFL thickness (0.887), intereye inferior macular thickness asymmetry (0.872), and intraeye macular thickness asymmetry (0.860). These 7 values were not significantly different. In multivariate logistic regression analyses, intraeye macular thickness asymmetry, intereye macular thickness asymmetry, intereye RNFL thickness asymmetry, and total RNFL thickness were related independently to early POAG.Structural asymmetry parameters performed well, identifying early POAG as well as RNFL thickness. Further study is indicated to validate these results.Comparison of scanning laser polarimetry using variable corneal compensation and retinal nerve fiber layer photography for detection of glaucoma.To compare retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) measurements obtained with scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) using variable corneal polarization compensation with standard red-free photography for detection of RNFL damage in glaucoma.This observational, cross-sectional study included 1 eye of each of 42 patients with open-angle glaucoma, 32 patients suspected of having glaucoma, and 40 healthy subjects. The RNFL measurements using SLP with variable corneal compensation were obtained within 3 months of red-free photographs. Two independent observers graded RNFL photographs using a standardized protocol. Superior and inferior hemiretinas were scored separately, and a global score was obtained by averaging scores from each hemiretina.The RNFL photography scores were compared with RNFL thickness measurements obtained with SLP. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed to assess the abilities of the different methods to differentiate glaucoma patients from healthy subjects.The RNFL thickness decreased with increased RNFL damage as assessed by photographs in both hemiretinas (R(2) = 15%-47%). The area under the ROC curve for the best SLP parameter, Nerve Fiber Indicator, was significantly greater than the area under the ROC curve for the global RNFL photography score (0.91 vs 0.84, P =.03).A moderate correlation was found between RNFL thickness measurements obtained with SLP and RNFL scores from red-free photographs. Compared with semiquantitative RNFL photography scores, the best SLP parameter had a higher diagnostic accuracy to separate glaucoma patients from healthy subjects.Pulsar perimetry in the diagnosis of early glaucoma.To assess the ability of Pulsar perimetry (Pulsar) in detecting early glaucomatous visual field (VF) damage in comparison with Frequency Doubling Technology (FDT), Scanning Laser Polarimetry (SLP, GDx VCC), and Heidelberg Retina Tomography (HRT).Prospective observational cross-sectional case study.This multicenter study included: 87 ocular hypertensives (OHT); 67 glaucomatous optic neuropathy (GON) patients; 75 primary open-angle glaucoma (POAG) patients; and 90 normals. All patients underwent standard automated perimetry (SAP) HFA 30-2, Pulsar T30W, FDT N-30, HRT II, and GDx VCC. Area under Receiver Operating Characteristic Curves (AROCs) for discriminating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes and agreement among instruments were determined.The best parameters for Pulsar, FDT, HRT, and GDx were, respectively: loss variance square root; no. of areas with P< 5%; Cup-Shape-Measure; and Nerve Fiber Indicator (NFI). In detecting POAG eyes, Pulsar (AROC, 0.90) appeared comparable with FDT (0.89) and significantly better than HRT (0.82) and GDx (0.79). For GON, Pulsar ability (0.74) was higher than GDx (0.69) and lower than FDT (0.80) and HRT (0.83). The agreement among instruments ranged from 0.12 to 0.56. Pulsar test duration was significantly shorter than SAP and FDT (P< .001).Pulsar T30W test is a rapid and easy perimetric method, showing higher sensitivity than SAP in detecting early glaucomatous VF loss. Its diagnostic ability is good for detecting early perimetric POAG eyes and fair for GON eyes. Pulsar performance was comparable with FDT, HRT, and GDx, even if the agreement between instruments was poor to fair.Comparison between discriminant analysis models and "glaucoma probability score" for the detection of glaucomatous optic nerve head changes.The aim of this study was to evaluate and compare 4 different discriminant analysis formulas and the new Glaucoma Probability Score (GPS) for the detection of morphometric optic nerve head changes in chronic open-angle glaucoma.This is a prospectively planned cross-sectional study. Two hundred and fourteen consecutive eyes were recruited into this study. For each patient, the eyes were evaluated by a slit lamp examination, and the visual fields were assessed by a Humphrey Field Analyzer 750 (HFA, Humphrey Inc, San Leandro, CA), using the standard full threshold 24-2 (Swedish Interactive Threshold Algorithm) program. The optic nerve heads were morphometrically evaluated using the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 (HRT 3, Heidelberg Engineering, Heidelberg, Germany; software version 3.0). From the HRT data, 4 discriminant analysis formulas and the GPS were considered. All data were analyzed by Student t test and Pearson r coefficient. A linear regression model was also used to determine the independent contribution of variables included in the model. Sensitivity, specificity, diagnostic precision, and receiver operating characteristic curve areas were calculated for all the 5 methods examined. kappa statistic was used to study the agreement among, and between, the 5 different methods.One hundred and nineteen normal eyes and 95 eyes with primary open-angle glaucoma were included in the study. No significant difference was found between the 2 study subgroups in both age and refractive error. Significant (P<0.001) correlations were found between visual field indices and the HRT parameters. Sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic precision of the 4 formulas ranged between 50% and 99.16%. Bathija et al's formula had the highest diagnostic precision, followed by Mikelberg's formula. Using kappa statistics, kappa ranged from 0.177 to 0.528 when comparing each single discriminant formula with the GPS.The GPS showed similar sensitivity and specificity to the Mikelberg and Bathija formulas; this method is a promising one for differentiating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes, requiring no subjective user input.Impact of diabetic retinopathy on quantitative retinal nerve fiber layer measurement and glaucoma screening.To investigate the impact of diabetic retinopathy on quantitative retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) assessment and diagnostic power for glaucoma by scanning laser polarimetry (GDx-VCC) and optical coherence tomography (StratusOCT).The individual RNFL parameters of GDx and OCT were obtained for 170 eyes (one eye from each of 170 subjects [45 healthy, 47 glaucoma, 40 diabetes, and 38 glaucoma with diabetes]) and were compared among the four groups. Diabetic eyes had mild to moderate nonproliferative diabetic retinopathy (NPDR) without maculopathy. In glaucomatous eyes with or without diabetes, the ability to discriminate glaucoma was assessed by the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) and the sensitivities at more than 80% and 90% of specificities for each technique.Using GDx-VCC, significant differences (P < 0.05) in RNFL measurement parameters were found for all comparisons except those between glaucomatous eyes with diabetes and without diabetes. StratusOCT parameters did not detect significant differences between age-matched healthy and diabetic eyes. Among the parameters included, the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) of GDx-VCC and the inferior quadrant thickness (IQT) of StratusOCT had the largest AUROCs and sensitivities at specificities greater than 80%: NFI (0.912, 86%) and IQT (0.902, 85%) in glaucomatous eyes with diabetes; NFI (0.935, 92%) and IQT (0.921, 91%) in simple glaucomatous eyes.Mild to moderate NPDR causes a quantitative discrepancy in RNFL measurements between GDx-VCC and StratusOCT in simple diabetic eyes. However, mild to moderate glaucomatous optic neuropathy can be highly discriminated by the two imaging devices in eyes with diabetic retinopathy.Topographic profiles of retinal nerve fiber layer defects affect the diagnostic performance of macular scans in preperimetric glaucoma.To evaluate the influence of topographic profiles (i.e., inner directional angle and angular width) of localized retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defects on the diagnostic performance of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) thickness in discriminating preperimetric glaucoma (PPG) eyes from normal control eyes.The ganglion cell analysis algorithm in Cirrus OCT was performed to determine the macular GCIPL thickness. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) and the sensitivities/specificities based on an internal normative database were evaluated. The effect of the inner directional angle and the angular width of localized RNFL defects on the diagnostic performance of macular GCIPL parameters were evaluated by using linear-by-linear association analysis and logistic regression analysis.Ninety-two patients with PPG and 92 age-matched healthy control subjects were enrolled in this study. The AUROC of the best parameters in macular GCIPL was 0.823 (inferotemporal sector), which showed no significant difference in comparison to the best parameters of peripapillary RNFL (7 o'clock sector, 0.764) and optic nerve head (rim area, 0.767) (for all comparisons, P > 0.05). A significant linear association was observed between the inner directional angle of RNFL defects and the sensitivity of macular GCIPL parameters for detecting RNFL defects. The angular width of RNFL defects was not significantly associated with the sensitivity of macular GCIPL parameters.The diagnostic ability of macular GCIPL parameters was comparable to that of peripapillary RNFL and ONH parameters in PPG. The inner directional angle of RNFL defects, but not the angular width, affects the diagnostic sensitivity of macular GCIPL parameters.Discrimination between glaucomatous and nonglaucomatous eyes using quantitative imaging devices and subjective optic nerve head assessment.To compare the diagnostic ability of the confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscope (HRT-II; Heidelberg Engineering, Heidelberg, Germany), scanning laser polarimeter (GDx-VCC; Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc., Dublin, CA), and optical coherence tomographer (StratusOCT, Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc.) with subjective assessment of optic nerve head (ONH) stereophotographs in discriminating glaucomatous from nonglaucomatous eyes.Data from 79 glaucomatous and 149 normal eyes of 228 subjects were included in the analysis. Three independent graders evaluated ONH stereophotographs. Receiver operating characteristic curves were constructed for each technique and sensitivity was estimated at 80% of specificity. Comparisons of areas under these curves (aROC) and agreement (kappa) were determined between stereophoto grading and best parameter from each technique.Stereophotograph grading had the largest aROC and sensitivity (0.903, 77.22%) in comparison with the best parameter from each technique: HRT-II global cup-to-disc area ratio (0.861, 75.95%); GDx-VCC Nerve Fiber Indicator (NFI; 0.836, 68.35%); and StratusOCT retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness (0.844, 69.62%), ONH vertical integrated rim area (VIRA; 0.854, 73.42%), and macular thickness (0.815, 67.09%). The kappa between photograph grading and imaging parameters was 0.71 for StratusOCT-VIRA, 0.57 for HRT-II cup-to-disc area ratio, 0.51 for GDX-VCC NFI, 0.33 for StratusOCT RNFL, and 0.28 for StratusOCT macular thickness.Similar diagnostic ability was found for all imaging techniques, but none demonstrated superiority to subjective assessment of the ONH. Agreement between disease classification with subjective assessment of ONH and imaging techniques was greater for techniques that evaluate ONH topography than with techniques that evaluate RNFL parameters. A combination of subjective ONH evaluation with RNFL parameters provides additive information, may have clinical impact, and deserves to be considered in the design of future studies comparing objective techniques with subjective evaluation by general eye care providers.Discriminating between glaucoma and normal eyes using optical coherence tomography and the 'Random Forests' classifier.To diagnose glaucoma based on spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) measurements using the 'Random Forests' method.SD-OCT was conducted in 126 eyes of 126 open angle glaucoma (OAG) patients and 84 eyes of 84 normal subjects. The Random Forests method was then applied to discriminate between glaucoma and normal eyes using 151 OCT parameters including thickness measurements of circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (cpRNFL), the macular RNFL (mRNFL) and the ganglion cell layer-inner plexiform layer combined (GCIPL). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROC) was calculated using the Random Forests method adopting leave-one-out cross validation. For comparison, AROCs were calculated based on each one of the 151 OCT parameters.The AROC obtained with the Random Forests method was 98.5% [95% Confidence interval (CI): 97.1-99.9%], which was significantly larger than the AROCs derived from any single OCT parameter (maxima were: 92.8 [CI: 89.4-96.2] %, 94.3 [CI: 91.1-97.6] % and 91.8 [CI: 88.2-95.4] % for cpRNFL-, mRNFL- and GCIPL-related parameters, respectively; P<0.05, DeLong's method with Holm's correction for multiple comparisons). The partial AROC above specificity of 80%, for the Random Forests method was equal to 18.5 [CI: 16.8-19.6] %, which was also significantly larger than the AROCs of any single OCT parameter (P<0.05, Bootstrap method with Holm's correction for multiple comparisons).The Random Forests method, analyzing multiple SD-OCT parameters concurrently, significantly improves the diagnosis of glaucoma compared with using any single SD-OCT measurement.Detection of glaucoma by spectral domain-scanning laser ophthalmoscopy/optical coherence tomography (SD-SLO/OCT) and time domain optical coherence tomography.To evaluate the relationship between time-domain and spectral domain-scanning laser ophthalmoscopy/optical coherence tomography (SD-SLO/OCT), and to compare the ability of these methods to detect glaucoma.Forty-nine glaucoma and 43 healthy participants were imaged by SD-SLO/OCT and Stratus OCT. Bland-Altman plots were used to compare the measurements of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness. Areas under the receiver operating characteristics curves (AUCs), including the average thickness, thickness in each of the 4 quadrants, and thickness at each of the 12 clock-hours were compared. Sensitivity and specificity of normative classification of the 2 OCTs for detection of glaucoma were calculated.The Bland-Altman plot showed good agreement between the 2 instruments. In eyes with glaucoma, RNFL thickness was greater when measured by SD-SLO/OCT than Stratus OCT in most sectors of the eye (Average RNFL thickness: SD-SLO/OCT, 82.7±15.3 μm; Stratus OCT, 76.9±18.4 μm; P<0.001). However, the differences between 2 OCTs were not significant in healthy participants. The AUCs of average RNFL measurements for discrimination of glaucoma did not differ significantly between the instruments (SD-SLO/OCT, 0.969; Stratus OCT, 0.959; P=0.535). SD-SLO/OCT showed similar sensitivity (57.1%) with Stratus OCT (53.4%) for detection of glaucoma in normative classification of average RNFL thickness.Both OCT technologies did well in the diagnosis of glaucoma. Although there were small differences in the 2 instruments in measured RNFL thickness of glaucomatous eyes, in general there was good agreement between the 2 OCTs. SD-SLO/OCT classified more glaucomatous eyes as abnormal based on its normative database.Diagnostic accuracy of scanning laser polarimetry with enhanced versus variable corneal compensation.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) parameters between images taken with enhanced corneal compensation (ECC) and those with variable corneal compensation (VCC) and to explore the effect of atypical birefringence patterns on this accuracy.Cross-sectional observational study.Forty-one healthy subjects and 92 patients with primary open-angle glaucoma.Variable corneal compensation and ECC images were obtained of 1 eye per subject, selected randomly if both eyes were eligible. For both ECC and VCC, the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) and the sensitivity at a specificity of > or =95% were calculated per parameter in all eyes. The analyses were reperformed separately in eyes with and without atypical birefringence patterns (ABP) images.The AUROCs and sensitivities at a specificity of > or =95% for various SLP parameters in all eyes and in eyes without ABP images.The diagnostic accuracy for most standard parameters (temporal-superior-nasal-inferior-temporal [TSNIT] average, superior average, inferior average, and TSNIT standard deviation) in all eyes was statistically significantly higher with ECC than with VCC, except for the nerve fiber indicator (NFI). When only eyes without ABP were used for the analysis, the diagnostic accuracy of SLP parameters with VCC improved, and the differences in diagnostic accuracy between ECC and VCC for these parameters lost their statistical significance.Standard SLP parameters (except for the NFI) generally had a higher diagnostic accuracy when eyes were imaged with ECC than with VCC because there were fewer ABP images with ECC than with VCC. Enhanced corneal compensation therefore may be more reliable than VCC for the detection of glaucoma. A future automated classifier, similar to the current NFI, may perform better if it is trained on data obtained with ECC. Clinically, retinal nerve fiber layer images with marked ABP, acquired with either ECC or VCC, should be viewed with caution.Comparing optic nerve head analysis between confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy and spectral domain optical coherence tomography.Confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy, HRT3, and spectral domain optical coherence tomography (OCT), RTVue-100, are able to give 3-dimensional (3D) topography images of optic nerve head (ONH) and to derive stereometric parameters and sectorial analysis. The purpose of the study is to evaluate the agreement of these two devices and their diagnostic accuracy to discriminate eyes with glaucoma from those without.Glaucoma patients and healthy control subjects were included. All of them underwent a complete ophthalmological examination, including slit lamp evaluation and visual field (VF) test. After pupil dilatation, HRT3 and RTVue-100 were performed. The following stereometric parameters were recorded: disc area, rim area, rim volume, cup volume, cup area, cup/disk ratio, and the following sectors, superotemporal, superonasal, inferotemporal, inferonasal.Forty-six eyes of 46 glaucoma patients and 58 eyes of 58 healthy subjects were included in the study. In both groups, HRT3 rim area and rim volume were statistically higher than RTVue-100 (glaucomas: 0.95 ± 0.38 versus 0.44 ± 0.33 and 0.19 ± 0.13 versus 0.02 ± 0.03, p < 0.01. controls: 1.41 ± 0.30 versus 1.08 ± 0.37 and 0.37 ± 0.13 versus 0.14 ± 0.11, p < 0.01), while cup area was statistically higher by RTVue-100 (glaucomas: 1.42 ± 0.57 versus 1.14 ± 0.58, p < 0.01. controls: 1.05 ± 1.35 versus 0.65 ± 0.48). Bland and Altman plots confirmed the presence of a fixed bias. The parameters with largest AUROC were rim volume, rim area and cup/disk ratio for both instruments. HRT3 inferotemporal sector had the highest sensitivity (80.43%, at 75.9% specificity), while for RTVue-100, the superotemporal sector had the highest sensitivity (76.1%, at 81% specificity). The agreement was moderate for inferotemporal sector and fair for the others.HRT3 and RTVue-100 are not interchangeable for ONH analysis. They both have good diagnostic accuracy, but RTVue-100 shows slightly better performance, at least with regard to rim area volume.Accuracy of GDx VCC, HRT I, and clinical assessment of stereoscopic optic nerve head photographs for diagnosing glaucoma.To determine and compare the accuracy and reproducibility of GDx variable cornea compensation (VCC) scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) with VCC, Heidelberg retina tomograph (HRT) I confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (CSLO), and clinical assessment of stereoscopic optic nerve head (ONH) photographs for diagnosing glaucoma.One eye each of 40 healthy subjects, 48 glaucoma patients, and six patients with ocular hypertension were measured with SLP-VCC and CSLO. Simultaneous stereoscopic ONH photographs were also obtained. Sixteen photographs of healthy and glaucomatous eyes were duplicated for assessing intraobserver agreement. Four glaucoma specialists, four general ophthalmologists, four residents in ophthalmology, and four optometrists classified the ONH photographs as normal or glaucomatous. For SLP-VCC, the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) was evaluated. For CSLO, the Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) and the Bathija linear discriminant function (LDF) were used. Sensitivity, specificity, percentage of correctly classified eyes, and intra- and interobserver agreement, expressed as kappa (kappa) were calculated.SLP-VCC had the highest diagnostic accuracy, with a sensitivity, specificity, and overall correct classification of 91.7%, 95.0% and 93.2%, respectively. CSLO, expressed as Bathija LDF and MRA, had a diagnostic accuracy comparable to glaucoma specialists and general ophthalmologists with an overall accuracy of 89.8%, 86.4%, 86.7% and 85.2%, respectively. Residents classified the fewest eyes correctly. Intraobserver agreement for classifying the ONH photographs ranged between 0.48 (within residents) and 0.78 (within glaucoma specialists). The interobserver agreement ranged between 0.45 (between residents) and 0.74 (between glaucoma specialists). The agreement between observers and CSLO MRA (kappa, 0.68) was statistically significantly higher (p<0.001; paired t-test) than between observers and SLP-VCC NFI (kappa, 0.60) and CSLO Bathija LDF (kappa, 0.62).Automated analysis of measurements with GDx VCC and HRT had a similar diagnostic accuracy for glaucoma as classification of stereoscopic ONH photographs by glaucoma specialists, thus bringing all eye-care professionals to this desirable level. The intra- and interobserver agreement for ONH analysis was only moderate to good. We think these imaging techniques may assist clinicians in diagnosing glaucoma.Comparison of the GDx VCC scanning laser polarimeter, HRT II confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscope, and stratus OCT optical coherence tomograph for the detection of glaucoma.To compare the abilities of current commercially available versions of 3 optical imaging techniques: scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC), confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (HRT II [Heidelberg Retina Tomograph]), and optical coherence tomography (Stratus OCT) to discriminate between healthy eyes and eyes with glaucomatous visual field loss.We included 107 patients with glaucomatous visual field loss and 76 healthy subjects of a similar age. All individuals underwent imaging with a GDx VCC, HRT II, and fast retinal nerve fiber layer scan with the Stratus OCT as well as visual field testing within a 6-month period. Receiver operating characteristic curves and sensitivities at fixed specificities (80% and 95%) were calculated for parameters reported as continuous variables. Diagnostic categorization (outside normal limits, borderline, or within normal limits) provided by each instrument after comparison with its respective normative database was also evaluated, and likelihood ratios were reported. Agreement on categorization between methods (weighted kappa) was assessed.After the exclusion of subjects with unacceptable images, the final study sample included 141 eyes of 141 subjects (75 with glaucoma and 66 healthy control subjects). Mean +/- SD mean deviation of the visual field test result for patients with glaucoma was -4.87 +/- 3.9 dB, and 70% of these patients had early glaucomatous visual field damage. No statistically significant difference was found between the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) for the best parameters from the GDx VCC (nerve fiber indicator, AUC = 0.91), Stratus OCT (retinal nerve fiber layer inferior thickness, AUC = 0.92), and HRT II (linear discriminant function, AUC = 0.86). Abnormal results for each of the instruments, after comparison with their normative databases, were associated with strong positive likelihood ratios. Chance-corrected agreement (weighted kappa) among the 3 instruments ranged from moderate to substantial (0.50-0.72).The AUCs and the sensitivities at high specificities were similar among the best parameters from each instrument. Abnormal results (as compared with each instrument's normative database) were associated with high likelihood ratios and large effects on posttest probabilities of having glaucomatous visual field loss. Calculation of likelihood ratios may provide additional information to assist the clinician in diagnosing glaucoma with these instruments.Combining spectral domain optical coherence tomography structural parameters for the diagnosis of glaucoma with early visual field loss.To create a multivariable predictive model for glaucoma with early visual field loss using a combination of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) parameters, and to compare the results with single variable models.Two hundred fifty-three subjects (149 healthy controls and 104 with early glaucoma) underwent optic disc and macular scanning using SD-OCT in one randomly selected eye per subject. Sixteen parameters (rim area, cup-to-disc area ratio, vertical cup-to-disc diameter ratio, average and quadrant RNFL thicknesses, average, minimum, and sectoral ganglion cell inner-plexiform layer [GCIPL] thicknesses) were collected and submitted to an exploratory factor analysis (EFA) followed by logistic regression with the backward elimination variable selection technique. Area under the curve (AUC) of the receiver operating characteristic (ROC), sensitivity, specificity, Akaike's information criterion (AIC), predicted probability, prediction interval length (PIL), and classification rates were used to determine the performances of the univariable and multivariable models.The multivariable model had an AUC of 0.995 with 98.6% sensitivity, 96.0% specificity, and an AIC value of 43.29. Single variable models yielded AUCs of 0.943 to 0.987, sensitivities of 82.6% to 95.7%, specificities of 88.0% to 94.0%, and AICs of 113.16 to 59.64 (smaller is preferred). The EFA logistic regression model correctly classified 91.67% of cases with a median PIL of 0.050 in the validation set. Univariable models correctly classified 80.62% to 90.48% of cases with median PILs 1.9 to 3.0 times larger.The multivariable model was successful in predicting glaucoma with early visual field loss and outperformed univariable models in terms of AUC, AIC, PILs, and classification rates.Diagnostic performance of optical coherence tomography ganglion cell--inner plexiform layer thickness measurements in early glaucoma.To evaluate the glaucoma diagnostic performance of ganglion cell inner-plexiform layer (GCIPL) parameters used individually and in combination with retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) or optic nerve head (ONH) parameters measured with Cirrus HD-OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc, Dublin, CA).Prospective cross-sectional study.Fifty patients with early perimetric glaucoma and 49 age-matched healthy subjects.Three peripapillary RNFL and 3 macular GCIPL scans were obtained in 1 eye of each participant. A patient was considered glaucomatous if at least 2 of the 3 RNFL or GCIPL scans had the average or at least 1 sector measurement flagged at 1% to 5% or less than 1%. The diagnostic performance was determined for each GCIPL, RNFL, and ONH parameter as well as for binary or-logic and and-logic combinations of GCIPL with RNFL or ONH parameters.Sensitivity, specificity, positive likelihood ratio (PLR), and negative likelihood ratio (NLR).Among GCIPL parameters, the minimum had the best diagnostic performance (sensitivity, 82.0%; specificity, 87.8%; PLR, 6.69; and NLR, 0.21). Inferior quadrant was the best RNFL parameter (sensitivity, 74%; specificity, 95.9%; PLR, 18.13; and NLR, 0.27), as was rim area (sensitivity, 68%; specificity, 98%; PLR, 33.3; and NLR, 0.33) among ONH parameters. The or-logic combination of minimum GCIPL and average RNFL provided the overall best diagnostic performance (sensitivity, 94%; specificity, 85.7%; PRL, 6.58; and NLR, 0.07) as compared with the best RNFL, best ONH, and best and-logic combination (minimum GCIPL and inferior quadrant RNFL; sensitivity, 64%; specificity, 100%; PLR, infinity; and NPR, 0.36).The binary or-logic combination of minimum GCIPL and average RNFL or rim area provides better diagnostic performances than those of and-logic combinations or best single GCIPL, RNFL, or ONH parameters. This finding may be clinically valuable for the diagnosis of early glaucoma.Ability of optical coherence tomography-determined ganglion cell complex thickness to total retinal thickness ratio to diagnose glaucoma.To evaluate the usefulness of the spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD OCT)-determined ganglion cell complex thickness to total retinal thickness ratio (G/T ratio) in diagnosing glaucoma.A total of 99 eyes with primary open-angle glaucoma and 35 normal eyes were enrolled in the study. SD OCT (RTVue-100) was used to measure the macular ganglion cell complex thickness, total retinal thickness, outer retinal thickness, and circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness. A new macular parameter, the G/T ratio, was also calculated. The ability of each parameter to diagnose glaucoma was examined by analyzing the area under the receiver operating characteristics curve (AUROC) and the sensitivity at fixed specificity.The G/T ratio was 36.0 ± 1.5% in normal eyes, 31.8 ± 1.7% in early glaucoma, and 30.2 ± 2.6% in advanced glaucoma. These decreases in the ratio were statistically significant. For the AUROC, the individual SD OCT parameters were 0.982 for the G/T ratio, 0.968 for the macular ganglion cell complex thickness, 0.942 for the RNFL thickness, and 0.841 for the total retinal thickness. The AUROC for the G/T ratio was significantly higher than that seen for the total retinal and RNFL thicknesses (P<0.05). Analyses of the sensitivity at a specificity of >90% indicated that the G/T ratio (sensitivity, 93.94%) was the best diagnostic parameter.Decreases in the G/T ratio occur during the early stages of glaucoma. When using SD OCT to diagnose glaucoma, the G/T ratio may improve the diagnostic ability of the macular parameter.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy of Heidelberg Retina Tomograph II and Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 to discriminate glaucomatous and nonglaucomatous eyes.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of the Moorfields regression analysis (MRA), parameters, and glaucoma probability score (GPS) from Heidelberg Retinal Tomograph (HRT) 3 (Heidelberg Engineering, Heidelberg, Germany) with MRA and parameters from HRT II in discriminating glaucomatous and healthy eyes in subjects of African and European ancestry.Case-control institutional setting.Seventy-eight glaucoma patients (44 of African ancestry, 34 of European ancestry) and 89 age-matched controls (46 of African ancestry, 33 European ancestry), defined by visual fields and self-reported race were included. Imaging was obtained with HRT II, and data were exported to a computer with the HRT 3 software using the same contour line. Area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves (AUCs), sensitivity, and specificity were evaluated for the entire group, the African ancestry group, and the European ancestry group separately. Mean disk area was compared between correctly and incorrectly diagnosed eyes by each technique.Disk, cup, and rim areas from HRT 3 were lower than HRT II (P < .0001). AUC (sensitivity at 95% specificity) was 0.85 (54%) for vertical cup-to-disk ratio (VCDR) HRT 3, 0.84 (45%) for VCDR HRT II, and 0.81 (44%) for GPS at the temporal sector. MRA HRT 3 showed greater sensitivity but lower specificity than HRT II for the entire group, the African ancestry group, and the European ancestry group. GPS classification had the lowest specificity. Glaucomatous eyes incorrectly classified by GPS had smaller mean disk area (P = .0002); control eyes incorrectly classified had greater mean disk area (P = .015).VCDR from HRT 3 showed higher sensitivity than HRT II and GPS for the entire group and for those of African ancestry and of European ancestry separately. Sensitivity of MRA improved in HRT 3 with some trade-off in specificity compared with MRA of HRT II. GPS yielded erroneous classification associated to optic disk size.Comparison of different spectral domain OCT scanning protocols for diagnosing preperimetric glaucoma.To compare the ability of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SDOCT) retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), optic nerve head (ONH), and macular measurements to detect preperimetric glaucomatous damage.The study included 142 eyes from 91 patients suspected of having the disease based on the appearance of the optic disc. All eyes had normal visual fields before the imaging session. Forty-eight eyes with progressive glaucomatous damage were included in the preperimetric glaucoma group. Ninety-four eyes without any evidence of progressive glaucomatous damage and followed untreated for 12.8 ± 3.6 years were used as controls. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) were calculated to summarize diagnostic accuracies of the parameters.The three RNFL parameters with the largest AUCs were average RNFL thickness (0.89 ± 0.03), inferior hemisphere average thickness (0.87 ± 0.03), and inferior quadrant average thickness (0.85 ± 0.03). The three ONH parameters with the largest AUCs were vertical cup-to-disc ratio (0.74 ± 0.04), rim area (0.72 ± 0.05), and rim volume (0.72 ± 0.05). The three macular parameters with the largest AUCs were GCC average thickness (0.79 ± 0.04), GCC inferior thickness (0.79 ± 0.05), and GCC superior thickness (0.76 ± 0.05). Average RNFL thickness performed better than vertical cup-to-disc ratio (0.89 vs. 0.74; P = 0.007) and GCC average thickness (0.89 vs. 0.79; P = 0.015).SDOCT RNFL measurements performed better than ONH and macular measurements for detecting preperimetric glaucomatous damage in a cohort of glaucoma suspects. (ClinicalTrials.gov number, NCT00221897.).Comparison between GDx VCC scanning laser polarimetry and Stratus OCT optical coherence tomography in the diagnosis of chronic glaucoma.To compare the abilities of scanning laser polarimetry with the variable corneal compensator (GDx VCC) with those of optical coherence tomography (Stratus OCT) in discriminating between healthy and early-to-moderate perimetric glaucomatous eyes.A total of 95 glaucomatous patients (mean deviation - 3.7 +/- 3.0 dB, pattern standard deviation 4.5 +/- 2.7 dB) and 62 control subjects underwent imaging by the GDx VCC and Stratus OCT using both optic nerve head (ONH) and retinal nerve fibre layer (RNFL) scan protocols. One eye per patient was considered. Sensitivity at > or = 90% specificity and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROC) were calculated for each GDx VCC and Stratus OCT index.The largest AROCs with Stratus OCT were associated with cup : disc area ratio (0.88) for ONH scan indices, and with average thickness (0.84) for RNFL scan indices. The nerve fibre indicator provided the greatest AROC for the GDx VCC indices (0.85).Both the GDx VCC and Stratus OCT instruments were shown to be useful in the detection of glaucomatous damage. The best performing indices for the GDx VCC and Stratus OCT with both ONH and RNFL scans gave similar AROCs, showing a moderate sensitivity in early-to-moderate glaucoma patients.Diagnostic ability of retinal nerve fiber layer imaging by swept-source optical coherence tomography in glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracies of swept-source optical coherence tomography (OCT) wide-angle and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements for glaucoma detection.Cross-sectional case-control study.In this study we enrolled 144 glaucomatous eyes of 106 subjects and 66 eyes of 42 healthy subjects from the Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study. Glaucoma was defined by the presence of repeatable abnormal standard automated perimetry results and/or progressive glaucomatous optic disc change on masked grading of stereophotographs. Wide-angle and peripapillary RNFL thicknesses were assessed using swept-source OCT. Peripapillary RNFL thickness was also evaluated using spectral-domain OCT. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were calculated to evaluate the ability of the different swept-source OCT and spectral-domain OCT parameters to discriminate between glaucomatous and healthy eyes.Mean (± standard deviation) average spectral-domain OCT wide-angle RNFL thicknesses were 50.5 ± 5.8 μm and 35.0 ± 9.6 μm in healthy and glaucomatous eyes, respectively (P < 0.001). Corresponding values for swept-source OCT peripapillary RNFL thicknesses were 103.5 ± 12.3 μm and 72.9 ± 16.5 μm, respectively (P < 0.001). Areas under the ROC curves of swept-source OCT wide-angle and peripapillary RNFL thickness were 0.88 and 0.89, respectively. Swept-source OCT performed similar to average peripapillary RNFL thickness obtained by spectral-domain OCT (area under the ROC curve of 0.90).Swept-source OCT wide-angle and peripapillary RNFL thickness measurements performed well for detecting glaucomatous damage. The diagnostic accuracies of the swept-source OCT and spectral-domain OCT RNFL imaging protocols evaluated in this study were similar.Comparative study of macular ganglion cell complex thickness measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in healthy eyes, eyes with preperimetric glaucoma, and eyes with early glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of Topcon 3D spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) for measuring the macular inner retinal layers and the circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (cpRNFL) in order to detect preperimetric glaucoma.Two hundred four eyes, including 64 healthy eyes, 68 eyes with preperimetric glaucoma, and 72 eyes with early glaucoma were analyzed. Patients had a comprehensive ocular examination including visual field testing and SD-OCT imaging (3D OCT-2000; Topcon Corporation, Tokyo, Japan) in the macular and peripapillary regions. OCT macular scans were segmented into the macular nerve fiber layer (mNFL), ganglion cell layer with the inner plexiform layer (GCIP), and ganglion cell complex (GCC) (composed of the mNFL and GCIP). Ability to discriminate preperimetric glaucoma was assessed using the area under the receiver operating curve for all macular parameters and the cpRNFL.The median visual field MD was -0.78 ± 1.19 dB for the healthy group, -1.02 ± 1.29 dB for the preperimetric glaucoma group, and -3.08 ± 1.61 dB for the early glaucoma group. There were significant differences between the preperimetric and healthy groups for GCIP and GCC and for almost all cpRNFL thickness parameters (P < 0.05), except for the mNFL and cpRNFL (nasal, 3, 4, 8, 9, and 10 o'clock sectors). The comparisons among the AUCs of the cpRNFL parameters (0.772), the GCIP parameters (0.727) and the GCC parameters (0.720) showed no significant differences in their abilities to detect preperimetric glaucoma.The capacity of Topcon 3D-OCT macular intraretinal parameters (GCIP and GCC measurements, not mNFL measurements) to diagnose preperimetric glaucoma is similar to that of the cpRNFL.Evaluation of macular thickness and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer thickness for detection of early glaucoma using spectral domain optical coherence tomography.To evaluate the diagnostic ability of macular parameters and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters for early glaucoma using spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT).One eye from 32 early glaucoma patients (including preperimetric glaucoma) and 32 normal participants underwent macular scans and peripapillary RNFL scans with SD-OCT 3 times on the same day. The discrimination power of each parameter to detect early glaucoma was determined by areas under receiver operating characteristics curve (AROC) and sensitivity at fixed specificity. Correlation of OCT data with visual field defects was evaluated by linear regression analysis. Reproducibility was also evaluated.Significant differences between early glaucoma and normal participants were found for all parameters except fovea in macular scans and in the superior and inferior quadrants, at 12, 3, 6, 7, 11 o'clock, and average RNFL thickness in RNFL scans. The best parameters based on AROC and sensitivity at a specificity of >90% were temporal outer macula thickness (AROC, 0.79; sensitivity, 63%) in macular parameters and inferior quadrant (AROC, 0.82; sensitivity, 53%) in RNFL parameters. The highest correlation with mean deviation was found in inferior inner macular volume (r=0.50, P<0.001). The mean intraclass correlation coefficient was 0.96 in macular scans and 0.84 in RNFL scans. Test-retest variability ranged from 2.3 to 10.1 μm in macular thickness, 0 to 0.06 mm in macular volume, and 5.8 to 18.9 μm in RNFL thickness.For the diagnosis of early glaucoma by SD-OCT, macular parameters had high discriminating power and high reproducibility comparable with peripapillary RNFL parameters.Early glaucoma detection using the Humphrey Matrix Perimeter, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and retinal nerve fiber layer photography.To compare the effectiveness of Humphrey Matrix perimetry, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) photography using the Heidelberg Retina Angiograph 1 (HRA1) for early glaucoma detection.Cross-sectional comparative study.Seventy-two primary open-angle glaucoma patients with early-stage visual field defects and 48 healthy controls were included.Measurements using Humphrey Matrix perimetry, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and RNFL photography using HRA1, as well as standard automated perimetry, were obtained. We constructed receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves for all available parameters and calculated the area under the ROC curves (AUC) to seek the best discriminating parameter of each test. Subsequently, the ROC curves were calculated for the combinations of the best discriminating parameters of each test to seek the most effective combination for early glaucoma detection.The AUC for various parameters of Humphrey Matrix perimetry, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and RNFL photography using HRA1.The AUCs of Humphrey Matrix perimetry, GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and RNFL photography using HRA1 with the best discriminating parameter were 0.990, 0.906, 0.794, and 0.751, respectively. The AUC of the following best combination was 0.972, more than 5 points depressed below the level of 5% on the pattern deviation plot from Humphrey Matrix perimetry, and the nerve fiber indicator was larger than 20 from GDx VCC.The AUC of the Humphrey Matrix perimetry was greater than that of the GDx VCC, Stratus OCT, and RNFL photography using HRA1.Optic nerve head changes in early glaucoma: a comparison between stereophotography and Heidelberg retina tomography.To evaluate and compare the diagnostic accuracy of the Heidelberg retina tomograph (HRT) version 3 with that of glaucoma specialists using stereophotography in discriminating between normal eyes and patients with early glaucomatous visual field loss.A total of 105 eyes of 105 individuals were prospectively and consecutively recruited. The sample comprised 51 normal and 54 early glaucomatous eyes, as defined by intraocular pressure and standard automated perimetry results, regardless of optic disc appearance. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were plotted for the HRT3 parameters and a linear discriminant function (LDF) developed in our hospital. Best sensitivity-specificity pairs were compared between the HRT3 parameters, with the highest areas under the ROC curve (AUCs) and evaluation of optic disc stereophotographs. Agreement between methods for measuring vertical cup-to-disc ratio was evaluated with the Bland-Altman plot.The average visual field mean deviation was -2.90 dB. The HRT3 parameters with the largest AUCs were our LDF (0.900), rim volume (0.883), and vertical cup/disk ratio (0.880), with no significant differences between these parameters. Sensitivity-specificity pairs were 79.6-100% (clinical evaluation), 83.3-86.3% (our LDF), 64.8-96.1% (final glaucoma probability score), and 68.5-90.2% (global Moorfields regression analysis).The diagnostic accuracy for differentiating normal eyes from those with early visual field defects was similar between clinical evaluation of the optic disc and evaluation with the HRT3. The use of our LDF increased the sensitivity-specificity balance with respect to the HRT-provided parameters. The diagnostic accuracy of the HRT classifications was comparable to that of an experienced glaucoma specialist.Combining structural and functional testing for detection of glaucoma.To assess whether the combined use of both structural and functional tests improves discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes over either type of testing alone.Observational cross-sectional study.One hundred twenty-three eyes of 123 participants enrolled in the Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study.Because both structural and functional tests were evaluated, 2 definitions of glaucoma were used: glaucomatous visual field (VF) damage based on repeatable abnormal standard automated perimetry results (n = 43) and glaucomatous optic disc (glaucomatous optic neuropathy [GON]) based on masked assessment of optic disc stereophotographs (n = 65). Participants had scanning laser polarimetry, optical coherence tomography (OCT), and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy imaging in addition to frequency-doubling technology (FDT) perimetry and short-wavelength automated perimetry (SWAP) testing completed within a 6-month interval.For each glaucoma definition, sensitivities and specificities were calculated for the best structural parameters, FDT perimetry pattern standard deviation (PSD), and SWAP PSD/glaucoma hemifield test, and then for each possible pairwise combination of one structural and one functional parameter.The best structural parameters for discriminating between glaucoma and control eyes were nerve fiber indicator for scanning laser polarimetry, inferior average retinal nerve fiber layer thickness for OCT, and Moorfields regression classification for confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy. Sensitivities and specificities for detecting glaucomatous VF damage for scanning laser polarimetry, OCT, confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy, FDT perimetry, and SWAP were 41.9% and 98.3%, 58.1% and 98.3%, 58.1% and 84.5%, 44.2% and 98.3%, and 65.1% and 86.2%, respectively. Adding FDT perimetry to each of the best structural parameters led to a significant (P<0.05) increase in sensitivity without a significant change in specificity compared with structural parameters alone. Adding SWAP to each of the best structural parameters led to a significant increase in sensitivity and also a significant decrease in specificity compared with each structural parameter alone.A combination of parameters from structural tests and functional tests can improve the sensitivity of glaucoma detection. The sensitivity and specificity desired for a particular clinical application will determine the selection of the particular diagnostic tests.Optic disk and nerve fiber layer imaging to detect glaucoma.To compare optic disk and retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) imaging methods to discriminate eyes with early glaucoma from normal eyes.Retrospective, cross-sectional study.In a tertiary care academic glaucoma center, 92 eyes of 92 subjects (46 with early perimetric open-angle glaucoma and 46 controls) were studied. Diagnostic performance of optical coherence tomography (StratusOCT; Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, California, USA), scanning laser polarimetry (GDx VCC; Laser Diagnostic Technologies, San Diego, California, USA), confocal laser ophthalmoscopy (Heidelberg Retinal Tomograph [HRT] III; Heidelberg Engineering GmbH, Heidelberg, Germany), and qualitative assessment of stereoscopic optic disk photographs were compared. Outcome measures were areas under receiver operator characteristic curves (AUCs) and sensitivities at fixed specificities. Classification and regression tree (CART) analysis was used to evaluate combinations of quantitative parameters.The average (+/- standard deviation) visual field mean deviation for glaucomatous eyes was -4.0 +/- 2.5 dB (decibels). Parameters with largest AUCs (+/- standard error) were: average RNFL thickness for StratusOCT (0.96 +/- 0.02), nerve fiber indicator for GDx VCC (0.92 +/- 0.03), Frederick S. Mikelberg (FSM) discriminant function for HRT III (0.91 +/- 0.03), and 0.97 +/- 0.02 for disk photograph evaluation. At 95% specificity, sensitivity of disk photograph evaluation (90%) was greater than GDx VCC (P = .05) and HRT III (P = .002) results, but not significantly different than those of StratusOCT (P > .05). The combination of StratusOCT average RNFL thickness and HRT III cup-to-disk area with CART produced a sensitivity of 91% and specificity of 96%.StratusOCT, GDx VCC, and HRT III performed as well as, but not better than, qualitative evaluation of optic disk stereophotographs for detection of early perimetric glaucoma. The combination of StratusOCT average RNFL thickness and HRT III cup-to-disk area ratio provided a high diagnostic precision.Discrimination between normal and early glaucomatous eyes with scanning laser polarimeter with fixed and variable corneal compensator settings.To evaluate the ability of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) with a fixed corneal polarization compensator (GDx-FCC Nerve Fiber Analyzer) compared to one with a variable one (GDx-VCC) in the discrimination between healthy and early glaucomatous eyes.Forty patients with early glaucomatous visual field defects, having a mean deviation of 3.1-/+1.6 dB and a pattern standard deviation of 3.1-/+0.9 dB, and 40 controls underwent both GDx-FCC and GDx-VCC. One eye per patient was considered. The cut-off point, taken as the value dividing healthy from glaucomatous eyes with highest probability, was determined for each GDx parameter. Linear discriminant functions (LDFs) were separately developed for GDx-FCC and GDx-VCC parameters. Sensitivity, specificity, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROC) for discriminating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes were calculated for each GDx parameter, both according to the GDx normative database and after the selection of new cut-off points, and for the LDFs.All software-provided parameters showed low sensitivity and high specificity. The selection of new cut-off points improved the performance of all GDx parameters: VCC parameters performed better than FCC parameters; the largest AROCs were associated with the superior/nasal ratio for the GDx-FCC (0.86) and with the Number for the GDx-VCC (0.87). The LDFs provided an AROC of 0.89 with both the GDx-FCC and the GDx-VCC parameters.The GDx-VCC showed a higher ability in the early diagnosis of glaucoma when compared with the GDx-FCC. The individuation of the right cut-off point of selected parameters with both GDx settings performed better than the software-provided parameters, and comparably to the GDx parameters-based LDFs.Comparative assessment for the ability of Cirrus, RTVue, and 3D-OCT to diagnose glaucoma.We compared the ability of circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (cpRNFL) thickness and macular parameters obtained by three spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) instruments to detect glaucoma.We enrolled 87 normal eyes and 145 glaucomatous eyes (75 early glaucomatous eyes (EGs), mean deviation > -6 dB). Each participant was imaged using Cirrus, RTVue, and 3D-OCT to evaluate the average and quadrant cpRNFL thicknesses. The macular retinal nerve fiber layer (mRNFL), ganglion cell layer plus inner plexiform layer (GCL/IPL), and mRNFL + GCL/IPL (ganglion cell complex [GCC]) thicknesses were analyzed. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) were compared among the instruments.These instruments revealed similar AUCs for the average cpRNFL and GCC thicknesses in EGs, and total all-stage glaucomatous eyes (TGs). RTVue showed better performance in the nasal cpRNFL thickness than Cirrus and 3D-OCT, and better performance in the temporal cpRNFL thickness than 3D-OCT in TGs. RTVue had a higher AUC for the superior GCC thickness compared to Cirrus and 3D-OCT in EGs, and TGs. Cirrus had higher AUCs for GCL/IPL parameters in TGs, and lower AUCs for the mRNFL parameters in EGs and TGs compared to 3D-OCT.The average cpRNFL and GCC thicknesses measured using these OCT instruments exhibited similar abilities in the diagnosis of glaucoma, and RTVue exhibited better diagnostic abilities than Cirrus and 3D-OCT for nasal cpRNFL, and superior GCC thicknesses. The diagnostic performance of Cirrus and 3D-OCT was different for GCL/IPL and mRNFL parameters. (http://www.umin.ac.jp/ctr number, UMIN000006900.)Scanning the macula for detecting glaucoma.With the advent of spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SDOCT), there has been a renewed interest in macular region for detection of glaucoma. However, most macular SDOCT parameters currently are thickness parameters which evaluate thinning of the macular layers but do not quantify the extent of area over which the thinning has occurred. We therefore calculated a new macular parameter, "ganglion cell complex surface abnormality ratio (GCC SAR)" that represented the surface area over which the macular thickness was decreased.To evaluate the ability of SAR in detecting perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma.Retrospective image analysis.68 eyes with perimetric glaucoma, 62 eyes with preperimetric glaucoma and 165 control eyes underwent GCC imaging with SDOCT. SAR was calculated as the ratio of the abnormal to total area on the GCC significance map.Diagnostic ability of SAR in glaucoma was compared against that of the standard parameters generated by the SDOCT software using area under receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) and sensitivities at fixed specificities.AUC of SAR (0.91) was statistically significantly better than that of GCC average thickness (0.86, P = 0.001) and GCC global loss volume (GLV; 0.88, P = 0.01) in differentiating perimetric glaucoma from control eyes. In differentiating preperimetric glaucoma from control eyes, AUC of SAR (0.72) was comparable to that of GCC average thickness (0.70, P > 0.05) and GLV (0.72, P > 0.05). Sensitivities at specificities of 80% and 95% of SAR were comparable (P > 0.05 for all comparisons) to that of GCC average thickness and GLV in diagnosing perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma.GCC SAR had a better ability to diagnose perimetric glaucoma compared to the SDOCT software provided global GCC parameters. However, in diagnosing preperimetric glaucoma, the ability of SAR was similar to that of software provided global GCC parameters.Effect of spectrum bias on the diagnostic accuracy of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in glaucoma.To evaluate the influence of a control group on the diagnostic accuracy of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) in early glaucoma.In a diagnostic, case-control study, 119 eyes of 60 normal subjects with no findings suspicious for glaucoma (control cohort 1); 76 eyes of 41 subjects referred by general ophthalmologists as glaucoma suspects based on optic disc morphology, but found by glaucoma experts to be normal but with physiological variations in their optic nerves (control cohort 2); and 65 eyes of 46 early-glaucoma patients (cases) underwent imaging of the optic nerve head (ONH), retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), and ganglion cell complex (GCC) by SD-OCT.Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) of ONH parameters discriminating glaucomatous eyes from normal eyes of control cohort 2 were significantly lesser (P < 0.001) than those discriminating glaucomatous eyes from normal eyes of control cohort 1. AUCs of RNFL parameters discriminating glaucomatous eyes from normal eyes of control cohorts 2 and 1 were comparable. Although the AUCs of GCC thickness parameters were comparable, AUCs of GCC focal and global loss volume in control cohort 2 (0.684 and 0.671. respectively) were significantly less (P < 0.05) than in control cohort 1 (0.881 and 0.841, respectively).The effectiveness of most SD-OCT parameters in detecting glaucoma significantly decreased when evaluated against a clinically relevant control group with suspicious-looking optic nerves compared with that against a control group consisting of normal subjects with no findings suspicious for glaucoma.Diagnostic capability of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography for glaucoma.To determine the diagnostic capability of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in glaucoma patients with visual field defects.Prospective, cross-sectional study.Cirrus high-definition optical coherence tomography compared with Stratus optical coherence tomography in glaucoma diagnosis.To compare the retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) evaluation using Cirrus optical coherence tomography (OCT) and Stratus OCT in glaucoma diagnosis.One hundred thirty normal and 86 patients with glaucoma were included in this prospective study. The signal strengths of the OCTs were evaluated. The sensitivities and specificities of global RNFL average thickness were compared in the four quadrants and in each clock hour sector. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves, areas under the ROC (AUC), and the likelihood ratio (LR) were plotted for RNFL thickness. Agreement between the OCTs was calculated by using the Bland-Altman method and kappa (kappa) coefficient.Twenty-three percent of all cases examined with Stratus OCT and 1.9% examined with Cirrus OCT had a signal strength below 6 (P = 0.01). In cases with signal strengths > or =6, the mean signal strength was higher with Cirrus OCT than with Stratus OCT (P = 0.01). The RNFL measurements by Cirrus were thicker than those of Stratus OCT (P < 0.05). The AUCs were 0.829 for Stratus and 0.837 for Cirrus OCT (P = 0.706) for global RNFL average. LRs were similar in both OCTs in global RNFL classification but varied in quadrants. The widths of the limits of agreement varied between 42.16 and 97.79 microm. There was almost perfect agreement (kappa = 0.82) in the average RNFL classification.Cirrus OCT has better scan quality than Stratus OCT, especially in glaucomatous eyes. In cases with good-quality scans, the sensitivity and specificity, and AUCs were similar. The best agreement was in the global average RNFL classification. The widths of limits of agreements exceed the limits of resolution of the OCTs.Retinal nerve fiber layer and macular inner retina measurements by spectral domain optical coherence tomograph in Indian eyes with early glaucoma.To compare the diagnostic abilities of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) and macular inner retina (MIR) measurements by spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) in Indian eyes early glaucoma.In an observational, cross-sectional study, 125 eyes of 64 normal subjects and 91 eyes of 59 early glaucoma patients underwent RNFL and MIR imaging with SD-OCT. Glaucomatous eyes had characteristic optic nerve and RNFL abnormalities and correlating visual field defects and a mean deviation of better than or equal to -6 dB on standard automated perimetry. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC), sensitivities at a fixed specificity and likelihood ratios (LRs) were estimated for all RNFL and MIR parameters.The AUCs for the RNFL parameters ranged from 0.537 for the temporal quadrant thickness to 0.821 for the inferior quadrant RNFL thickness. AUCs for the MIR parameters ranged from 0.603 for the superior minus inferior MIR thickness average to 0.908 for ganglion cell complex focal loss volume (GCC-FLV). AUC for the best MIR parameter (GCC-FLV) was significantly better (P<0.001) than that of the best RNFL parameter (inferior quadrant thickness). The sensitivities of these parameters at high specificity of 95%, however, were comparable (52.7% vs58.2%). Evaluation of the LRs showed that outside normal limits results of most of the RNFL and MIR parameters were associated with large effects on the post-test probability of disease.MIR parameters with RTVue SD-OCT were as good as the RNFL parameters to detect early glaucoma.Glaucoma diagnostic accuracy of ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer thickness: comparison with nerve fiber layer and optic nerve head.To determine the diagnostic performance of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) thickness measured with the Cirrus high-definition optical coherence tomography (HD-OCT) ganglion cell analysis (GCA) algorithm (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA) to discriminate normal eyes and eyes with early glaucoma and to compare it with that of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness and optic nerve head (ONH) measurements.Evaluation of diagnostic test or technology.Fifty-eight patients with early glaucoma and 99 age-matched normal subjects.Macular GCIPL and peripapillary RNFL thicknesses and ONH parameters were measured in each participant, and their diagnostic abilities were compared.Area under the curve (AUC) of the receiver operating characteristic.The GCIPL parameters with the best AUCs were the minimum (0.959), inferotemporal (0.956), average (0.935), superotemporal (0.919), and inferior sector (0.918). There were no significant differences between these AUCs and those of inferior quadrant (0.939), average (0.936), and superior quadrant RNFL (0.933); vertical cup-to-disc diameter ratio (0.962); cup-to-disc area ratio (0.933); and rim area (0.910), all P>0.05.The ability of macular GCIPL parameters to discriminate normal eyes and eyes with early glaucoma is high and comparable to that of the best peripapillary RNFL and ONH parameters.Proprietary or commercial disclosure may be found after the references.Comparison of the diagnostic capability of the Heidelberg Retina Tomographs 2 and 3 for glaucoma in the Indian population.To compare the diagnostic capability of the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph (HRT) 2 and 3 (Heidelberg Engineering, GmBH, Dossenheim, Germany) for glaucoma in an Indian population.Evaluation of a diagnostic technology.Ninety-eight glaucoma subjects and 79 normal controls.All participants underwent imaging with HRT2. Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 2 examinations were exported to HRT3 software. The stereometric parameters of HRT2 and HRT3 were compared. The diagnostic capability of Moorfields Regression Analysis (MRA) in the HRT2, HRT3 with and without ethnicity correction, and Glaucoma Probability Score (GPS) of HRT3 were compared. Analysis was done with the borderline results of MRA and GPS considered as normal to derive the most specific criteria and as abnormal to derive the least specific criteria.Sensitivity, specificity, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUC).On standard automated perimetry (SAP), the mean deviation (mean+/-standard deviation) of the glaucoma and normal groups were -7.3+/-6.7 dB and -0.4+/-1.1 dB, respectively (P<0.001). The AUC for the individual stereometric parameters of HRT2 were similar to that of HRT3. The sensitivity and specificity (most specific criteria) were 56.1% and 96.2%, respectively, for MRA of HRT2 and 56.1% and 91.1%, respectively, for MRA of HRT3. The sensitivity and specificity (least specific criteria) were 88.8% and 88.6%, respectively, for MRA of HRT2 and 70.4% and 81%, respectively, for MRA of HRT3. By using the Indian specific normative database of HRT3, the sensitivity and specificity were 37.8% and 97.5%, respectively, for the most specific criteria, and 55.1% and 89.9%, respectively, for the least specific criteria. Sensitivity and specificity of GPS were 86.7% and 68.3%, respectively, for the most specific criteria, and 93.9% and 39.2%, respectively, for the least specific criteria.In this cohort, the diagnostic capability of HRT2 MRA was similar to that of HRT3 MRA; ethnicity correction did not improve results; GPS was more sensitive but less specific than MRA in diagnosing glaucoma.Glaucoma discrimination of segmented cirrus spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) macular scans.To evaluate the glaucoma discriminating ability of macular retinal layers as measured by spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT).Healthy, glaucoma suspect and glaucomatous subjects had a comprehensive ocular examination, visual field testing and SD-OCT imaging (Cirrus HD-OCT; Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, California, USA) in the macular and optic nerve head regions. OCT macular scans were segmented into macular nerve fibre layer (mNFL), ganglion cell layer with inner plexiform layer (GCIP), ganglion cell complex (GCC) (composed of mNFL and GCIP), outer retinal complex and total retina. Glaucoma discriminating ability was assessed using the area under the receiver operator characteristic curve (AUC) for all macular parameters and mean circumpapillary retinal nerve fibre layer (cpRNFL).Analysis was performed on 51 healthy, 49 glaucoma suspect and 63 glaucomatous eyes. The median visual field MD was -2.21 dB (IQR: -6.92 to -0.35) for the glaucoma group, -0.32 dB (IQR: -1.22 to 0.73) for the suspect group and -0.18 dB (IQR: -0.92 to 0.71) for the healthy group. Highest age adjusted AUCs were found for average GCC and GCIP (AUC=0.901 and 0.900, respectively) and their sectoral measurements: infero-temporal (0.922 and 0.913), inferior (0.904 and 0.912) and supero-temporal (0.910 and 0.897). These values were similar to the discriminating ability of the mean cpRNFL (AUC=0.913). Comparison of these AUCs did not yield any statistically significant difference (all p>0.05).SD-OCT GCIP and GCC measurements showed similar glaucoma diagnostic ability and were comparable with that of cpRNFL.Scanning laser polarimetry with enhanced corneal compensation and optical coherence tomography in normal and glaucomatous eyes.To examine the association between scanning laser polarimetry (SLP), using enhanced (ECC) and variable corneal compensation (VCC) with optical coherence tomography (OCT), and to compare their discriminating ability in the diagnosis of glaucoma.Normal and glaucomatous eyes enrolled from four clinical sites underwent complete examination, automated perimetry, SLP-ECC, SLP-VCC, and OCT. Eyes were characterized in two groups based on the typical scan score (TSS): Normal birefringence pattern (NBP) was defined as a TSS of 80 to 100 and abnormal birefringence pattern (ABP) as TSS <or= 79. For each of the six SLP parameters and five OCT parameters the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROCs) were calculated to compare the discriminating ability of each imaging modality, to differentiate between normal and glaucomatous eyes.Ninety-five normal volunteers and 63 patients with glaucoma were enrolled. Average visual field mean deviation was -4.2 +/- 4.3 dB in the glaucoma group. In eyes with NBP, SLP-ECC had significantly (all P <or= 0.001) greater correlation with OCT average, superior, and inferior retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL; r = 0.79, 0.67, 0.74) compared with SLP-VCC (r = 0.71, 0.43, 0.37). In eyes with ABP, SLP-ECC had a significantly greater (all P <or= 0.001) correlation with OCT average, superior, and inferior RNFL (r = 0.75, 0.73, 0.83) compared with SLP-VCC (r = 0.51, 0.22, 0.18). The AUROC for OCT inferior average thickness (0.91) was similar (P = 0.26) to the TSNIT (temporal, superior, nasal, inferior, temporal) average obtained using SLP-ECC (0.87) and significantly (P = 0.02) greater than SLP-VCC (0.81).Compared with SLP-VCC, SLP-ECC has significantly stronger correlations with OCT and may improve the discriminating ability for early glaucoma diagnosis.GDx-VCC performance in discriminating normal from glaucomatous eyes with early visual field loss.To evaluate the ability of scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation (GDx-VCC) in separating healthy from glaucomatous patients with early visual field (VF) loss.Sixty-two healthy and 48 glaucomatous age-matched patients with early glaucoma [mean deviation (MD): -1.74dB +/-1.69] underwent complete ophthalmological evaluation, automated achromatic perimetry (AAP) and retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) measurement with GDx-VCC. One randomly selected eye from each subject was considered. Glaucomatous VF defects had either Glaucoma Hemifield Test (GHT) outside normal limits or pattern standard deviation (PSD) outside 95% confidence limits. Mean (+/-SD) MD, PSD and GDx-VCC parameters in the two groups were compared by t-test. For each GDx-VCC parameter, area under receiver operating characteristics (AUROC) curve and sensitivity at predetermined specificity > or =80% and > or =95% were calculated. Moreover, the parameter with largest AUROC was evaluated by likelihood ratios (LRs).Mean values for MD, PSD and ten of 14 GDx-VCC parameters were significantly different between the two groups (P<0.001). The three parameters with largest AUROCs were the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) (0.870), superior average (0.817) and normalized superior area (0.816) (P=0.08 for differences between AUROCs). NFI displayed sensitivity values of 80.2% and 60.4% for specificity > or =80% and > or =95%, respectively. At NFI cutoff value of 30, positive LR was 34.9 (95% CI: 4.9-247.6) and negative LR was 0.45 (95% CI: 0.32-0.61). Interval LRs showed large effect on post-test probability for NFI values < or =18 or > or =31.In our sample of eyes with early VF loss, GDx-VCC showed moderate-to-good discriminating ability. Among the best performing parameters, NFI had the largest AUROC, but several glaucomatous eyes (21, 43.8%) had NFI <30. This suggests that algorithm for NFI calculation requires some refinement when eyes with early VF loss are evaluated.Ability of different scanning protocols of spectral domain optical coherence tomography to diagnose preperimetric glaucoma.To evaluate the ability of the optic nerve head (ONH), retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), and ganglion cell complex (GCC) parameters of spectral domain optical coherence tomograph (SDOCT) in detecting preperimetric glaucoma.In a cross-sectional study, 34 preperimetric glaucoma eyes (34 patients) and 72 control eyes (72 subjects) with large physiologic optic disc cupping underwent ONH, RNFL, and GCC imaging with SDOCT. Preperimetric glaucoma was diagnosed in the presence of glaucomatous optic neuropathy on masked evaluation of optic disc photographs by two glaucoma experts and normal visual fields. The ability of SDOCT parameters to discriminate preperimetric glaucoma eyes from eyes with large physiologic cups was evaluated by areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC), sensitivities at fixed specificities, and likelihood ratios (LR).All SDOCT parameters were significantly different (P < 0.05) between the two groups. The ONH, RNFL, and GCC parameters with best AUCs to differentiate preperimetric glaucoma from eyes with large physiologic cups were vertical cup to disc ratio (0.76), inferior quadrant RNFL thickness (0.76), and inferior quadrant GCC thickness (0.75), respectively. Sensitivities at 95% specificity of SDOCT parameters ranged between 15% and 29%. Likelihood ratios of outside normal limits category of parameters ranged between 3 and 11, and within normal limits category between 0.5 and 0.8.Diagnostic abilities of ONH, RNFL, and GCC parameters of SDOCT to differentiate preperimetric glaucoma eyes from control eyes with large physiologic cupping were only moderate.Macular and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer measurements by spectral domain optical coherence tomography in normal-tension glaucoma.To evaluate and compare the glaucoma discrimination ability of macular inner retinal layer (MIRL) thickness with that of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (pRNFL) thickness measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (RTVue-100; Optovue Inc, Fremont, CA) in patients with normal-tension glaucoma (NTG).Sixty-five healthy subjects and 102 with NTG were enrolled. MIRL thickness provided by a ganglion cell complex (GCC) scan and two RNFL thicknesses measured by the NHM4 (RNFL1) and RNFL 3.45 (RNFL2) modes of the RTVue-100 system were analyzed. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) of MIRL and pRNFL thicknesses for discriminating patients with NTG from control subjects were determined. The AUCs were compared between patients with central visual field (VF) defects (VF; <or=10 degrees of fixation) and peripheral VF defects (>10 degrees from fixation).The average MIRL thickness showed a strong correlation with both RNFL1 and -2 thicknesses (R(2) = 0.773, 0.774, both P < 0.0001). The AUCs for average MIRL, RNFL1, and RNFL2 thicknesses were not significantly different at 0.945, 0.973, and 0.976, respectively. However, the AUCs of the average and superior MIRL thicknesses were significantly less than that of the pRNFL thickness in eyes with moderate-to-advanced glaucoma and eyes with peripheral VF defects.The average MIRL thickness showed a strong correlation with pRNFL thickness, because patients with NTG at an early stage showed paracentral VF defects near the fixation point. MIRL thickness showed glaucoma discrimination ability comparable to that of pRNFL thickness in patients with NTG with early VF defects. In eyes with advanced or peripheral VF defect, pRNFL measurement showed a better glaucoma diagnostic ability than did MIRL measurement.Comparing glaucomatous optic neuropathy in primary open angle and primary angle closure glaucoma eyes by scanning laser polarimetry-variable corneal compensation.To study the retinal nerve fiber layer thickness difference between high-tension primary open angle glaucoma (HT-POAG) and primary angle closure glaucoma (PACG) eyes using scanning laser polarimetry-variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC) in Taiwan-Chinese population; to evaluate the usefulness of the GDx VCC for detecting POAG and PACG eyes in Taiwan-Chinese population.The study comprised 88 early to moderate glaucomatous eyes (one randomly selected eye from 47 HT-POAG patients and 41 PACG patients) and the control group consisted of 45 age-matched eyes from 45 normal individuals. Each subject underwent retinal nerve fiber layer thickness measurement by GDx VCC and Humphrey Field Analyzer visual field testing. Measured GDx VCC parameters were compared among groups. We also calculated the area under the receive operator characteristic (AROC) curve, corresponding sensitivity/specificity and best cut off value for each parameter in differentiating normal from POAG and PACG eyes.There was no significant difference between HT-POAG and PACG eyes in each parameter. The parameter with the best AROC curve for differentiating normal from POAG eye was nerve fiber indicator (AROC, 0.779; sensitivity=57.4%, specificity=100%; best cut off value >27). The parameter with the best AROC curves for differentiating normal from PACG eyes was temporal-superior-nasal-inferior-temporal average (AROC, 0.829; sensitivity=46.3%, specificity=100%, best cut off value <51.7).There was no significant difference between the HT-POAG and PACG eyes as far as the various parameters were concerned. GDx VCC shows fair discriminating ability in distinguishing normal from POAG and PACG eyes in Taiwan Chinese population.Diagnostic ability of the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 for glaucoma.To compare the diagnostic ability of the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 (HRT3) and the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 2 (HRT2) for discriminating between healthy eyes and eyes with glaucomatous visual field loss.Retrospective cross-sectional study.Participants were 93 healthy subjects and 90 patients with open-angle glaucoma. All participants underwent imaging of the optic nerve head with the HRT2. Afterward, HRT data also were analyzed using version 3 of the software without modifying the optic disk contour line. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves between normal and glaucomatous subjects were plotted for the global stereometric parameters of both software versions. Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) and glaucoma probability score (GPS) diagnostic abilities also were compared.The parameters with the largest areas under the ROC curve were the Frederick S. Mikelberg (FSM) discriminant function for the HRT3 (0.948) and the vertical cup-to-disk ratio (0.914) for the HRT2. At a fixed specificity of 95%, the best sensitivity was 74.4% for the Reinhard O.W. Burk (RB) discriminant function of the HRT2 and 83.3% for the FSM discriminant function of the HRT3. The best sensitivity and specificity pairs for the HRT classifications were 85.5% and 76.3%, respectively, for overall MRA2, 84.4% and 83.8%, respectively, for overall MRA3, 93.3% and 58.0%, respectively, for the global color-coded GPS, and 84.4% and 74.1%, respectively, for the global GPS numerical value.At 95% fixed specificity, most HRT3 parameters exhibited at least the same sensitivity for glaucoma diagnosis as the analogous parameters for the HRT2. The diagnostic ability overall of MRA3 was similar to that of the previous version. GPS exhibited higher sensitivity and somewhat lower specificity than the MRA.Optic nerve head assessment: comparison of Cirrus optic coherence tomography and Heidelberg Retinal Tomograph 3.The purpose of this study was to analyse the relationship between optic nerve head (ONH) parameters measured by spectral domain optical coherence tomography and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscope.Prospective, cross-sectional study. Hospital setting.One hundred seventy-three subjects (85 glaucoma and 88 normal subjects).One eye from each individual was selected randomly for ONH imaging by the spectral domain Cirrus OCT and Heidelberg Retinal Tomograph 3 (HRT3).Four ONH parameters that are measured by both technologies (average cup-to-disc ratio [CDR], rim area, disc area and cup volume) were analysed and compared for differences, agreement of the categorical classification, diagnostic sensitivities and specificities and the area under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC).ONH parameters, as determined by the two technologies were significantly different but strongly correlated. Proportional bias was demonstrated for all measurements. The agreement of categorical classification was excellent for CDR (κ = 0.94) and good for rim area and cup volume (κ = 0.63 and 0.71, respectively). The highest sensitivities at fixed specificities were achieved by Cirrus OCT. AUCs for CDR, rim area, disc area and cup volume were not significantly different between the two technologies.The diagnostic capability of ONH measurements by both technologies is similar. Paired ONH measurements by Cirrus OCT and HRT3 are strongly correlated but significantly different and proportionally biased. The results preclude interchangeable use of the absolute values, but categorical classification of ONH parameters may be interchangeable in clinical practice.Evaluation of retinal nerve fiber layer thickness measurements for glaucoma detection: GDx ECC versus spectral-domain OCT.To assess the ability of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements obtained using GDx-enhanced corneal compensation (ECC) or spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (RTVue), and that of ganglion cell complex (GCC) scan available on RTVue, to detect glaucoma.One randomly selected eye of 205 subjects (70 normal, 65 ocular hypertension, and 70 glaucoma) underwent a complete clinical and instrumental examination. RTVue spectral-domain optical coherence tomography was used to assess RNFL thickness and GCC parameters, GDx ECC to assess RNFL thickness. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) and sensitivity of the RNFL and GCC parameters were calculated at a fixed specificity of 95%, and the diagnostic abilities of the RNFL values obtained using the 2 instruments were compared. We also compared the results obtained in the normal, ocular hypertensive, and glaucomatous subjects.Best GDx RNFL parameter was nerve fiber indicator (NFI) (AUC 0.99, sensitivity 96%); the best RTVue parameters were average (AUC 0.98, sensitivity 90%), inferior-temporal (AUC 0.97, sensitivity 89%), and superior-temporal RNFL thickness (AUC 0.96, sensitivity 87%). There were no significant differences between the 2 devices (P>0.05). Best GCC parameters were focal loss volume (AUC 0.98, sensitivity 91%) and global loss volume (AUC 0.96, sensitivity 87%).GDx ECC and RTVue show a very good diagnostic ability to detect glaucoma. Most of the RNFL parameters had high AUCs and sensitivities. The diagnostic validity of GCC was comparable with that of the RNFL parameters, and they may be very useful in detecting RNFL damage.Glaucoma detection ability of ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer thickness by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography in high myopia.To compare the glaucoma detection ability of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) thickness measured with Cirrus spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) with that of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness in high myopia.In 49 highly myopic and 54 nonhighly myopic glaucoma patients--along with 78 healthy myopic subjects--two scans, including one macular scan and one peripapillary RNFL scan, were obtained using Cirrus SD-OCT. For 44 randomly selected glaucoma patients, three macular scans were taken for reproducibility measurements. The glaucoma detection abilities of macular GCIPL and peripapillary RNFL thicknesses were compared between the highly myopic and nonhighly myopic groups. Diagnostic power was assessed by area under the receiver operating characteristic (AUROC) curves and sensitivity. Repeatability was assessed by intraclass correlation coefficient (ICC) and coefficient of variation (CV).All of the macular GCIPL and peripapillary RNFL thickness measurements excepting the 3 o'clock peripapillary RNFL sector showed an AUROC over 0.5. The best parameters for discriminating normal from glaucomatous eyes were inferior RNFL (0.906) and inferotemporal GCIPL (0.852) thickness in the highly myopic group, and average RNFL (0.920) and minimum GCIPL (0.908) thickness in the nonhighly myopic group. The best peripapillary RNFL and macular GCIPL thickness parameters showed no statistically significant differences. All of the ICCs of the macular GCIPL ranged between 0.96 and 0.99, and the CV was <3%.In cases of high myopia, the glaucoma detection ability of macular GCIPL thickness was high and comparable with that of peripapillary RNFL thickness.Structure-function relationships using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography: comparison with scanning laser polarimetry.To evaluate and compare the regional relationships between visual field sensitivity and retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness as measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (OCT) and scanning laser polarimetry.Prospective cross-sectional study.One hundred and twenty eyes of 120 patients (40 with healthy eyes, 40 with suspected glaucoma, and 40 with glaucoma) were tested on Cirrus-OCT, GDx VCC, and standard automated perimetry. Raw data on RNFL thickness were extracted for 256 peripapillary sectors of 1.40625 degrees each for the OCT measurement ellipse and 64 peripapillary sectors of 5.625 degrees each for the GDx VCC measurement ellipse. Correlations between peripapillary RNFL thickness in 6 sectors and visual field sensitivity in the 6 corresponding areas were evaluated using linear and logarithmic regression analysis. Receiver operating curve areas were calculated for each instrument.With spectral-domain OCT, the correlations (r(2)) between RNFL thickness and visual field sensitivity ranged from 0.082 (nasal RNFL and corresponding visual field area, linear regression) to 0.726 (supratemporal RNFL and corresponding visual field area, logarithmic regression). By comparison, with GDx-VCC, the correlations ranged from 0.062 (temporal RNFL and corresponding visual field area, linear regression) to 0.362 (supratemporal RNFL and corresponding visual field area, logarithmic regression). In pairwise comparisons, these structure-function correlations were generally stronger with spectral-domain OCT than with GDx VCC and with logarithmic regression than with linear regression. The largest areas under the receiver operating curve were seen for OCT superior thickness (0.963 ± 0.022; P < .001) in eyes with glaucoma and for OCT average thickness (0.888 ± 0.072; P < .001) in eyes with suspected glaucoma.The structure-function relationship was significantly stronger with spectral-domain OCT than with scanning laser polarimetry, and was better expressed logarithmically than linearly. Measurements with these 2 instruments should not be considered to be interchangeable.Retinal nerve fiber layer imaging with spectral-domain optical coherence tomography: analysis of the retinal nerve fiber layer map for glaucoma detection.To evaluate the diagnostic performance of the retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness deviation map imaged by a spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (OCT; Cirrus HD-OCT, Carl Zeiss Meditec Inc, Dublin, CA) and compare its sensitivity and specificity for glaucoma detection with circumpapillary RNFL measurement derived from the standard 3.46 mm diameter circle scan.Prospective, cross-sectional study.We included 102 normal subjects and 121 glaucoma patients.One eye from each individual was imaged with Cirrus HD-OCT and Stratus OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec Inc.). Glaucoma was defined based on the presence of visual field defects with the Humphrey visual field analyzer (Carl Zeiss Meditec Inc.). A scoring system (0-5) was developed to analyze the RNFL thickness deviation map taking the defect size, shape, depth, location, and distance from the disc margin into consideration. Each of these features was scored independently by a masked observer with a highest total score of 5 (glaucomatous RNFL defect) and a lowest score of 0 (no RNFL defect). Sensitivity and specificity were computed with a score of > or =3, > or =4, or =5. The diagnostic performance of circumpapillary RNFL measurement was analyzed with clock-hour and average RNFL thickness categorical classification.Diagnostic sensitivity and specificity.The sensitivities of the RNFL thickness deviation map ranged between 95.0% and 97.5%. There were significant differences in specificity between a map score of 5, a map score of > or =4 (87.3%), and a map score > or =3 (72.5%; P< or =0.014). A map score of 5 attained a significantly higher sensitivity (95.0%) compared with clock-hour or average RNFL thickness categorical classification by Stratus OCT or Cirrus HD-OCT (46.3%-88.4%; P< or =0.033) at a comparable level of specificity (95.1%), except when glaucoma was detected as having > or =1 clock-hour at the < or =5% level by Cirrus HD-OCT in which an equally high sensitivity (93.4%) was found but at the expense of a significantly lower specificity (83.3%; P<0.001).Analysis of the RNFL thickness deviation map provides additional spatial and morphologic information of RNFL damage and significantly improves the diagnostic sensitivity for glaucoma detection compared with conventional circumpapillary RNFL measurement.Relevance vector machine and support vector machine classifier analysis of scanning laser polarimetry retinal nerve fiber layer measurements.To classify healthy and glaucomatous eyes using relevance vector machine (RVM) and support vector machine (SVM) learning classifiers trained on retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements obtained by scanning laser polarimetry (SLP).Seventy-two eyes of 72 healthy control subjects (average age = 64.3 +/- 8.8 years, visual field mean deviation = -0.71 +/- 1.2 dB) and 92 eyes of 92 patients with glaucoma (average age = 66.9 +/- 8.9 years, visual field mean deviation = -5.32 +/- 4.0 dB) were imaged with SLP with variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC; Laser Diagnostic Technologies, San Diego, CA). RVM and SVM learning classifiers were trained and tested on SLP-determined RNFL thickness measurements from 14 standard parameters and 64 sectors (approximately 5.6 degrees each) obtained in the circumpapillary area under the instrument-defined measurement ellipse (total 78 parameters). Ten-fold cross-validation was used to train and test RVM and SVM classifiers on unique subsets of the full 164-eye data set and areas under the receiver operating characteristic (AUROC) curve for the classification of eyes in the test set were generated. AUROC curve results from RVM and SVM were compared to those for 14 SLP software-generated global and regional RNFL thickness parameters. Also reported was the AUROC curve for the GDx VCC software-generated nerve fiber indicator (NFI).The AUROC curves for RVM and SVM were 0.90 and 0.91, respectively, and increased to 0.93 and 0.94 when the training sets were optimized with sequential forward and backward selection (resulting in reduced dimensional data sets). AUROC curves for optimized RVM and SVM were significantly larger than those for all individual SLP parameters. The AUROC curve for the NFI was 0.87.Results from RVM and SVM trained on SLP RNFL thickness measurements are similar and provide accurate classification of glaucomatous and healthy eyes. RVM may be preferable to SVM, because it provides a Bayesian-derived probability of glaucoma as an output. These results suggest that these machine learning classifiers show good potential for glaucoma diagnosis.Glaucoma detection using scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal polarization compensation.To compare the ability of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) to discriminate between healthy and glaucomatous eyes with manufacturer-assumed fixed and subject-specific variable corneal polarization magnitude (CPM) and corneal polarization axis (CPA) values.An SLP was modified to enable the measurement of CPM and CPA values so that compensation for corneal birefringence could be corrected on a subject-specific variable basis. We examined 40 healthy eyes and 54 glaucomatous eyes with repeatable visual field damage (average +/- SD mean deviation, -6.5 +/- 4.9 dB) were examined by SLP using the manufacturer-assumed fixed corneal compensation (FCC-SLP) values and subject-specific variable corneal compensation (VCC-SLP) values. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve for discriminating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes using FCC-SLP and VCC-SLP parameters were compared.The areas under the ROC curve increased with VCC-SLP compared with FCC-SLP, particularly for all thickness parameters. The parameters with which the area under the ROC curve improved significantly from FCC-SLP to VCC-SLP included average thickness (ROC curve area, 0.62 vs 0.75), superior integral (0.66 vs 0.79), ellipse average (0.65 vs 0.80), inferior average (0.66 vs 0.80), and superior average (0.68 vs 0.83).Variable corneal compensation to correct for subject-specific CPM and CPA can improve the ability of SLP to discriminate between healthy and glaucomatous eyes.Glaucoma diagnostic performance of GDxVCC and spectralis OCT on eyes with atypical retardation pattern.To investigate the impact of typical scan score (TSS) on discriminating glaucomatous and healthy eyes by scanning laser polarimetry and spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) in 32 peripapillary sectors.One hundred two glaucoma patients and 32 healthy controls underwent standard automated perimetry, 24-hour intraocular pressure profile, optic disc photography, GDxVCC, and SD-OCT measurements. For controls, only very typical scans (TSS=100) were accepted. Glaucoma patients were divided into 3 subgroups (very typical: TSS=100; typical: 99≥TSS≥80, atypical: TSS<80). Receiver operating characteristic curves were constructed for mean retinal nerve fiber layer values, sector data, and nerve fiber indicator (NFI). Sensitivity was estimated at ≥90% specificity to compare the discriminating ability of each imaging modality.For discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes with very typical scans, the NFI and inferior sector analyses 26 to 27 demonstrated the highest sensitivity at ≥90% specificity in GDxVCC and SD-OCT, respectively. For the typical and atypical groups, sensitivity at ≥90% specificity decreased for all 32 peripapillary sectors on an average by 10.9% and 17.9% for GDxVCC and by 4.9% and 0.8% for SD-OCT. For GDxVCC, diagnostic performance of peripapillary sectors decreased with lower TSS, especially in temporosuperior and inferotemporal sectors (sensitivity at ≥90% specificity decreased by 55.3% and by 37.8% in the atypical group).Diagnostic accuracy is comparable for SD-OCT and GDxVCC if typical scans (TSS=100) are investigated. Decreasing TSS is associated with a decrease in diagnostic accuracy for discriminating healthy and glaucomatous eyes by scanning laser polarimetry. NFI is less influenced than the global or sector retinal nerve fiber layer thickness. The TSS score should be included in the standard printout. Diagnostic accuracy of SD-OCT is barely influenced by low TSS.Use of progressive glaucomatous optic disk change as the reference standard for evaluation of diagnostic tests in glaucoma.Progressive change in optic disk appearance has been suggested as the best available reference standard for glaucoma diagnosis. We evaluated the accuracy of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) with variable corneal compensation to discriminate patients with documented progressive optic disk change from healthy subjects.Observational case-control study.Glaucoma patients with documented evidence of progressive optic disk change as assessed by stereoscopic photographs were selected. Healthy control subjects had normal visual fields and normal clinical examination. All subjects underwent imaging with the GDx VCC scanning laser polarimeter. Receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) curves, sensitivities at fixed specificities, and likelihood ratios were calculated.Sixty-five eyes were healthy control patients. Seventy-one eyes had progressive optic disk change, of which 41 (58%) had abnormal visual field tests closest to the imaging date (perimetric glaucomatous optic neuropathy [GON]), and 30 (42%) eyes had normal visual fields (preperimetric GON). The GDx VCC parameter nerve fiber indicator performed best for discrimination between perimetric GON and normal eyes (AUC = 0.94; sensitivity = 93% for specificity > or =80%) as well as for the discrimination between preperimetric GON and normal eyes (AUC = 0.89; sensitivity = 83% for specificity > or =80%).SLP differentiated patients with documented progressive optic disk change from normal subjects and detected abnormalities in patients with confirmed diagnosis of preperimetric GON, suggesting that it may be useful for early glaucoma diagnosis. We suggest that progressive optic disk change should be used in the evaluation of diagnostic accuracy of imaging instruments for glaucoma.Glaucoma diagnostic ability of quadrant and clock-hour neuroretinal rim assessment using cirrus HD optical coherence tomography.The aim of this study was to investigate the glaucoma diagnostic ability of quadrant and clock-hour neuroretinal rim assessment by Cirrus HD spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (OCT).Eighty eyes of 80 glaucoma patients and 80 eyes of 80 healthy subjects were enrolled. Peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness was measured by Cirrus HD-OCT. Quadrant and clock-hour rim areas and thicknesses were obtained from optic nerve head images and 360° circumferential rim thickness curve of Cirrus HD-OCT, respectively. Area under receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) and sensitivities of RNFL thicknesses, rim areas, and rim thicknesses at a 90% specificity level were calculated.Quadrant and clock-hour rim area and thickness showed good diagnostic ability for glaucoma in all areas (AUCs, 0.877-0.969; sensitivities, 67.5%-96.3%). When the AUCs of RNFL thicknesses, rim areas, and rim thicknesses were compared, no significant difference was found in global area and superior and inferior quadrants (P > 0.05). However, in nasal and temporal quadrants, rim area and thickness had greater AUCs (AUCs, 0.919-0.945; sensitivities, 82.5%-86.3%) than RNFL thickness (AUCs, 0.749-0.776; sensitivities, 12.5%-33.8%; P < 0.001). Eyes with moderate to advanced glaucoma (mean deviation < -6 dB) had thinner RNFL than mild glaucoma (mean deviation ≥ -6 dB) in global area, superior, inferior, and temporal quadrants (P < 0.003); rim area and thickness showed no significant difference in all areas (P > 0.003).Neuroretinal rim assessment in nasal and temporal areas by Cirrus HD-OCT may enhance glaucoma diagnostic ability. RNFL and rim changes measured by Cirrus HD-OCT may be different according to the stages of glaucomatous damage.Detection of glaucoma using operator-dependent versus operator-independent classification in the Heidelberg retinal tomograph-III.To compare the abilities of a new Glaucoma Probability Scoring (GPS) system and Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) to differentiate between glaucomatous and normal eyes using Heidelberg retinal tomograph (HRT)-III software and race-specific databases.In this prospective study, one eye (refractive error < or =5 D) each of consecutive normal patients and those with glaucoma was enrolled. All patients underwent a full eye examination, standard achromatic perimetry (Swedish Interactive Threshold Algorithm-standard automated perimetry (SITA-SAP), program 24-2) and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (HRT-II) within 1 month. Normal patients had two normal visual fields in both eyes (pattern standard deviation (PSD) >5% and Glaucoma Hemifield Test within 97% normal limits) and a normal clinical examination. Glaucoma was defined on the basis of SITA-SAP visual field loss (PSD<5% or Glaucoma Hemifield Test outside normal limits) on two consecutive visual fields. HRT-II examinations were exported to the HRT-III software (V.3.0), which uses an enlarged race-specific database, consisting of 733 eyes of white people and 215 eyes of black people. Race-adjusted MRA for the most abnormal sector (operator-dependent contour line placement) was compared with the global race-adjusted GPS (operator independent). MRA sectors outside the 99.9% confidence interval limits (outside normal limits) and GPS > or =0.64 were considered abnormal.136 normal patients (72 black and 64 white patients) and 84 patients with glaucoma (52 black and 32 white patients) were enrolled (mean age 50.4 (SD 14.4) years). The average visual field mean deviation was (-)0.4 (SD 1.1) db for the normal group and (-)7.3 (SD 6.7) db for the glaucoma group (p<0.001). Mean GPS values were 0.21 (SD 0.23) and 0.73 (SD 0.27) for normal and glaucomatous eyes, respectively (p<0.001). Sensitivity and specificity values were 77.1% and 90.3% for GPS, and 71.4% and 91.9% for MRA, respectively.In this cohort, GPS software sensitivity and specificity values are similar to those of MRA, which requires placement of an operator-dependent contour line. The development of software to detect glaucoma without a contour line is critical to improving the potential use of HRT as a tool for glaucoma detection and screening.Comparison of Cirrus OCT and Stratus OCT on the ability to detect localized retinal nerve fiber layer defects in preperimetric glaucoma.To evaluate and compare the diagnostic ability of Cirrus and Stratus optical coherence tomography (OCT) to detect localized retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defects in patients with normal standard automated perimetry.This study included 55 eyes of 55 subjects with preperimetric localized RNFL defects and 55 normal control eyes of 55 age- and sex-matched subjects. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) were calculated and compared. Based on the internal normative database from each device, the sensitivity and specificity for detecting preperimetric localized RNFL defects were calculated.There was no statistically significant difference between the AUROCs for the best parameters from the Cirrus OCT (inferior thickness, AUROC = 0.728) and Stratus OCT (7 o'clock sector, AUROC = 0.760; P = 0.477). The sensitivity of the Cirrus OCT parameters ranged from 21.0% to 87.1% and that of the Stratus OCT parameters ranged from 4.8% to 30.7%, with the criterion of abnormal at the 5% level. Based on the normative database, the highest Cirrus OCT sensitivity was obtained with the deviation-from-normal map (sensitivity 87.1% and specificity 61.8%), and the highest Stratus OCT sensitivity was obtained with the TSNIT thickness graph (sensitivity 30.7% and specificity 85.5%).There were no significant differences between the AUROCs for Cirrus and Stratus OCT, indicating that the two devices have similar diagnostic potentials in preperimetric glaucoma. After comparison with their normative databases, Cirrus OCT had generally higher sensitivities; however, this was largely at the cost of lower specificities than Stratus OCT.Detection of macular ganglion cell loss in preperimetric glaucoma patients with localized retinal nerve fibre defects by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography.To evaluate and compare the utility of ganglion cell complex with peripapillary retinal nerve fibre layer and optic nerve head measurements for detection of localized defects in patients with preperimetric glaucoma using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography.Prospective study.Preperimetric glaucoma patients.A total of 105 eyes with preperimetric glaucoma and 68 age- and refractive error-matched control eyes were enrolled. The ability to detect localized retinal nerve fibre layer defects by RTVue-100 spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Optovue, Inc., Fremont, CA, USA) was assessed calculating the areas under receiver operating characteristic curves.The ability to detect localized retinal nerve fibre layer defects by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography.Global volume loss and superior ganglion cell complex thickness showed the largest area under receiver operating characteristic curve values (both areas under receiver operating characteristic curves 0.84, P < 0.001) among ganglion cell complex parameters. Average peripapillary retinal nerve fibre layer thickness afforded the best diagnostic capability (area under receiver operating characteristic curve 0.89, P < 0.001), whereas among optic nerve head parameters, the horizontal cup:disc ratio yielded the highest area under receiver operating characteristic curve (0.85, P < 0.001). No statistical difference was evident between the areas under receiver operating characteristic curves of the most informative parameters when the data were gathered from the three different sites (ganglion cell complex, peripapillary retinal nerve fibre layer, and optic nerve head) (P > 0.02).Ganglion cell complex thickness was significantly reduced in eyes with preperimetric glaucoma. Ganglion cell complex imaging using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography may be a useful ancillary modality for detection of early macular changes in glaucomatous eyes with localized retinal nerve fibre layer defects.Influence of disc size on optic nerve head versus retinal nerve fiber layer assessment for diagnosing glaucoma.To explore and compare the influence of optic disc size on the diagnostic accuracy of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness and optic nerve head (ONH) quantitative assessment.Observational, cross-sectional evaluation of diagnostic tests.We included 120 eyes from 50 normal subjects and 70 glaucomatous patients classified by the presence of a repeatable visual field defect for the analysis.The RNFL thickness was measured by scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensator (GDx-VCC, Carl-Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA) and spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Cirrus HD-OCT, Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc). We obtained ONH imaging by means of confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (HRT3; Heidelberg Engineering, GmbH, Dossenheim, Germany).Sensitivity and specificity for normative classifications, sensitivity at fixed specificity and area under the receiver operating characteristics curve (AUC) for continuous parameters. A logistic marginal regression model and coefficients of variation (CoV) have been used to test and quantify the influence of optic disc size on the diagnostic accuracy of the 3 technologies under investigation.Among continuous parameters average RNFL thickness for Cirrus HD-OCT, nerve fiber indicator for GDx-VCC and cup shape measure for the HRT3 showed the best diagnostic accuracy with an AUC of 0.97, 0.94, and 0.94, respectively. Among normative classifications, the highest sensitivity and specificity were found for OCT average RNFL thickness (75.8% and 94.7%), for GDx superior thickness (77.1% and 97.5%), for HRT3 Moorfields regression analysis result (89.4% and 73.7%) and for HRT3 GPS global (92.3% and 76.5%). The diagnostic performance of HRT3 parameters seemed to be significantly influenced by optic disc size, although the same was not true for Cirrus HD-OCT and GDx VCC. The most steady performers for each imaging device across disc size groups were Cirrus HD-OCT average thickness (CoV, 1.6%), GDx-VCC inferior thickness (CoV, 2.5%), and HRT3 GPS temporal and nasal (CoV, 21.4%).The diagnostic accuracy of quantitative RNFL assessment as performed by Cirrus HD-OCT and GDx-VCC is high and virtually unaffected or only minimally affected by the size of the optic disc and may provide more consistent diagnostic outcomes across small and large discs than ONH assessment as performed by HRT3.Analysis of GDx-VCC polarimetry data by Wavelet-Fourier analysis across glaucoma stages.The purpose of this study was to apply shape-based analysis techniques of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness to GDx-VCC (variable corneal and lens compensator; Laser Diagnostic Technologies, Inc., San Diego, CA) polarimetry data and to evaluate the techniques' ability to detect glaucoma in its earliest stages. Wavelet-based (wavelet-Fourier analysis [WFA]), Fourier-based (fast Fourier analysis [FFA]), and several previous variations of shape-based analysis were considered, as well as the standard metric nerve fiber indicator (NFI), and all were compared as a function of disease stage.GDx-VCC scans of one eye of each of 67 patients with glaucoma and each of 67 healthy age-matched subjects provided RNFL thickness estimates at a fixed distance from the optic disc. Severity of disease was graded according to the Glaucoma Staging System and also by mean deviation (MD) from standard automated perimetry. WFA, FFA, and NFI procedures were performed including the following variations: use of signed or unsigned phase, inclusion of interocular or intraocular asymmetry of analysis parameters, and combination of features by principle components analysis or Wilks lambda. Independent samples (k-fold variation) were used for training and testing. Sensitivity, specificity, and receiver operating characteristic (ROC) area were obtained.Classification performance of WFA (ROC = 0.978) was significantly better than FFA (ROC = 0.938) and NFI (ROC = 0.900). This difference was largest for the earliest stages of glaucoma. Shape-based analysis methods performed better than NFI overall. Adding between-eye asymmetry measures helped FFA but not WFA.Shape-based analysis, and WFA in particular, makes an important improvement in detecting earliest glaucoma with polarimetry.[Diagnostic ability of GDx VCC for glaucoma diagnosis].To assess the diagnostic ability of scanning laser polarimetry (GDx VCC) to differentiate between normal and glaucomatous eyes.417 eyes of 417 consecutive subjects were prospectively selected. They were classified into 60 healthy controls, 218 ocular hypertensive eyes, 68 glaucoma suspects, and 71 glaucomatous eyes, depending on intraocular pressure, optic nerve head morphology and standard automated perimetry results. All underwent a scanning laser polarimetry with the GDx VCC. Retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters of the GDx-VCC were compared among the four groups. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were plotted between normal and glaucomatous eyes. The best parameters were defined according to the area under the ROC curve and the best sensitivity/specificity balance.Most parameters of GDx-VCC exhibited differences between the glaucoma group and the rest of the groups. Some parameters were also different between healthy patients and glaucoma suspects. The best parameter was the nerve fiber indicator (NFI; area under the ROC curve: 0.876). NFI, superior normalized area, and inferior normalized area yielded the highest sensitivities at 85% and 90% fixed specificity.Most RNFL parameters measured with the GDx-VCC provided good diagnostic ability for open-angle glaucoma. The best GDx-VCC parameter in differentiating between normal and glaucomatous eyes was the NFI.The glaucoma detection capability of spectral-domain OCT and GDx-VCC deviation maps in early glaucoma patients with localized visual field defects.To evaluate and compare the glaucoma detection capabilities afforded by retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness and deviation maps obtained using Cirrus spectral domain optical coherence tomography (Cirrus OCT), and GDx employing variable corneal compensation (GDx-VCC) in glaucoma patients with early, localized visual field (VF) loss.This prospective controlled, comparative study was performed on 42 eyes with localized VF defects, and 42 age/refractive error-matched healthy eyes. All participants were imaged by both imaging devices at the same visit. The area of the RNFL defect in each deviation map, corresponding to a VF defect, was analyzed by direct counting of color-coded superpixels in each device. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed and compared between Cirrus OCT and GDx-VCC.The areas under the ROCs (AUCs) of RNFL quadrant thicknesses in hemifields with visual field (VF) defects did not differ significantly (Cirrus OCT; 0.961, GDx-VCC; 0.919, P = 0.07). However, Cirrus OCT afforded a better diagnostic ability, by deviation map analysis, than did GDx-VCC (0.972 vs 0.887, P = 0.02).The RNFL thicknesses assessed by either Cirrus OCT or GDx-VCC were comparable in terms of early glaucoma diagnostic capability. However, when areas containing RNFL defects were analyzed via deviation mapping, Cirrus OCT was better than GDx-VCC.Comparison of the diagnostic accuracies of the Spectralis, Cirrus, and RTVue optical coherence tomography devices in glaucoma.To compare the diagnostic accuracies of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements obtained with the Spectralis (Heidelberg Engineering, Dossenheim, Germany), Cirrus (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA), and RTVue (Optovue Inc., Fremont, CA) devices for the detection of glaucoma.Diagnostic, case-control study.A total of 233 (107 healthy, 126 glaucomatous) of 149 participants from the longitudinal Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study (DIGS) and from the African Descent and Glaucoma Evaluation Study (ADAGES).All participants underwent RNFL thickness imaging with the Spectralis, Cirrus, and RTVue devices in the same visit. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves adjusted for age and race were obtained for quadrants (superior, nasal, inferior, temporal) and global RNFL thickness for all instruments. Areas under ROC (AUC) and sensitivities at fixed specificities (80% and 95%) were calculated and compared.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy using AUCs and sensitivities at fixed specificities of 80% and 95%.The RNFL thickness parameter with the largest AUCs was the superior quadrant for the Spectralis (0.88) and the global RNFL thickness for the Cirrus (0.88) and the RTVue (0.87). The pairwise comparison among the ROC curves showed no statistical difference for all parameters except for the nasal quadrant, which had significantly larger AUC in the Spectralis and RTVue compared with the Cirrus (P<0.03 for both comparisons). There were no significant differences in sensitivities among the best parameters from each instrument (P>0.05). The superior quadrant thickness measured with the Spectralis had sensitivity of 81.9% at a fixed specificity of 80% and 70% at a fixed specificity of 95%. The global thickness measured by the Cirrus had a sensitivity of 80.3% at a fixed specificity of 80% and 65.6% at a fixed specificity of 95%. For the RTVue, the global thickness had a sensitivity of 77.9% at a fixed specificity of 80% and 62.1% at a fixed specificity of 95%.Although the spectral-domain optic coherence tomography (SD-OCT) instruments have different resolution and acquisition rates, their ability to detect glaucoma was similar.Glaucoma probability score vs Moorfields classification in normal, ocular hypertensive, and glaucomatous eyes.To evaluate the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph III (HRT III) glaucoma probability score in differentiating normal from pathologic eyes and to compare the glaucoma probability score with Moorfields regression analysis (MRA).Prospective cross-sectional study.Fifty-nine normal, 40 hypertensive, and 83 glaucomatous eyes were examined with Swedish interactive threshold algorithm standard 24-2 visual fields and HRT III. Sensitivity and specificity were evaluated using global and sectorial glaucoma probability score and MRA compared with damage in visual fields. Areas under receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were evaluated. Agreement between MRA and glaucoma probability score was calculated using the kappa coefficient. Glaucoma probability score was considered to be displaced when a symbol was outside and the opposite symbol was inside the optic disk.MRA sensitivity and specificity were 39.8% and 93.2% (most specific criteria) and 68.7% and 83.1% (least specific criteria), respectively. Glaucoma probability score sensitivity and specificity were 71.1% and 69.5% (most specific criteria) and 85.5% and 54.2% (least specific criteria), respectively. Visual field parameters were related to the global (P = .001) and sectorial (P < .05) glaucoma probability score. A displaced glaucoma probability score was found in 35 eyes, but with unchanged glaucoma probability score sensitivity and specificity. Areas under the ROC curves of glaucoma probability score was 0.77. The kappa coefficient was 0.34.Glaucoma probability score analysis tends to be more sensitive but less specific than MRA. Glaucoma probability score did not differentiate normal and hypertensives eyes. When displaced, glaucoma probability score sensitivity and specificity were unchanged. MRA and glaucoma probability score agreement was low. Glaucoma probability score is advantageous over MRA in early-stage glaucoma.Comparison of two different spectral domain optical coherence tomography devices in the detection of localized retinal nerve fiber layer defects.To compare the detection of localized retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defects by two different spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) devices.Eyes of 42 normal control subjects and 48 patients with a localized RNFL defect on red-free fundus photographs were imaged by the Cirrus (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA, USA) and 3D OCT (Topcon, Tokyo, Japan) devices. We compared sensitivities, specificities, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) of circumpapillary RNFL (cpRNFL) thickness and ganglion cell complex (GCC) parameters between the two devices.The devices provided different cpRNFL thickness measurements. The highest sensitivities at fixed specificities of 80 % (Cirrus: 83.3 %; 3D OCT: 77.1 %) and 95 % (Cirrus: 69.8 %; 3D OCT: 68.8 %) and the largest AUCs (Cirrus: 0.90; 3D OCT: 0.88) obtained by the cpRNFL parameters of the two devices were similar. Based on the internal normative database, the deviation-from-normal map of the Cirrus OCT device and the 36-segment map of the 3D OCT device had the highest sensitivity (89.6 and 91.7 %, respectively). Among the macular GCC parameters of the 3D OCT device, inferior macular RNFL thickness had the highest sensitivity (81.2 % at a specificity of 80 %) and the largest AUC (0.89).Although the two SD-OCT devices have different measurement protocols, they showed similar abilities for the detection of a localized RNFL defect.Ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer thickness of high definition optical coherence tomography in perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma.We determined the diagnostic performance of ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) parameters of high definition optical coherence tomography (HD-OCT) in perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma, and compared it to optic nerve head (ONH) and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters.In a cross-sectional study, 53 eyes of normal subjects and 83 eyes of glaucoma patients (62 perimetric and 21 preperimetric) from the Longitudinal Glaucoma Evaluation Study (LOGES) underwent HD-OCT imaging with Optic Disc and Macular Cube protocols. Diagnostic abilities of GCIPL, ONH, and RNFL parameters were determined using area under receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC) and likelihood ratios (LR).The AUCs of GCIPL parameters to diagnose perimetric glaucoma ranged from 0.84 to 0.90. The same of ONH and RNFL parameters ranged from 0.88 to 0.97 and 0.56 to 0.94, respectively. The AUCs of GCIPL, ONH, and RNFL parameters to diagnose preperimetric glaucoma ranged from 0.55 to 0.63, 0.77 to 0.92, and 0.39 to 0.80, respectively. For diagnosing preperimetric glaucoma, AUCs of all GCIPL parameters were significantly lower (P < 0.05) than those of the global ONH (vertical cup-to-disc ratio [CDR]; AUC, 0.92) and RNFL (average RNFL; AUC, 0.79) parameters. Outside normal limits category of GCIPL parameters also were associated with significantly smaller effects on the posttest probability of perimetric and preperimetric glaucoma.The diagnostic ability of GCIPL parameters was similar to that of ONH and peripapillary RNFL parameters in perimetric glaucoma. However, in preperimetric glaucoma, the diagnostic ability of GCIPL parameters was significantly lower than that of ONH and RNFL parameters.Diagnostic accuracy of nerve fibre layer, macular thickness and optic disc measurements made with the RTVue-100 optical coherence tomograph to detect glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of retinal nerve fibre layer thickness (RNFLT), ganglion cell complex (GCC), and optic disc measurements made with the RTVue-100 Fourier-domain optical coherence tomography (OCT) to detect glaucoma in a Caucasian referral population.One randomly selected eye of 286 Caucasian patients (93 healthy, 36 ocular hypertensive, 46 preperimetric glaucoma, and 111 perimetric glaucoma eyes) was evaluated.Using the software-provided classification, for the total population sensitivity did not exceed 73.6% for the optic nerve head parameters, and 62.7% for the other parameters. Specificity was high (94.6-100%) for most RNFLT and GCC parameters, but low (72.0-76.3%) for the optic disc parameters. Positive predictive value varied between 98.1 and 100% for the main RNFLT parameters, 92.6 and 100% for the 16 RNFLT sectors, 92.4 and 99.0% for the GCC parameters, but did not exceed 86.3% for any of the optic disc parameters. Positive likelihood ratio (PLR) was higher than 10 for average, inferior and superior RNFLT (25.5 to infinite), 12 of the 16 RNFLT sectors (12.6 to infinite), and three of the four GCC parameters (40.0 to 48.6). No optic disc parameter had a PLR higher than 3.0.RNFLT and GCC parameters of the RTVue-100 Fourier-domain OCT showed moderate sensitive but high specificity, positive predictive value and PLR for detection of glaucoma. The optic disc parameters had lower diagnostic accuracy than the RNFLT and GCC parameters.Diagnostic accuracy of the GDx VCC for glaucoma.To determine the diagnostic accuracy of the GDx VCC in the diagnosis of glaucoma.Prospective, comparative, observational, clinic-based case series.One eye each of 77 healthy subjects and 162 patients with primary open-angle glaucoma of Caucasian racial origin. Healthy subjects had normal visual fields (VFs), healthy-looking optic discs, and intraocular pressures of < or =21 mmHg in both eyes. Glaucoma patients had a reproducible glaucomatous VF defect and a glaucomatous appearance of the optic disc in at least one eye.All subjects were measured with the GDx VCC with an automated variable corneal compensator. We constructed receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves for all available parameters. Subsequently, we calculated sensitivity, specificity, and multilevel likelihood ratios for the best discriminating parameter in the entire group. In addition, we calculated sensitivity and specificity in patients with mild, moderate, and severe glaucomatous damage separately.Software-derived parameters TSNIT (temporal, superior, nasal, inferior, temporal) Average, Superior Average, Inferior Average, TSNIT Std. Dev. (standard deviation), and Nerve Fiber Indicator (NFI).The areas under the ROC curve for TSNIT Average, Superior Average, Inferior Average, TSNIT Std. Dev., and NFI were 0.93, 0.94, 0.90, 0.92, and 0.98, respectively. For the best discriminating parameter NFI, the sensitivity and specificity with a cutoff point of > or =40 were 89.0% and 95.9%, respectively. The multilevel likelihood ratios for glaucoma were 0.07 at NFI values of <35, 1.30 at values between 35 and 44, and 61.50 at values of > or =44. At the cutoff level of > or =40, the sensitivities of the NFI for correctly identifying glaucoma patients with mild, moderate, and severe damage were 83.8%, 92.9%, and 90.1%, respectively.The GDx VCC allowed easy, rapid, and accurate discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes. The NFI was the best discriminating parameter. The GDx VCC seems to fulfill criteria for a glaucoma screening device.Diagnostic power of optic disc morphology, peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer thickness, and macular inner retinal layer thickness in glaucoma diagnosis with fourier-domain optical coherence tomography.To evaluate the capability of the optic disc, peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (P-RNFL), macular inner retinal layer (M-IRL) parameters, and their combination obtained by Fourier-domain optical coherent tomography (OCT) in differentiating a glaucoma suspect from perimetric glaucoma.Two hundred and twenty eyes from 220 patients were enrolled in this study. The optic disc morphology, P-RNFL, and M-IRL were assessed by the Fourier-domain OCT (RTVue OCT, Model RT100, Optovue, Fremont, CA). A linear discriminant function was generated by stepwise linear discriminant analysis on the basis of OCT parameters and demographic factors. The diagnostic power of these parameters was evaluated with receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve analysis. The diagnostic power in the clinically relevant range (specificity ≥ 80%) was presented as the partial area under the ROC curve (partial AROC).The individual OCT parameter with the largest AROC and partial AROC in the high specificity (≥ 80%) range were cup/disc vertical ratio (AROC = 0.854 and partial AROC = 0.142) for the optic disc parameters, average thickness (AROC = 0.919 and partial AROC = 0.147) for P-RNFL parameters, inferior hemisphere thickness (AROC = 0.871 and partial AROC = 0.138) for M-IRL parameters, respectively. The linear discriminant function further enhanced the ability in detecting perimetric glaucoma (AROC = 0.970 and partial AROC = 0.172).Average P-RNFL thickness is the optimal individual OCT parameter to detect perimetric glaucoma. Simultaneous evaluation on disc morphology, P-RNFL, and M-IRL thickness can improve the diagnostic accuracy in diagnosing glaucoma.Comparing the ganglion cell complex and retinal nerve fibre layer measurements by Fourier domain OCT to detect glaucoma in high myopia.To compare the diagnostic ability to detect glaucomatous changes between peripapillary retinal nerve fibre layer (RNFL) thickness and the macular ganglion cell complex (GCC) in highly myopic patients using Fourier domain optical coherence tomography.Participants, consecutively enrolled from January 2009 to June 2009, were imaged with RTVue-100 (NHM4 and MM7 scan). The sensitivity and specificity of a colour code less than 5% (red or yellow) for glaucoma diagnosis were calculated. Area under the receiver operator characteristic (AUROC) curves were generated to assess the ability of each parameter to detect glaucomatous changes.73 normal controls and 77 glaucoma patients were included. Participants were categorised as 105 non-high myopes (spherical equivalent >-6.0 dioptres) and 45 high myopes (Spherical equivalent ≤-6.0 dioptres). The GCC thickness showed a strong correlation with RNFL thickness (correlation coefficient=0.763, p<0.001) in all participants. The sensitivity from superior GCC colour code was significantly higher than that from superior RNFL (p=0.019). The ability to detect glaucomatous changes in the highly myopic group by examining the average GCC thickness (AUROC, GCC; 0.889) was higher than when examining RNFL thickness (AUROC, RNFL; 0.825); however, there was no statistical significance (p=0.442).The ability to diagnose glaucoma with macular GCC thickness was comparable with that with peripapillary RNFL thickness in high-myopia patients. Macular GCC thickness measurements may be a good alternative or a complementary measurement to RNFL thickness assessment in the clinical evaluation of glaucoma in patients with high myopia.Comparison of different spectral domain optical coherence tomography scanning areas for glaucoma diagnosis.To evaluate retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), optic nerve head (ONH), and macular thickness measurements for glaucoma detection using the RTVue spectral domain optical coherence tomograph.Diagnostic, case-control study.One hundred forty eyes of 106 glaucoma patients and 74 eyes of 40 healthy subjects from the Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study (DIGS).All patients underwent ocular imaging with the commercially available RTVue. Optic nerve head, RNFL thickness, and macular thickness scans were obtained during the same visit. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves and sensitivities at fixed specificities (80% and 95%) were calculated for each parameter.Areas under the ROC curves (AUC) and sensitivities at fixed specificities of 80% and 95%.The AUC for the RNFL parameter with best performance, inferior quadrant thickness, was significantly higher than that of the best-performing ONH parameter, inferior rim area (0.884 vs 0.812, respectively; P = 0.04). There was no difference between ROC curve areas of the best RNFL thickness parameters and the best inner macular thickness measurement, ganglion cell complex root mean square (ROC curve area = 0.870).The RTVue RNFL and inner retinal macular thickness measurements had good ability to detect eyes with glaucomatous visual field loss and performed significantly better than ONH parameters.Cirrus high-definition optical coherence tomography versus spectral optical coherence tomography/scanning laser ophthalmoscopy in the diagnosis of glaucoma.This study was performed to compare the positive predictive value of peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness measurements obtained using Cirrus high-definition optical coherence tomography (Cirrus HD-OCT; Carl Zeiss Meditec, Dublin, CA) and spectral OCT/scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (SLO) (OPKO/OTI, Miami, FL) in the diagnosis of glaucoma.A total of 50 eyes of 50 healthy subjects and 60 eyes of 60 subjects with glaucoma were included. All participants underwent RNFL thickness measurement using Cirrus HD-OCT and spectral OCT/SLO on the same day. Average, quadrant, clock-hour RNFL thicknesses, area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUC), and sensitivities at fixed specificities (80% and 95%) were calculated for comparison.RNFL thickness as measured by spectral OCT/SLO was greater than that measured using Cirrus HD-OCT (p < 0.001). For both the Cirrus HD-OCT and spectral OCT/SLO, the parameter with the largest AUC was average RNFL thickness (0.954 and 0.944, respectively). The AUCs of RNFL thickness for the discrimination of glaucoma did not differ significantly between the devices (p > 0.05), with the exception of RNFL thickness in the nasal area (nasal quadrant, clock-hour sectors 3 and 4); in these areas, spectral OCL/SLO yielded greater AUCs than Cirrus HD-OCT (p < 0.05). Sensitivities varied similarly to AUCs.RNFL thicknesses measures using Cirrus HD-OCT and spectral OCT/SLO were not interchangeable. The utility of RNFL thickness measurements in the diagnosis of glaucoma was similar for both the devices.Oculus-Spark perimetry compared with 3 procedures of glaucoma morphologic analysis (GDx, HRT, and OCT).To compare diagnostic capabilities and agreement between Oculus-Spark perimetry and 3 procedures of glaucoma morphologic analysis.A total of 102 normal eyes and 104 consecutive eyes with suspected or confirmed glaucoma (1 eye per subject) were analyzed in a prospective observational case-control study, using Spark strategy (Oculus Easyfield Perimeter), Heidelberg retinal tomograph (HRT), Zeiss laser polarimetry (GDx), and Cirrus optical coherence tomography (OCT).Spark first phase lasted 37 seconds and all 4 phases 2:34 minutes. Specificities and sensitivities were as follows: Spark mean deviation (MD) first phase (95.1%, 85.6%), MD second and final phases (95.1%, 86.5%), GDx-nerve fiber indicator (95.1%, 57.4%), HRT-Reinhard Burk discriminant function (95.1%, 52.9%), HRT glaucoma probability score (95.1%, 71.2%), Cirrus OCT vertical cup/disc ratio (96.1%, 85.6%), and Cirrus OCT retinal nerve fiber layer thickness (95.1%, 68.0%). Diagnostic agreement between second and final Spark MD phases was kappa=0.92; between phase 1 Spark/MD and Cirrus OCT/vertical C/D ratio was kappa=0.78. Agreements between the 2 Cirrus OCT indices was kappa=0.69 and between the 2 HRT indices was kappa=0.559. The correlation coefficient between second and final MD and PSD was 0.99, and 0.98 between the number of scotomatous points. There was high concordance in scotoma position in both phases (kappa=0.86). The linear correlation coefficients between the morphologic indices were 0.48-0.78, and between morphologic and functional indices 0.51-0.76. Correlation coefficients comparing morphologic and functional indices were similar in the first and the last phase (p>0.05 in all cases).Spark perimetry appears to show useful sensitivity and specificity, even in the first phase, and good agreement with the morphology.Comparison between deviation map algorithm and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer measurements using Cirrus HD-OCT in the detection of localized glaucomatous visual field defects.To compare the capability of the deviation map algorithm and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (pRNFL) thickness measurements, both determined using Cirrus spectral domain optical coherence tomography (Carl Zeiss Meditec Inc., Dublin, CA), in discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes.This cross-sectional comparative prospective study included 54 patients with glaucoma with localized visual field (VF) defects confined to 1 hemifield and 54 normal controls. Mean pRNFL thickness corresponding to localized VF defect was calculated. A deviation Score (DS) was assigned by customized Image J software (Http://www.rsb.info.hih.gov/ij/18) calculating the number of abnormal superpixels in the deviation maps corresponding to localized VF defect. Correlations between DS and mean pRNFL thickness, and VF parameters were obtained. The areas under receiver operating characteristic curves of the DS and mean pRNFL thickness used for discriminating between controls and glaucomatous eyes were compared.DS and the average pRNFL thickness measurements showed a strong correlation (R, -0.844, P<0.0001). There were also significant correlations between DS, mean deviation (MD), and pattern standard deviation (R, -0.678, 0.699, respectively). The areas under receiver operating characteristic curves of the mean pRNFL thickness (0.892) and DS (0.958) differed significantly (P=0.0051). The sensitivities at 80%, 90%, and 95% specificities were 94.4%, 90.6%, and 88.6%, respectively, for DS and 74.5%, 58.8%, and 47.3%, for mean pRNFL thickness.The deviation map algorithm showed a superior capability for detection of localized glaucomatous VF defects when compared with traditional pRNFL thickness measurements. There were statistically significant correlations between the deviation map algorithm and VF indices.Comparison of diagnostic accuracy of the RTVue Fourier-domain OCT and the GDx-VCC/ECC polarimeter to detect glaucoma.To compare sensitivity and specificity of retinal nerve fiber layer thickness (RNFLT) measurements made using RTVue-100 Fourier-domain optical coherence tomography (RTVue-OCT) and scanning laser polarimetry with variable (GDx-VCC) or enhanced compensation (GDx-ECC).One eye of each of 177 consecutive patients was imaged. Healthy (n=50) and ocular hypertensive (n = 28) eyes were defined as structurally undamaged, preperimetric (n=33) and perimetric (n=66) glaucoma eyes as diseased.For average RNFLT, sensitivity was higher (χ(2) test, p=0.002) with RTVue-OCT (65.7%) than with GDx-VCC (49.5%). For superior and inferior RNFLT, sensitivity was similar with all methods. For the different nerve fiber bundle parameters, sensitivity of RTVue-OCT (64.6% to 84.8%) was consistently up to 35% higher (p<0.001) than that of GDx-VCC/ECC (28.3% to 72.7%). Specificity ranged from 84.6% to 98.7% with RTVue-OCT, 92.3% to 100% with GDx-VCC, and 94.9% to 100% with GDx-ECC, with no significant difference between the methods except for one nerve fiber bundle parameter, for which RTVue-OCT was less specific than either GDx method (p ≤ 0.004). Diagnostic accuracy of the GDx-VCC/ECC nerve fiber indicator (NFI) and RTVue-OCT average RNFLT were similar. Of the detected glaucoma cases, 87.7% were identified both by GDx-VCC/ECC NFI and average RNFLT of RTVue-OCT.In this clinical setting, all methods were similarly highly specific, but for localized RNFLT damage RTVue-OCT was statistically and clinically significantly more sensitive than GDx-VCC and GDx-ECC. Most detected glaucoma cases were identified with all 3 methods.Diagnostic capability of Fourier-Domain optical coherence tomography in early primary open angle glaucoma.Optical coherence tomography (OCT) is a high resolution noncontact imaging modality which can quantitatively detect the optic disc and retinal structure. This study was designed to evaluate the diagnostic capability of parameters of the optic disc, retinal nerve fiber layer thickness, and ganglion cell complex (GCC) using a new technology called Fourier-domain OCT (FD-OCT) for early primary open angle glaucoma (POAG) patients.Two groups of patients, early perimetric damage POAG and normal subjects were included in this observational cross-sectional study. All patients underwent FD-OCT and visual field examination in addition to full ophthalmic examinations. Receiver operating characteristic curves (ROC) were studied for all parameters. The sensitivity and specificity for distinguishing between normal and early glaucomatous eyes, the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AROC) and positive, negative likelihood ratios were evaluated for all the single parameters and selected combined parameters using arbitrary cutoffs.Thirty-four eyes of 34 early POAG patients and 42 eyes of 42 normal subjects were analyzed. Cup/disc (C/D) vertical ratio presented the best sensitivity and positive likelihood ratio for selected specificities (95% and 85%) which were 79.4% and 88.2%, 33.4 and 7.4, respectively. Among all single parameters, the C/D vertical ratio demonstrated the highest AROC which was at 0.930. The average thickness of circumpapillary RNFL on 3.45 mm showed the highest AROC among all of the peripapillary RNFL parameters. The sensitivity at selected specificity and AROC of GCC were not as high as C/D vertical ratio and RNFL AT on 3.45 mm. When the C/D vertical ratio, RNFL AT on 3.45 mm, and rim area were combined using a logistical diagnostic model, the AROC was raised to 0.949 but not significantly different from the top single parameter, C/D vertical ratio.The key parameters obtained by FD-OCT were able to show the significant differences of optic discs, thickness of RNFL and GCC between POAG patients and normal subjects. According to sensitivity, specificity, likelihood ratio and AROC, the top three parameters from FD-OCT for early diagnosis of POAG were C/D vertical ratio, RNFL AT on 3.45 mm, and the rim area.Effect of optic disc size and disease severity on the diagnostic capability of glaucoma imaging technologies in an Indian population.To evaluate the influence of optic disc size and disease severity on the diagnostic validity of optical coherence tomography (Stratus OCT), scanning laser polarimetry [GDx variable corneal compensator (VCC)], and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy [Heidelberg retina tomograph II (HRT II)] in Indian eyes with glaucoma.Ninety-five normal and 125 glaucoma patients underwent imaging with Stratus OCT, GDx VCC, and HRT II. One eye of each person was randomly selected for analysis. Using disc area determined on HRT II, discs were classified as small (<2 mm), moderate (2 to 3 mm), and large (>3 mm). The parameter with the best sensitivity for each device, at a fixed specificity, was compared for different disc sizes. Logistic marginal regression was used to study the effect of disc size and disease severity (mean deviation on standard automated perimetry) on the diagnostic performance of these imaging devices.At a fixed specificity of 84.2%, the sensitivity of HRT II was significantly different for varying disc sizes (P=0.0004). The sensitivities for dissimilar disc sizes were not significantly different for the GDx VCC (P=0.928) or Stratus OCT (P=0.381). Logistic marginal regression also showed that sensitivity of HRT II increased with increasing disc size, whereas sensitivity of OCT and GDx were independent of the disc size. The sensitivity of all 3 technologies increased with increasing disease severity (decreasing mean deviation).Optic disc size affects the diagnostic capability of HRT II but not that of GDx VCC or Stratus OCT. The sensitivity of all 3 imaging technologies increased with increasing disease severity.Diagnostic ability of Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 classifications: glaucoma probability score versus Moorfields regression analysis.To evaluate the usefulness of the glaucoma probability score (GPS), which does not require manual outlining of the disc boundaries, and the Moorfields regression classification (MRA), which requires manual outlining of the disc boundaries, for discriminating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes, using the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph.Cross-sectional study.We prospectively selected 71 consecutive healthy subjects and 115 consecutive patients with open-angle glaucoma.Participants were divided into 2 groups depending on the results of standard automated perimetry and intraocular pressure. All participants underwent imaging of the optic nerve head with the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3. All tests were performed within 1 month of each subject's date of enrollment into the study by examiners masked to the other findings.The sensitivity and specificity of all parameters of the MRA and GPS classifications were calculated. The diagnostic accuracy at different severities of glaucoma and optic disc sizes was also evaluated. Receiver operating characteristic curves were plotted for the GPS values.The MRA global classification had a sensitivity of 73.9% and a specificity of 91.5%. The GPS global classification had a sensitivity of 58.2% and a specificity of 94.4%. The GPS had slightly higher sensitivity and somewhat lower specificity than the MRA when there was mild damage indicated by visual field tests. The MRA had the best discrimination capability for moderate and severe glaucoma. Both the GPS and MRA had lower sensitivity and higher specificity for small optic discs (<1.7 mm2) compared with medium and large discs.In general, the diagnostic performance of the GPS was similar to that of the MRA. The diagnostic accuracy of both classifications depends on the optic disc size and the glaucoma severity.Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography for early glaucoma assessment: analysis of macular ganglion cell complex versus peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer.We sought to compare the glaucoma discrimination ability of macular inner retinal layer (MIRL) thickness with that of conventional peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (pRNFL) thickness as measured by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) in patients with early glaucoma.Cross-sectional study.We studied 67 patients with early glaucoma (visual field mean deviation index ≥-6 dB), and 56 healthy subjects were prospectively enrolled.All patients underwent MIRL thickness measurement (ganglion cell complex [GCC] scan) and pRNFL thickness measurement (3.45 mm scan) by SD-OCT. Whenever both eyes were eligible, one was randomly selected. Receiver operating characteristic curves and sensitivities at fixed specificities were generated for different parameters. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) of each parameter were compared.The average mean deviation for the glaucomatous eyes was -2.5 ± 1.6 dB. The AUCs for average (0.815); superior (0.807); and inferior (0.788) MIRL thicknesses were not significantly different (p ≥ 0.18). The AUCs for average (0.735); superior (0.728); and inferior (0.697) pRNFL thicknesses were also similar (p ≥ 0.15). Average MIRL thickness had a significantly larger AUC compared to average pRNFL thickness analysis (0.815 vs 0.735; p = 0.03). Sensitivities at 80% specificity for average MIRL and pRNFL thicknesses were 66.7% (cutoff, 89.9 μm) and 62.9% (cutoff, 111.8 μm), respectively.The GCC scan showed a similar or even a slightly better ability to discriminate between healthy and early glaucomatous eyes compared to the pRNFL scan. Different from previous analyses considering total macular thickness, the GCC macular scan seems to be a useful tool for identification of early structural damage in patients with glaucoma.Linear discriminant analysis and artificial neural network for glaucoma diagnosis using scanning laser polarimetry-variable cornea compensation measurements in Taiwan Chinese population.To determine whether linear discriminant analysis (LDA) and artificial neural network (ANN) can improve the differentiation between glaucomatous and normal eyes in a Taiwan Chinese population, based on the retinal nerve fiber layer thickness measurement data from scanning laser polarimetry-variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC).This study comprised 79 glaucoma (visual field defect, mean deviation: -5.60 +/- 4.23 dB) and 86 healthy subjects (visual field defect, mean deviation: -1.44 +/- 1.72 dB). Each patient received complete ophthalmological evaluation, standard automated perimetry (SAP), and GDx VCC exam. One eye per subject was considered for further analysis. The area under the receiver operating characteristics (AROC) curve, sensitivity, specificity and the best cut-off value for each parameter were calculated. The diagnostic performance of artificial neural network (ANN) and linear discriminant analysis (LDA) for glaucoma detection using GDx VCC measurements will be compared in this study.The individual parameter with the best AROC curve for differentiating between normal and glaucomatous eye was nerve fiber indicator (NFI, 0.932). The highest AROCs for the LDA and ANN methods were 0.950 and 0.970 respectively.NFI, ANN and LDF method demonstrated equal diagnostic power in glaucoma detection in a Taiwan Chinese population.Scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation and detection of glaucomatous optic neuropathy.The aim of this study was to evaluate the ability of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) parameters provided by commercially available GDx with variable corneal compensator (VCC) to discriminate between healthy and glaucomatous eyes.Sixty-five healthy and 59 glaucomatous age-matched patients underwent a complete ophthalmological evaluation, an achromatic automated perimetry (AAP), and SLP with GDx-VCC. One randomly selected eye from each subject was considered. All glaucomatous eyes had reproducible visual field defects. Mean values (+/- SD) of all SLP-VCC parameters measured in the two groups were compared. Area under receiver operating characteristics (AUROC) curve and sensitivities at predetermined specificities of >or=80% and >or=95% for each single parameter were calculated. Moreover, the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) diagnostic accuracy was evaluated calculating positive, negative, and interval likelihood ratios (LRs) at different cutoff values.All SLP parameters were significantly different between the two groups (p<0.001). The NFI showed the best AUROC curve (0.938, SE 0.02) whereas temporal, superior, nasal, inferior, temporal (TSNIT) average was second best (0.897, SE 0.03), and normalized superior area was third (0.879, SE 0.04). At fixed specificity >or=95%, sensitivities ranged from 22% to 79.7% whereas for values >or=80%, sensitivities were in the 44.1-89.8% range. At a cutoff NFI value of 30, positive LR was 17.6 (95% CI: 5.8-53.6) and negative LR was 0.19 (95% CI: 0.11-0.33). Interval LRs for NFI showed that values <or=20 or >40 were associated with large effects on posttest probability.SLP-VCC allows good discrimination between healthy and glaucomatous eyes. New software-provided parameters NFI, TSNIT average, and normalized superior and inferior areas appear to be reliable in the evaluation of glaucomatous disease. In particular, after evaluation on interval LRs, the NFI showed a high diagnostic accuracy for values <or=20 or >40.The applicability of ganglion cell complex parameters determined from SD-OCT images to detect glaucomatous eyes.To determine whether the thicknesses of the different parameters of the ganglion cell complex (GCC) and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer can be used to differentiate eyes with glaucoma from normal eyes.Two hundred sixty-one eyes, including 68 normal eyes and 32 preperimetric glaucoma, 81 early glaucoma, and 80 advanced glaucoma were analyzed in the present study. The thicknesses of the GCC and retinal nerve fiber layer were measured using RTVue spectral-domain optical coherence tomographic (SD-OCT) images. The area under the receiver operating characteristic (AUROC) curve and sensitivities at fixed specificities were calculated for each parameter. A logistic regression analysis was used to determine the risk factors for glaucoma.The 2 largest AUROC curves for all glaucoma stages were those for the GCC parameters. The global loss volume (GLV) was always one of the 2 highest values of the AUROC curve. The GLV also had the highest sensitivity at a fixed specificity to identify glaucoma at early and advanced stage. The focal loss volume (FLV) had the largest AUROC curve value and the highest sensitivity at a fixed specificity for advanced glaucoma. The logistic regression analysis showed that the GLV was one of the factors that predicted preperimetric glaucoma [odds ratio (OR)=1.74] and early glaucoma (OR=1.22), whereas the FLV was useful for detecting advanced glaucoma (OR=2.32).The SD-OCT-derived macular GCC parameters can be used to detect preperimetric and perimetric glaucoma. The new GCC parameters, GLV and FLV, performed well in discriminating glaucomatous eyes from normal eyes.Asymmetry analysis of macular inner retinal layers for glaucoma diagnosis.To determine if asymmetry in thickness of the retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL), ganglion cell layer, ganglion cell complex, and total retina between upper and lower macula halves can predict glaucoma.Retrospective case-control series.One hundred twenty-two eyes of 122 patients (30 normal eyes and 30 preperimetric, 31 early, and 31 advanced glaucoma eyes) were studied. The RNFL, ganglion cell layer, ganglion cell complex, and total retina were segmented and measured on 10 vertical B-scans over a 30 × 15 degree macular area. The equation asymmetry index =|log10 (lower hemiretinal thickness/upper hemiretinal thickness)| was used to calculate asymmetry indices for 8 pairs of upper and lower 0.5-mm segments equidistant from the fovea on each scan. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROCs) for mean thickness and mean asymmetry index of 10 B-scans were compared.The overlap in values for normal and glaucomatous eyes was minimal for the ganglion cell layer asymmetry index. Thickness parameters decreased with the severity of glaucoma, whereas asymmetry indices did not. AROCs for thickness measurements tended to increase with increasing glaucoma severity (preperimetric, 0.746-0.808; early, 0.842-0.940; advanced, 0.943-0.995), whereas AROCs for asymmetry indices did not have distinct ranges according to glaucoma severity (advanced, 0.819-0.996; early, 0.861-0.998; preperimetric, 0.773-0.994). The AROC for the ganglion cell layer asymmetry index remained almost perfect regardless of glaucoma severity (0.994-0.998).Macular retinal layer thickness asymmetry indices, particularly for the ganglion cell layer, show promise as early indicators of glaucomatous retinal damage.Scanning laser polarimetry using variable corneal compensation in the detection of glaucoma with localized visual field defects.To evaluate the ability of scanning laser polarimetry parameters and a novel deviation map algorithm to discriminate between healthy and early glaucomatous eyes with localized visual field (VF) defects confined to one hemifield.Prospective case-control study.Seventy glaucomatous eyes with localized VF defects and 66 normal controls.A Humphrey field analyzer 24-2 full-threshold test and scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation were used.We assessed the sensitivity and specificity of scanning laser polarimetry parameters, sensitivity and cutoff values for scanning laser polarimetry deviation map algorithms at different specificity values (80%, 90%, and 95%) in the detection of glaucoma, and correlations between the algorithms of scanning laser polarimetry and of the pattern deviation derived from Humphrey field analyzer testing.There were significant differences between the glaucoma group and normal subjects in the mean parametric values of the temporal, superior, nasal, inferior, temporal (TSNIT) average, superior average, inferior average, and TSNIT standard deviation (SD) (P<0.05). The sensitivity and specificity of each scanning laser polarimetry variable was as follows: TSNIT, 44.3% (95% confidence interval [CI], 39.8%-49.8%) and 100% (95.4%-100%); superior average, 30% (25.5%-34.5%) and 97% (93.5%-100%); inferior average, 45.7% (42.2%-49.2%) and 100% (95.8%-100%); and TSNIT SD, 30% (25.9%-34.1%) and 97% (93.2%-100%), respectively (when abnormal was defined as P<0.05). Based on nerve fiber indicator cutoff values of > or =30 and > or =51 to indicate glaucoma, sensitivities were 54.3% (50.1%-58.5%) and 10% (6.4%-13.6%), and specificities were 97% (93.2%-100%) and 100% (95.8%-100%), respectively. The range of areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves using the scanning laser polarimetry deviation map algorithm was 0.790 to 0.879. Overall sensitivities combining each probability scale and severity score at 80%, 90%, and 95% specificities were 90.0% (95% CI, 86.4%-93.6%), 71.4% (67.4%-75.4%), and 60.0% (56.2%-63.8%), respectively. There was a statistically significant correlation between the scanning laser polarimetry severity score and the VF severity score (R2 = 0.360, P<0.001).Scanning laser polarimetry parameters may not be sufficiently sensitive to detect glaucomatous patients with localized VF damage. Our algorithm using the scanning laser polarimetry deviation map may enhance the understanding of scanning laser polarimetry printouts in terms of the locality, deviation size, and severity of localized retinal nerve fiber layer defects in eyes with localized VF loss.Diagnostic value of GDx polarimetry in a Taiwan Chinese population.To study the diagnostic ability of scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC) for early glaucomatous (EG) eyes and glaucoma-suspect (GS) eyes in a Taiwan Chinese population.This prospective cross-sectional study included 82 EG eyes (mean deviation, MD: -3.32 +/- 2.20 dB), 45 GS eyes (MD: -2.43 +/- 2.16 dB), and 62 normal eyes. Retinal nerve fiber layer thickness of each subject was measured using GDx VCC and Humphrey Field Analyzer visual field testing. Measured GDx VCC parameters were compared among groups. The area under the receiver operating characteristic (AROC) curve of each parameter was used to differentiate normal from EG eyes or GS eyes. The correlation between MD and each parameter was also evaluated.For both normal versus EG and normal versus GS, the largest AROC values were for nerve fiber indicator, superior average thickness, and inferior average thickness. There was no significant correlation between MD and GDx-VCC-measured parameters either in EG or GS eyes.GDx VCC shows only moderate ability to distinguish normal eyes from eyes with early glaucoma. However, its diagnostic role in eyes with suspicious discs and normal visual fields is uncertain at this moment in the Taiwan Chinese population. Further studies are needed to address this issue.Diagnostic accuracy of Heidelberg Retina Tomograph III classifications in a Turkish primary open-angle glaucoma population.This study aimed to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) and the glaucoma probability score (GPS) in primary open-angle glaucoma (POAG) and to measure the level of agreement between the two algorithms in classifying eyes as normal or abnormal in a Turkish population.We prospectively selected 184 healthy subjects and 158 subjects with POAG, who underwent an ophthalmological examination, visual field analysis and imaging with the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph II, using HRT III software, Version 3.0. The diagnostic accuracies of the two classifications were measured when the borderline was taken as either normal (highest specificity criteria) or abnormal (highest sensitivity criteria). The agreement between them was calculated using the unweighted kappa (kappa) coefficient.Optic nerve head topographic parameters showed statistically significant differences between the control and POAG groups (p < 0.001). The parameters with the highest area under the receiver operating characteristic curves were global GPS (0.86), cup : disc area (0.85), rim : disc area (0.85) and vertical cup : disc (0.85). According to the highest specificity criteria, MRA had a sensitivity of 67.7% and a specificity of 95.1%, whereas the GPS had a sensitivity of 70.9% and a specificity of 88.0%. According to the highest sensitivity criteria, MRA had a sensitivity of 81.0% and a specificity of 75.0%, whereas the GPS had a sensitivity of 89.2% and a specificity of 57.6%. A moderate agreement of 68% (233 eyes) with a kappa coefficient of 0.51 was found between MRA and the GPS.The GPS automated classification showed similar sensitivity to MRA, but considerably lower specificity, when applied in a Turkish population.Macular ganglion cell imaging study: glaucoma diagnostic accuracy of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography.We evaluated the diagnostic accuracy of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) measurements using a high-definition optical coherence tomography (Cirrus HD-OCT) ganglion cell analysis algorithm for detecting early and moderate-to-severe glaucoma.Totals of 119 normal subjects and 306 glaucoma patients (164 patients with early glaucoma and 142 with moderate-to-severe glaucoma) were enrolled from the Macular Ganglion Cell Imaging Study. Macular GCIPL, peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness, and optic nerve head (ONH) parameters were measured in each subject. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) were calculated and compared. Based on the internal normative database, the sensitivity and specificity for detecting early and moderate-to-severe glaucoma were calculated.There was no statistically significant difference between the AUROCs for the best OCT parameters. For detecting early glaucoma, the sensitivity of the Cirrus GCIPL parameters ranged from 26.8% to 73.2% and that of the Cirrus RNFL parameters ranged from 6.1% to 61.6%. For the early glaucoma group, the best parameter from the GCIPL generally had a higher sensitivity than those of the RNFL and ONH parameters with comparable specificity (P < 0.05, McNemar's test).There were no significant differences between the AUROCs for Cirrus GCIPL, RNFL, and ONH parameters, indicating that these maps have similar diagnostic potentials for glaucoma. The minimum GCIPL showed better glaucoma diagnostic performance than the other parameters at comparable specificities. However, other GCIPL parameters showed performances comparable to those of the RNFL parameters.[Diagnostic usefulness of optical coherence tomography (OCT), scanning laser tomography (HRT-II) and laser polarimetry (GDx) in open-angle glaucoma].To evaluate the diagnostic ability of three digital imaging technologies (HRT-II, OCT and GDx VCC) in detecting glaucomatous damage.A total of 427 eyes from 427 subjects were included in this cross-sectional study. Each subject was classified as healthy, ocular hypertensive or glaucomatous, according to intraocular pressure levels, standard automated perimetry and optic disc morphology. All of them underwent examination by means of HRT, OCT and GDx VCC. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were plotted and sensitivities at fixed specificities (85% and 95%) were calculated for each parameter assessed.The parameters with the higher diagnostic ability were: FSM discriminant function from HRT-II (AUC=0.899), retinal nerve fiber layer average thickness from OCT (AUC=0.929) and NFI from GDx VCC (AUC=0.879), with no statistically significant differences between them.The HRT-II, OCT and GDx VCC provide measurements of the retinal nerve fiber layer and the optic nerve head with high discriminating ability in open-angle glaucoma.Retinal nerve fiber layer evaluation of spectral domain optical coherence tomograph and scanning laser polarimeter to diagnose glaucoma.To compare the abilities of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters of spectral domain optical coherence tomograph (SDOCT) and scanning laser polarimeter (GDx enhanced corneal compensation; ECC) in detecting glaucoma.In a cross-sectional study, 215 eyes of 165 subjects (106 eyes of 79 glaucoma patients and 109 eyes of 86 controls) referred by general ophthalmologists for glaucoma evaluation underwent RNFL imaging with SDOCT and GDx ECC. Ability of RNFL parameters of SDOCT to discriminate glaucoma eyes from control eyes was compared with that of GDx ECC using area under operating characteristic curves (AUCs), sensitivities at fixed specificities, and likelihood ratios (LRs).AUC of the average RNFL thickness of SDOCT to differentiate glaucoma from control eyes (0.868) was comparable (P=0.32) to that of GDx ECC (0.855). Sensitivity at 95% specificity was 63.2% for average RNFL thickness of SDOCT and 48.1% for the average RNFL measurement of GDx ECC. LRs of outside normal limits category of SDOCT parameters ranged between 5.6 and 7.7 while the same of GDx ECC parameters ranged between 3.1 and 3.7. LRs of within normal limits category of SDOCT parameters ranged between 0.18 and 0.24 while the same of GDx ECC parameters ranged between 0.20 and 0.32.Though AUCs and sensitivities at fixed specificities were comparable between the RNFL parameters of SDOCT and GDx ECC in diagnosing glaucoma, LRs indicated that the RNFL parameters of SDOCT were better in 'ruling in' glaucoma.Discriminating between normal and glaucoma-damaged eyes with the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3.To determine and validate the diagnostic ability of a linear discriminant function (LDF) based on global stereometric parameters obtained using the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph version 3 (HRT3) for discriminating between healthy eyes and eyes with glaucomatous visual field loss.Cross-sectional study.The authors prospectively selected 81 consecutive healthy subjects and 85 consecutive patients with open-angle glaucoma. Another prospective sample of 225 normal eyes and 210 glaucoma eyes was used to evaluate how well the LDF performed in another population.Participants were divided into 2 groups depending on the results of standard automated perimetry and intraocular pressure. All participants underwent imaging of the optic nerve head with the HRT3.The LDF was calculated according to the stepwise logistic regression results of global optic nerve head parameters and glaucoma probability score numerical values. The diagnostic accuracy of the LDF and other parameters included in the software of the HRT3 was evaluated in another independent population.Based on the results of the stepwise binary logistic regression analysis, the function proposed was LDF = 8.23 - 8.00 x contour line modulation temporal superior + 9.41 x cup shape measure - 4.07 x rim area. The areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve were 0.875 for the LDF, 0.845 for the Frederick S. Mikelberg (FSM) discriminant function, and 0.838 for the Reinhard O. W. Burk (RB) discriminant function. There were no significant differences between these values. The LDF and the FSM and RB discriminant functions yielded sensitivities of 74.2%, 70.4%, and 67.6%, respectively, at a fixed specificity of 85%.Compared with the HRT-provided parameters, the proposed LDF exhibited higher diagnostic ability than most available analyses. The LDF had a better sensitivity and specificity balance than the FSM and RB discriminant functions, regardless of optic disc size.Spectral-domain optical coherence tomography and scanning laser polarimetry in glaucoma diagnosis.To evaluate glaucoma diagnostic capability of the retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) imaging by spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Cirrus OCT) and scanning laser polarimetry (GDx VCC).We imaged 88 glaucomatous and 77 healthy eyes using both devices. Areas under the receiver-operating characteristic curves (area under the curves, AUCs) and sensitivities at fixed specificities of average, superior, and inferior RNFL thickness were compared. Likelihood ratios (LRs) and diagnostic agreement based on normative classifications yielded by both devices were determined.The best performing parameter was the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) in GDx VCC and inferior RNFL thickness in Cirrus OCT (AUC = 0.912, 0.961, P = 0.045). The AUCs of the Cirrus OCT were significantly higher than those of GDx VCC in all parameters. Most of the parameters in Cirrus OCT were more sensitive than GDx VCC in the detection of glaucoma at fixed specificity values. Cirrus OCT had an infinite LR with abnormal classification results in both average and superior RNFL thickness. There was good agreement between the two instruments with respect to abnormal classifications (kappa, 0.611-0.766)Both Cirrus OCT and GDx VCC RNFL measurements showed good glaucoma diagnostic capabilities. Cirrus OCT showed higher sensitivities than GDx VCC.Comparison of glaucoma diagnoses using Stratus and Cirrus optical coherence tomography in different glaucoma types in a Chinese population.To compare the glaucoma diagnostic power of Stratus and Cirrus optical coherence tomographies (OCTs) in a Taiwan Chinese population with different glaucoma types.One eye each was chosen from 21 ocular hypertension (OH) patients, 27 glaucoma-suspect (GS) patients, 35 primary open-angle glaucoma (POAG) patients, 26 primary angle-closure glaucoma (PACG) patients, and 52 normal subjects. Early glaucoma (EG) was identified among glaucomatous eyes on the basis of the visual field severity (better than -9 dB). All participants were imaged using 2 OCT units at the same visit. The area under the receiver operator characteristic (AROC) curve was used to differentiate normal eyes from OH, GS, POAG, PACG, and EG eyes, and the sensitivity and specificity of each parameter from internal normative classifications were analyzed.For normal versus OH eyes, the best AROC value was the average thickness (Stratus, 0.693; Cirrus, 0.697). For normal versus GS eyes, the best AROC value was the average thickness (Stratus, 0.807; Cirrus, 0.776). For normal versus POAG eyes, the best AROC value was the average thickness (Stratus, 0.943; Cirrus, 0.930). For normal versus PACG eyes, the best AROC value was the 5-o'clock hour (Stratus, 0.830; Cirrus, 0.817). For normal versus EG eyes, the best AROC value was the average thickness with Stratus (0.868) and the 5-o'clock hour with Cirrus (0.876). All sensitivities in the 5 groups were fair on the basis of the internal normal classification database of both OCTs.Cirrus and Stratus OCTs showed equal diagnostic power in EG, OH, GS, POAG, and PACG eyes in a Taiwan Chinese population. The utility of the current internal databases of both OCT units for the Chinese population is an interesting issue that needs to be addressed in the future.Relationship between ganglion cell layer thickness and estimated retinal ganglion cell counts in the glaucomatous macula.To investigate the relationship between macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (mGCIPL) thickness and estimated macular retinal ganglion cell (RGC) counts in glaucoma.Observational cohort study.Cross-sectional study of 77 healthy, 154 glaucoma suspect, and 159 glaucomatous eyes from the Diagnostic Innovations in Glaucoma Study.All eyes underwent 24-2 standard automated perimetry (SAP) and optic nerve and macular imaging using high-definition optical coherence tomography (OCT). The total number of RGCs was estimated using a previously described model that uses SAP and OCT circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (cpRNFL) measurements. The number of macular RGCs was estimated from the temporal cpRNFL and SAP test points within the central 10°.The correlation between mGCIPL thickness and estimates of macular RGC counts.The average estimated macular RGC count in glaucomatous eyes was 306 010 ± 109 449 cells, which was significantly lower than the estimate of 520 678 ± 106 843 cells in healthy eyes (P < 0.001). Glaucomatous eyes had 41% fewer estimated macular RGCs than healthy eyes and suspects had 21% fewer estimated macular RGCs. There was strong correlation between estimated macular RGC counts and mGCIPL thickness (R(2) = 0.67; P < 0.001). Macular RGC counts performed better than average mGCIPL thickness in discriminating healthy and glaucomatous eyes with receiver operating characteristic curve areas of 0.873 and 0.775, respectively (P = 0.015).The strong association between estimated macular RGC counts and mGCIPL thickness and the better diagnostic performance of the macular RGC counts compared with mGCIPL thickness provides further evidence that estimates of RGC number from cpRNFL thickness and SAP sensitivity can be used to assess neural losses in glaucoma.Macular ganglion cell/inner plexiform layer measurements by spectral domain optical coherence tomography for detection of early glaucoma and comparison to retinal nerve fiber layer measurements.To evaluate the performance of ganglion cell layer/inner plexiform layer (GCL/IPL) measurements with spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Cirrus HD-OCT) for detection of early glaucoma and to compare results to retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) measurements.Cross-sectional prospective diagnostic study.We enrolled 99 subjects, including 59 eyes with glaucoma (47 subjects) (mean deviation >-6.0 dB) and 91 normal eyes (52 subjects). Patients underwent biometry and peripapillary and macular OCT imaging. Performance of the GCL/IPL and RNFL algorithms was evaluated with area under receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC), likelihood ratios, and sensitivities/specificities adjusting for covariates. Combination of best parameters was explored.Average (SD) mean deviation in the glaucoma group was -2.5 (1.9) dB. On multivariate analyses, age (P < 0.001) and axial length (P = 0.03) predicted GC/IPL measurements in normal subjects. No significant correlation was found between average or regional GC/IPL thickness and respective outer retina (OR) thickness measurements (P > 0.05). Average RNFL thickness performed better than average GCL/IPL measurements for detection of glaucoma (AUC = 0.964 vs 0.937; P = 0.04). The best regional measures from each algorithm (inferior quadrant RNFL vs minimum GCL/IPL) had comparable performances (P = 0.78). Entering the GC/IPL to OR ratio into prediction models did not enhance the performance of the GCL/IPL measures. Combining the best parameters from each algorithm improved detection of glaucoma (P = 0.04).Regional GCL/IPL measures derived from Cirrus HD-OCT performed as well as regional RNFL outcomes for detection of early glaucoma. Using the GC/IPL to OR ratio did not enhance the performance of GCL/IPL parameters. Combining the best measures from the 2 algorithms improved detection of glaucoma.Improvement of diagnostic performance regarding retinal nerve fiber layer defect using shifting of the normative database according to vessel position.To evaluate the clinical efficacy of early detection of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defect in a Korean population using shifting of the normative RNFL thickness database according to vessel position.Retinal nerve fiber layer thickness data of 151 healthy eyes (normative group) and 120 validation subjects (validation group; additional healthy controls plus early glaucoma) were prospectively obtained using spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) measurement. Clinical profiles and position of major retinal artery peaks (superotemporal, STa; inferotemporal, ITa) were investigated with position of RNFL peaks. Three different criteria for the lower 1% limit were adopted for the validation. Criterion 1 used normative data from the manufacturer. Criterion 2 used data from healthy volunteers. Criterion 3 used four combinations of two subgroups from data for volunteers, which were divided by the median value of STa in the superior region and that of ITa in the inferior region. The κ value was used to determine the diagnostic performance of each criterion (agreement with standard answer).Assessment of the validation group using criterion 3 showed greater accuracy than with criterion 1 or criterion 2 (κ = 0.571, 0.774, and 0.979). Although SD-OCT specificity for RNFL defect detection was similar among the criteria (100%, 98.8%, and 98.9%), sensitivity was highest with criterion 3 (42.4%, 72.7%, and 100%) (all values; criteria 1, 2, and 3, respectively).Shifting of the lower 1% reference line, according to vessel position, could remarkably improve the diagnostic performance regarding RNFL defect detection with SD-OCT.Comparison of confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy, scanning laser polarimetry and optical coherence tomography to discriminate ocular hypertension and glaucoma at an early stage.The aim was to compare the ability of confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (CSLO), scanning laser polarimetry (SLP), and optical coherence tomography (OCT) to discriminate eyes with ocular hypertension (OHT), glaucoma-suspect eyes (GS) or early glaucomatous eyes (EG) from normal eyes.Ocular hypertension, GS, and EG were defined as normal disc with intraocular pressure >21 mmHg, glaucomatous disc without visual field loss, and glaucomatous disc accompanying the early glaucomatous visual filed loss respectively. Ninety-three normal eyes, 26 OHT, 55 GS, and 67 EG were enrolled. Optic disc configuration was analyzed by CSLO (version 3.04), whereas retinal nerve fiber layer thickness was analyzed by SLP (GDx-VCC; version 5.3.2) and OCT-1 (version A6X1) in each individual. The measurements were compared in the four groups of patients. Receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC) and area under the curve (AUC) discriminating OHT, GS or EG from normal eyes were compared for the three instruments.Most parameters in GS and EG eyes showed significant differences compared with normal eyes. However, there were few significant differences between normal and OHT eyes. No significant differences were observed in AUCs between SLP and OCT. In EG eyes, the greatest AUC parameter in OCT (inferior--120; 0.932) had a higher AUC than that in CSLO (vertical cup/disc ratio; 0.845; P=0.017). In GS, the greatest AUC parameter in OCT (average retinal nerve fiber layer [RNFL] thickness; 0.869; P=0.002) and SLP (nerve fiber indicator [NFI]; 0.875; P=0.002) had higher AUC than that in CSLO (vertical cup/disc ratio; 0.720).Three instruments were useful in identifying GS and EG eyes. For glaucomatous eyes with or without early visual field defects, SLP and OCT performed similarly or had better discriminating abilities compared with CSLO.Diagnostic validity of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer thickness deviation map algorithm using cirrus HD-OCT in preperimetric and early glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic validity of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (mGCIPL) thickness deviation map algorithm using Cirrus high definition-optical coherence tomography to discriminate between normal controls and patients with preperimetric or early glaucoma.Seventy-two normal controls, 37 patients with preperimetric glaucoma and 70 patients with early glaucoma were enrolled. mGCIPL thickness and peripapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (pRNFL) thickness were measured by Cirrus high definition-optical coherence tomography. Areas showing abnormal color coding were obtained by customized Image J software calculating the number of abnormal superpixels at 1% and 5% level in each deviation map of measurements (GCIPL-DM1, GCIPL-DM5, RNFL-DM1, RNFL-DM5). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROC) of each parameter was calculated to provide diagnostic ability between normal controls and patients with preperimetric or early glaucoma.AROCs of the deviation map algorithms were higher than those of other parameters. Parameter with the best AROC was the GCIPL-DM5 (0.920 and 0.968) in both preperimetric and early glaucoma. The sensitivities of the GCIPL-DM5 at 80% and 95% specificities were 92% and 68% in preperimetric glaucoma and 98% and 90% in early glaucoma, respectively. Pairwise comparisons between AROCs of parameters from deviation map algorithms did not show statistically significant differences.mGCIPL thickness deviation map showed good diagnostic ability in detecting preperimetric and early glaucoma, and it was comparable with pRNFL thickness deviation map. Our findings suggest that it can be an important parameter in detecting subtle glaucomatous structural change.Diagnostic ability of retinal nerve fiber layer maps to detect localized retinal nerve fiber layer defects.To evaluate and compare the diagnostic ability of spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) for detecting localized retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defects in topographic RNFL maps and circumpapillary RNFL (cpRNFL) thickness measurements.Sixty-four eyes with localized RNFL defects in red-free RNFL photographs and 72 healthy eyes were included. All participants were imaged with SD-OCT. The area and angular width of the localized RNFL defects were measured with ImageJ software on RNFL thickness map, significance map (yellow pixels, <5% level), and red-free RNFL photographs. The sensitivity, specificity, and area under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) were calculated for cpRNFL thickness, macular inner retina thickness, and RNFL maps (thickness, significance) according to the quantitative measurements and a <5% level of classification to distinguish eyes with localized RNFL defects from healthy eyes.RNFL thickness map (sensitivity 96.9-98.4%, specificity 86.1-98.6%, and AUCs 0.915-0.992) and significance map (sensitivity 96.9-98.4%, specificity 88.9-95.8%, and AUCs 0.937-0.983) showed superior performance in detecting localized RNFL defects compared with other parameters (P-value 0.001-0.024) except for 36 sector cpRNFL thickness (sensitivity 92.2%, specificity 87.5%, and AUCs 0.898; P-value 0.080-0.545). The sensitivity for detecting RNFL defects was related to the angular width, area, and depth of the RNFL defects in the cpRNFL (4 sector, 12 sector) and macular inner retinal measurements. RNFL thickness and significance maps showed a constant sensitivity regardless of variations in angular width, area, and depth of the RNFL defects.RNFL thickness and significance maps could be used to distinguish eyes with localized RNFL defects from healthy eyes more effectively than cpRNFL thickness and macular inner retina thickness measurements.Retinal nerve fiber layer images captured by GDx-VCC in early diagnosis of glaucoma.To compare differences in retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) parameters between normal subjects and patients with various degrees of glaucoma, evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of GDx-VCC parameters, and determine the capability of GDx-VCC parameters and the most valuable indicators for the diagnosis of early glaucoma.GDx-VCC was used to measure RNFL in 80 patients with early glaucoma (130 eyes), 70 patients with advanced glaucoma (90 eyes) and 40 normal controls (80 eyes). All glaucoma patients were divided into an early glaucoma group and an advanced glaucoma group, according to the mean defect of the visual field. RNFL parameters were compared between normal subjects and patients with various degrees of glaucoma. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves of GDx parameters were drawn to determine the most valuable GDx parameters for the diagnosis of early glaucoma.The RNFLs were significantly thinner in patients with early glaucoma than those in normal subjects; they were also significantly thinner in patients with advanced glaucoma than those in patients with early glaucoma. The differences in all parameters reached statistical significance (p < 0.001). The mean defect of the visual field was significantly correlated with all RNFL parameters (p < 0.001). The areas under the ROC curves were >0.7 for all parameters, which could effectively differentiate early glaucoma from normal subjects. The areas under the ROC curves were 0.81 for nerve fiber indicator and inferior average with better differentiation capability.GDx-VCC can provide quantitative measurements of RNFL thickness for clinical use, which can effectively differentiate patients with early glaucoma from normal subjects, and will be clinically very helpful for the early diagnosis of glaucoma. Nerve fiber indicator and inferior average are the most effective indicators for the early diagnosis of glaucoma.Assessment of a race-specific normative HRT-III database to differentiate glaucomatous from normal eyes.To determine if a new, normative, race-specific database enhances the ability of confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy to differentiate normal from glaucomatous eyes.One eye of eligible normal and glaucoma patients was enrolled. All subjects underwent a complete ophthalmologic examination, standard achromatic perimetry (SITA-SAP, 24-2), and confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy [Heidelberg retinal tomograph (HRT-II)] within 1 month of enrollment. Racial groups were defined by self-report. Glaucoma was defined by the existence of reproducible SAP loss (pattern standard deviation <5% and/or Glaucoma Hemifield Test outside normal limits) on 2 consecutive fields. Normal subjects had 2 normal visual fields (pattern standard deviation >5% and Glaucoma Hemifield Test within 97% normal limits) and a normal clinical examination. HRT-II examinations were exported to the HRT-III software, which includes a large race-specific normative database consisting of 733 white and 215 black eyes. Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) for the most abnormal optic disc sector was compared between the HRT-II (MRA2) and the HRT-III software before (MRA3-B) and after (MRA3-A) adjustment for race. Sectors outside the 99.9% confidence interval limits ("outside normal limits") were determined to be abnormal.We enrolled 124 black (52 glaucoma, 72 normal) and 96 white (32 glaucoma, 64 normal) subjects. Mean age was 51+/-13 years and 50+/-16 years for blacks and whites, respectively (P = 0.45). Visual field mean deviation was -7.3+/-6.7 db for glaucomatous eyes and -0.4+/-1.1 db for normal eyes (P < 0.001). Sensitivity and specificity for the HRT-II was 71.9% and 95.3%, respectively, for white subjects and 50.0% and 98.6%, respectively, for black subjects. Using the expanded HRT-III database, analysis yielded a sensitivity of 81.3% and specificity of 93.8% for whites and a sensitivity of 71.2% and specificity of 86.1% for blacks. After an adjustment for black ethnicity was made in the HRT-III program, the sensitivity and specificity for blacks was 65.4% and 90.3%, respectively.A new, larger, race-specific HRT-III database increases sensitivity while maintaining specificity for whites and increases sensitivity but decreases specificity for blacks. New software and databases based on race require careful scrutiny before use in clinical practice.Comparison of scanning laser polarimetry and optical coherence tomography in quantitative retinal nerve fiber assessment.To investigate the relationship between retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) measurements in corresponding areas obtained with scanning laser polarimetry and optical coherence tomography and to compare their discriminating ability in the diagnosis of preperimetric and perimetric glaucoma.Three hundred eighty-six subjects-57 healthy controls, 145 ocular hypertensive patients, 89 with preperimetric glaucoma, and 95 with perimetric glaucoma-were recruited from the Erlangen Glaucoma Registry. Perimetry, 24-hours intraocular pressure profile, stereographic optic disc slides, optical coherence tomography StratusOCT, and scanning laser polarimetry GDx VCC (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc, Dublin, CA) were performed in all patients. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed for mean RNFL values, sector data, and indices. Sensitivity was estimated at >or=90% and >or=80% of specificity to compare the discriminating ability of each imaging modality.For discrimination between glaucomatous and healthy eyes in GDx VCC the nerve fiber index demonstrated the largest area under the ROC curve (AUROC) (0.962+/-0.013), whereas in StratusOCT the largest AUROC (0.986+/-0.006) was found in the inferior quadrant. For preperimetric glaucoma detection the nerve fiber index achieved the largest AUROC (0.783+/-0.037). In contrast, the total RNFL average obtained using StratusOCT showed the largest AUROC (0.904+/-0.025). Bland-Altman plots showed good agreement between both instruments.Both the GDx VCC and StratusOCT demonstrate increasing RNFL loss with advanced glaucomatous damage and were comparable in the diagnosis of perimetric glaucoma. Preperimetric glaucomatous damage may be better assessed by StratusOCT.Diagnostic capability of scanning laser polarimetry with and without enhanced corneal compensation and optical coherence tomography.To compare the abilities of the current commercially available versions of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) and optical coherence tomography (OCT), SLP-variable corneal compensation (VCC), SLP-enhanced corneal compensation (ECC), and high-definition (HD) OCT, in discriminating between healthy eyes and those with early-to-moderate glaucomatous visual field loss.Healthy volunteers and patients with glaucoma who met the eligibility criteria were consecutively enrolled in this prospective, cross-sectional, observational study. Subjects underwent complete eye examination, automated perimetry, SLP-ECC, SLP-VCC, and HD-OCT. Scanning laser polarimetry parameters were recalculated in 90-degree segments (quadrants) in the calculation circle to be compared. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROCs) were calculated for every parameter in order to compare the ability of each imaging modality to differentiate between normal and glaucomatous eyes.Fifty-five normal volunteers (mean age 59.1 years) and 33 patients with glaucoma (mean age 63.8 years) were enrolled. Average visual field mean deviation was -6.69 dB (95% confidence interval -8.07 to -5.31) in the glaucoma group. The largest AUROCs were associated with nerve fiber indicator (0.880 and 0.888) for the SLP-VCC and SLP-ECC, respectively, and with the average thickness in the HD-OCT (0.897).The best performing indices for the SLP-VCC, SLP-ECC, and HD OCT gave similar AUROCs, showing moderate diagnostic accuracy in patients with early to moderate glaucoma. Further studies are needed to evaluate the ability of these technologies to discriminate between normal and glaucomatous eyes.Diagnostic precision of retinal nerve fiber layer and macular thickness asymmetry parameters for identifying early primary open-angle glaucoma.To evaluate the diagnostic capabilities of intereye and intraeye differences in retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness and macular thickness for identifying early primary open-angle glaucoma (POAG).Prospective, cross-sectional cohort study.All subjects were enrolled from an ongoing institutional glaucoma study. We used spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (Spectralis; Heidelberg Engineering) to obtain macular thickness (posterior pole asymmetry scan) and RNFL thickness (circumpapillary scan) in both eyes of 50 early POAG and 50 control subjects. Early POAG subjects had glaucomatous optic neuropathy with mild, reproducible visual field loss in at least 1 eye, and control subjects had normal intraocular pressures, visual fields, and optic nerves. We recorded total, superior, and inferior RNFL and macular thicknesses and then calculated intereye and intraeye differences (asymmetry parameters). Statistical evaluation included receiver operating characteristic and multivariate logistic regression analyses.Intereye macular thickness asymmetry had the highest diagnostic sensitivity (88% at 80% specificity; 83% at 95% specificity), followed by total RNFL thickness (88% at 80% specificity; 75% at 95% specificity). Parameters with the largest areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves were: total RNFL thickness (0.937), intereye RNFL asymmetry (0.921), intereye macular thickness asymmetry (0.913), inferior RNFL thickness (0.905), superior RNFL thickness (0.887), intereye inferior macular thickness asymmetry (0.872), and intraeye macular thickness asymmetry (0.860). These 7 values were not significantly different. In multivariate logistic regression analyses, intraeye macular thickness asymmetry, intereye macular thickness asymmetry, intereye RNFL thickness asymmetry, and total RNFL thickness were related independently to early POAG.Structural asymmetry parameters performed well, identifying early POAG as well as RNFL thickness. Further study is indicated to validate these results.Comparison of scanning laser polarimetry using variable corneal compensation and retinal nerve fiber layer photography for detection of glaucoma.To compare retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) measurements obtained with scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) using variable corneal polarization compensation with standard red-free photography for detection of RNFL damage in glaucoma.This observational, cross-sectional study included 1 eye of each of 42 patients with open-angle glaucoma, 32 patients suspected of having glaucoma, and 40 healthy subjects. The RNFL measurements using SLP with variable corneal compensation were obtained within 3 months of red-free photographs. Two independent observers graded RNFL photographs using a standardized protocol. Superior and inferior hemiretinas were scored separately, and a global score was obtained by averaging scores from each hemiretina.The RNFL photography scores were compared with RNFL thickness measurements obtained with SLP. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed to assess the abilities of the different methods to differentiate glaucoma patients from healthy subjects.The RNFL thickness decreased with increased RNFL damage as assessed by photographs in both hemiretinas (R(2) = 15%-47%). The area under the ROC curve for the best SLP parameter, Nerve Fiber Indicator, was significantly greater than the area under the ROC curve for the global RNFL photography score (0.91 vs 0.84, P =.03).A moderate correlation was found between RNFL thickness measurements obtained with SLP and RNFL scores from red-free photographs. Compared with semiquantitative RNFL photography scores, the best SLP parameter had a higher diagnostic accuracy to separate glaucoma patients from healthy subjects.Pulsar perimetry in the diagnosis of early glaucoma.To assess the ability of Pulsar perimetry (Pulsar) in detecting early glaucomatous visual field (VF) damage in comparison with Frequency Doubling Technology (FDT), Scanning Laser Polarimetry (SLP, GDx VCC), and Heidelberg Retina Tomography (HRT).Prospective observational cross-sectional case study.This multicenter study included: 87 ocular hypertensives (OHT); 67 glaucomatous optic neuropathy (GON) patients; 75 primary open-angle glaucoma (POAG) patients; and 90 normals. All patients underwent standard automated perimetry (SAP) HFA 30-2, Pulsar T30W, FDT N-30, HRT II, and GDx VCC. Area under Receiver Operating Characteristic Curves (AROCs) for discriminating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes and agreement among instruments were determined.The best parameters for Pulsar, FDT, HRT, and GDx were, respectively: loss variance square root; no. of areas with P< 5%; Cup-Shape-Measure; and Nerve Fiber Indicator (NFI). In detecting POAG eyes, Pulsar (AROC, 0.90) appeared comparable with FDT (0.89) and significantly better than HRT (0.82) and GDx (0.79). For GON, Pulsar ability (0.74) was higher than GDx (0.69) and lower than FDT (0.80) and HRT (0.83). The agreement among instruments ranged from 0.12 to 0.56. Pulsar test duration was significantly shorter than SAP and FDT (P< .001).Pulsar T30W test is a rapid and easy perimetric method, showing higher sensitivity than SAP in detecting early glaucomatous VF loss. Its diagnostic ability is good for detecting early perimetric POAG eyes and fair for GON eyes. Pulsar performance was comparable with FDT, HRT, and GDx, even if the agreement between instruments was poor to fair.Comparison between discriminant analysis models and "glaucoma probability score" for the detection of glaucomatous optic nerve head changes.The aim of this study was to evaluate and compare 4 different discriminant analysis formulas and the new Glaucoma Probability Score (GPS) for the detection of morphometric optic nerve head changes in chronic open-angle glaucoma.This is a prospectively planned cross-sectional study. Two hundred and fourteen consecutive eyes were recruited into this study. For each patient, the eyes were evaluated by a slit lamp examination, and the visual fields were assessed by a Humphrey Field Analyzer 750 (HFA, Humphrey Inc, San Leandro, CA), using the standard full threshold 24-2 (Swedish Interactive Threshold Algorithm) program. The optic nerve heads were morphometrically evaluated using the Heidelberg Retina Tomograph 3 (HRT 3, Heidelberg Engineering, Heidelberg, Germany; software version 3.0). From the HRT data, 4 discriminant analysis formulas and the GPS were considered. All data were analyzed by Student t test and Pearson r coefficient. A linear regression model was also used to determine the independent contribution of variables included in the model. Sensitivity, specificity, diagnostic precision, and receiver operating characteristic curve areas were calculated for all the 5 methods examined. kappa statistic was used to study the agreement among, and between, the 5 different methods.One hundred and nineteen normal eyes and 95 eyes with primary open-angle glaucoma were included in the study. No significant difference was found between the 2 study subgroups in both age and refractive error. Significant (P<0.001) correlations were found between visual field indices and the HRT parameters. Sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic precision of the 4 formulas ranged between 50% and 99.16%. Bathija et al's formula had the highest diagnostic precision, followed by Mikelberg's formula. Using kappa statistics, kappa ranged from 0.177 to 0.528 when comparing each single discriminant formula with the GPS.The GPS showed similar sensitivity and specificity to the Mikelberg and Bathija formulas; this method is a promising one for differentiating between healthy and glaucomatous eyes, requiring no subjective user input.Impact of diabetic retinopathy on quantitative retinal nerve fiber layer measurement and glaucoma screening.To investigate the impact of diabetic retinopathy on quantitative retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) assessment and diagnostic power for glaucoma by scanning laser polarimetry (GDx-VCC) and optical coherence tomography (StratusOCT).The individual RNFL parameters of GDx and OCT were obtained for 170 eyes (one eye from each of 170 subjects [45 healthy, 47 glaucoma, 40 diabetes, and 38 glaucoma with diabetes]) and were compared among the four groups. Diabetic eyes had mild to moderate nonproliferative diabetic retinopathy (NPDR) without maculopathy. In glaucomatous eyes with or without diabetes, the ability to discriminate glaucoma was assessed by the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) and the sensitivities at more than 80% and 90% of specificities for each technique.Using GDx-VCC, significant differences (P < 0.05) in RNFL measurement parameters were found for all comparisons except those between glaucomatous eyes with diabetes and without diabetes. StratusOCT parameters did not detect significant differences between age-matched healthy and diabetic eyes. Among the parameters included, the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) of GDx-VCC and the inferior quadrant thickness (IQT) of StratusOCT had the largest AUROCs and sensitivities at specificities greater than 80%: NFI (0.912, 86%) and IQT (0.902, 85%) in glaucomatous eyes with diabetes; NFI (0.935, 92%) and IQT (0.921, 91%) in simple glaucomatous eyes.Mild to moderate NPDR causes a quantitative discrepancy in RNFL measurements between GDx-VCC and StratusOCT in simple diabetic eyes. However, mild to moderate glaucomatous optic neuropathy can be highly discriminated by the two imaging devices in eyes with diabetic retinopathy.Topographic profiles of retinal nerve fiber layer defects affect the diagnostic performance of macular scans in preperimetric glaucoma.To evaluate the influence of topographic profiles (i.e., inner directional angle and angular width) of localized retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) defects on the diagnostic performance of macular ganglion cell-inner plexiform layer (GCIPL) thickness in discriminating preperimetric glaucoma (PPG) eyes from normal control eyes.The ganglion cell analysis algorithm in Cirrus OCT was performed to determine the macular GCIPL thickness. Areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) and the sensitivities/specificities based on an internal normative database were evaluated. The effect of the inner directional angle and the angular width of localized RNFL defects on the diagnostic performance of macular GCIPL parameters were evaluated by using linear-by-linear association analysis and logistic regression analysis.Ninety-two patients with PPG and 92 age-matched healthy control subjects were enrolled in this study. The AUROC of the best parameters in macular GCIPL was 0.823 (inferotemporal sector), which showed no significant difference in comparison to the best parameters of peripapillary RNFL (7 o'clock sector, 0.764) and optic nerve head (rim area, 0.767) (for all comparisons, P > 0.05). A significant linear association was observed between the inner directional angle of RNFL defects and the sensitivity of macular GCIPL parameters for detecting RNFL defects. The angular width of RNFL defects was not significantly associated with the sensitivity of macular GCIPL parameters.The diagnostic ability of macular GCIPL parameters was comparable to that of peripapillary RNFL and ONH parameters in PPG. The inner directional angle of RNFL defects, but not the angular width, affects the diagnostic sensitivity of macular GCIPL parameters.Discrimination between glaucomatous and nonglaucomatous eyes using quantitative imaging devices and subjective optic nerve head assessment.To compare the diagnostic ability of the confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscope (HRT-II; Heidelberg Engineering, Heidelberg, Germany), scanning laser polarimeter (GDx-VCC; Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc., Dublin, CA), and optical coherence tomographer (StratusOCT, Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc.) with subjective assessment of optic nerve head (ONH) stereophotographs in discriminating glaucomatous from nonglaucomatous eyes.Data from 79 glaucomatous and 149 normal eyes of 228 subjects were included in the analysis. Three independent graders evaluated ONH stereophotographs. Receiver operating characteristic curves were constructed for each technique and sensitivity was estimated at 80% of specificity. Comparisons of areas under these curves (aROC) and agreement (kappa) were determined between stereophoto grading and best parameter from each technique.Stereophotograph grading had the largest aROC and sensitivity (0.903, 77.22%) in comparison with the best parameter from each technique: HRT-II global cup-to-disc area ratio (0.861, 75.95%); GDx-VCC Nerve Fiber Indicator (NFI; 0.836, 68.35%); and StratusOCT retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness (0.844, 69.62%), ONH vertical integrated rim area (VIRA; 0.854, 73.42%), and macular thickness (0.815, 67.09%). The kappa between photograph grading and imaging parameters was 0.71 for StratusOCT-VIRA, 0.57 for HRT-II cup-to-disc area ratio, 0.51 for GDX-VCC NFI, 0.33 for StratusOCT RNFL, and 0.28 for StratusOCT macular thickness.Similar diagnostic ability was found for all imaging techniques, but none demonstrated superiority to subjective assessment of the ONH. Agreement between disease classification with subjective assessment of ONH and imaging techniques was greater for techniques that evaluate ONH topography than with techniques that evaluate RNFL parameters. A combination of subjective ONH evaluation with RNFL parameters provides additive information, may have clinical impact, and deserves to be considered in the design of future studies comparing objective techniques with subjective evaluation by general eye care providers.Discriminating between glaucoma and normal eyes using optical coherence tomography and the 'Random Forests' classifier.To diagnose glaucoma based on spectral domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) measurements using the 'Random Forests' method.SD-OCT was conducted in 126 eyes of 126 open angle glaucoma (OAG) patients and 84 eyes of 84 normal subjects. The Random Forests method was then applied to discriminate between glaucoma and normal eyes using 151 OCT parameters including thickness measurements of circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (cpRNFL), the macular RNFL (mRNFL) and the ganglion cell layer-inner plexiform layer combined (GCIPL). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AROC) was calculated using the Random Forests method adopting leave-one-out cross validation. For comparison, AROCs were calculated based on each one of the 151 OCT parameters.The AROC obtained with the Random Forests method was 98.5% [95% Confidence interval (CI): 97.1-99.9%], which was significantly larger than the AROCs derived from any single OCT parameter (maxima were: 92.8 [CI: 89.4-96.2] %, 94.3 [CI: 91.1-97.6] % and 91.8 [CI: 88.2-95.4] % for cpRNFL-, mRNFL- and GCIPL-related parameters, respectively; P<0.05, DeLong's method with Holm's correction for multiple comparisons). The partial AROC above specificity of 80%, for the Random Forests method was equal to 18.5 [CI: 16.8-19.6] %, which was also significantly larger than the AROCs of any single OCT parameter (P<0.05, Bootstrap method with Holm's correction for multiple comparisons).The Random Forests method, analyzing multiple SD-OCT parameters concurrently, significantly improves the diagnosis of glaucoma compared with using any single SD-OCT measurement.Detection of glaucoma by spectral domain-scanning laser ophthalmoscopy/optical coherence tomography (SD-SLO/OCT) and time domain optical coherence tomography.To evaluate the relationship between time-domain and spectral domain-scanning laser ophthalmoscopy/optical coherence tomography (SD-SLO/OCT), and to compare the ability of these methods to detect glaucoma.Forty-nine glaucoma and 43 healthy participants were imaged by SD-SLO/OCT and Stratus OCT. Bland-Altman plots were used to compare the measurements of retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness. Areas under the receiver operating characteristics curves (AUCs), including the average thickness, thickness in each of the 4 quadrants, and thickness at each of the 12 clock-hours were compared. Sensitivity and specificity of normative classification of the 2 OCTs for detection of glaucoma were calculated.The Bland-Altman plot showed good agreement between the 2 instruments. In eyes with glaucoma, RNFL thickness was greater when measured by SD-SLO/OCT than Stratus OCT in most sectors of the eye (Average RNFL thickness: SD-SLO/OCT, 82.7±15.3 μm; Stratus OCT, 76.9±18.4 μm; P<0.001). However, the differences between 2 OCTs were not significant in healthy participants. The AUCs of average RNFL measurements for discrimination of glaucoma did not differ significantly between the instruments (SD-SLO/OCT, 0.969; Stratus OCT, 0.959; P=0.535). SD-SLO/OCT showed similar sensitivity (57.1%) with Stratus OCT (53.4%) for detection of glaucoma in normative classification of average RNFL thickness.Both OCT technologies did well in the diagnosis of glaucoma. Although there were small differences in the 2 instruments in measured RNFL thickness of glaucomatous eyes, in general there was good agreement between the 2 OCTs. SD-SLO/OCT classified more glaucomatous eyes as abnormal based on its normative database.Diagnostic accuracy of scanning laser polarimetry with enhanced versus variable corneal compensation.To compare the diagnostic accuracy of scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) parameters between images taken with enhanced corneal compensation (ECC) and those with variable corneal compensation (VCC) and to explore the effect of atypical birefringence patterns on this accuracy.Cross-sectional observational study.Forty-one healthy subjects and 92 patients with primary open-angle glaucoma.Variable corneal compensation and ECC images were obtained of 1 eye per subject, selected randomly if both eyes were eligible. For both ECC and VCC, the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUROCs) and the sensitivity at a specificity of > or =95% were calculated per parameter in all eyes. The analyses were reperformed separately in eyes with and without atypical birefringence patterns (ABP) images.The AUROCs and sensitivities at a specificity of > or =95% for various SLP parameters in all eyes and in eyes without ABP images.The diagnostic accuracy for most standard parameters (temporal-superior-nasal-inferior-temporal [TSNIT] average, superior average, inferior average, and TSNIT standard deviation) in all eyes was statistically significantly higher with ECC than with VCC, except for the nerve fiber indicator (NFI). When only eyes without ABP were used for the analysis, the diagnostic accuracy of SLP parameters with VCC improved, and the differences in diagnostic accuracy between ECC and VCC for these parameters lost their statistical significance.Standard SLP parameters (except for the NFI) generally had a higher diagnostic accuracy when eyes were imaged with ECC than with VCC because there were fewer ABP images with ECC than with VCC. Enhanced corneal compensation therefore may be more reliable than VCC for the detection of glaucoma. A future automated classifier, similar to the current NFI, may perform better if it is trained on data obtained with ECC. Clinically, retinal nerve fiber layer images with marked ABP, acquired with either ECC or VCC, should be viewed with caution.Comparing optic nerve head analysis between confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy and spectral domain optical coherence tomography.Confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy, HRT3, and spectral domain optical coherence tomography (OCT), RTVue-100, are able to give 3-dimensional (3D) topography images of optic nerve head (ONH) and to derive stereometric parameters and sectorial analysis. The purpose of the study is to evaluate the agreement of these two devices and their diagnostic accuracy to discriminate eyes with glaucoma from those without.Glaucoma patients and healthy control subjects were included. All of them underwent a complete ophthalmological examination, including slit lamp evaluation and visual field (VF) test. After pupil dilatation, HRT3 and RTVue-100 were performed. The following stereometric parameters were recorded: disc area, rim area, rim volume, cup volume, cup area, cup/disk ratio, and the following sectors, superotemporal, superonasal, inferotemporal, inferonasal.Forty-six eyes of 46 glaucoma patients and 58 eyes of 58 healthy subjects were included in the study. In both groups, HRT3 rim area and rim volume were statistically higher than RTVue-100 (glaucomas: 0.95 ± 0.38 versus 0.44 ± 0.33 and 0.19 ± 0.13 versus 0.02 ± 0.03, p < 0.01. controls: 1.41 ± 0.30 versus 1.08 ± 0.37 and 0.37 ± 0.13 versus 0.14 ± 0.11, p < 0.01), while cup area was statistically higher by RTVue-100 (glaucomas: 1.42 ± 0.57 versus 1.14 ± 0.58, p < 0.01. controls: 1.05 ± 1.35 versus 0.65 ± 0.48). Bland and Altman plots confirmed the presence of a fixed bias. The parameters with largest AUROC were rim volume, rim area and cup/disk ratio for both instruments. HRT3 inferotemporal sector had the highest sensitivity (80.43%, at 75.9% specificity), while for RTVue-100, the superotemporal sector had the highest sensitivity (76.1%, at 81% specificity). The agreement was moderate for inferotemporal sector and fair for the others.HRT3 and RTVue-100 are not interchangeable for ONH analysis. They both have good diagnostic accuracy, but RTVue-100 shows slightly better performance, at least with regard to rim area volume.Accuracy of GDx VCC, HRT I, and clinical assessment of stereoscopic optic nerve head photographs for diagnosing glaucoma.To determine and compare the accuracy and reproducibility of GDx variable cornea compensation (VCC) scanning laser polarimetry (SLP) with VCC, Heidelberg retina tomograph (HRT) I confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (CSLO), and clinical assessment of stereoscopic optic nerve head (ONH) photographs for diagnosing glaucoma.One eye each of 40 healthy subjects, 48 glaucoma patients, and six patients with ocular hypertension were measured with SLP-VCC and CSLO. Simultaneous stereoscopic ONH photographs were also obtained. Sixteen photographs of healthy and glaucomatous eyes were duplicated for assessing intraobserver agreement. Four glaucoma specialists, four general ophthalmologists, four residents in ophthalmology, and four optometrists classified the ONH photographs as normal or glaucomatous. For SLP-VCC, the nerve fiber indicator (NFI) was evaluated. For CSLO, the Moorfields regression analysis (MRA) and the Bathija linear discriminant function (LDF) were used. Sensitivity, specificity, percentage of correctly classified eyes, and intra- and interobserver agreement, expressed as kappa (kappa) were calculated.SLP-VCC had the highest diagnostic accuracy, with a sensitivity, specificity, and overall correct classification of 91.7%, 95.0% and 93.2%, respectively. CSLO, expressed as Bathija LDF and MRA, had a diagnostic accuracy comparable to glaucoma specialists and general ophthalmologists with an overall accuracy of 89.8%, 86.4%, 86.7% and 85.2%, respectively. Residents classified the fewest eyes correctly. Intraobserver agreement for classifying the ONH photographs ranged between 0.48 (within residents) and 0.78 (within glaucoma specialists). The interobserver agreement ranged between 0.45 (between residents) and 0.74 (between glaucoma specialists). The agreement between observers and CSLO MRA (kappa, 0.68) was statistically significantly higher (p<0.001; paired t-test) than between observers and SLP-VCC NFI (kappa, 0.60) and CSLO Bathija LDF (kappa, 0.62).Automated analysis of measurements with GDx VCC and HRT had a similar diagnostic accuracy for glaucoma as classification of stereoscopic ONH photographs by glaucoma specialists, thus bringing all eye-care professionals to this desirable level. The intra- and interobserver agreement for ONH analysis was only moderate to good. We think these imaging techniques may assist clinicians in diagnosing glaucoma.Comparison of the GDx VCC scanning laser polarimeter, HRT II confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscope, and stratus OCT optical coherence tomograph for the detection of glaucoma.To compare the abilities of current commercially available versions of 3 optical imaging techniques: scanning laser polarimetry with variable corneal compensation (GDx VCC), confocal scanning laser ophthalmoscopy (HRT II [Heidelberg Retina Tomograph]), and optical coherence tomography (Stratus OCT) to discriminate between healthy eyes and eyes with glaucomatous visual field loss.We included 107 patients with glaucomatous visual field loss and 76 healthy subjects of a similar age. All individuals underwent imaging with a GDx VCC, HRT II, and fast retinal nerve fiber layer scan with the Stratus OCT as well as visual field testing within a 6-month period. Receiver operating characteristic curves and sensitivities at fixed specificities (80% and 95%) were calculated for parameters reported as continuous variables. Diagnostic categorization (outside normal limits, borderline, or within normal limits) provided by each instrument after comparison with its respective normative database was also evaluated, and likelihood ratios were reported. Agreement on categorization between methods (weighted kappa) was assessed.After the exclusion of subjects with unacceptable images, the final study sample included 141 eyes of 141 subjects (75 with glaucoma and 66 healthy control subjects). Mean +/- SD mean deviation of the visual field test result for patients with glaucoma was -4.87 +/- 3.9 dB, and 70% of these patients had early glaucomatous visual field damage. No statistically significant difference was found between the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUCs) for the best parameters from the GDx VCC (nerve fiber indicator, AUC = 0.91), Stratus OCT (retinal nerve fiber layer inferior thickness, AUC = 0.92), and HRT II (linear discriminant function, AUC = 0.86). Abnormal results for each of the instruments, after comparison with their normative databases, were associated with strong positive likelihood ratios. Chance-corrected agreement (weighted kappa) among the 3 instruments ranged from moderate to substantial (0.50-0.72).The AUCs and the sensitivities at high specificities were similar among the best parameters from each instrument. Abnormal results (as compared with each instrument's normative database) were associated with high likelihood ratios and large effects on posttest probabilities of having glaucomatous visual field loss. Calculation of likelihood ratios may provide additional information to assist the clinician in diagnosing glaucoma with these instruments.Combining spectral domain optical coherence tomography structural parameters for the diagnosis of glaucoma with early visual field loss.To create a multivariable predictive model for glaucoma with early visual field loss using a combination of spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD-OCT) parameters, and to compare the results with single variable models.Two hundred fifty-three subjects (149 healthy controls and 104 with early glaucoma) underwent optic disc and macular scanning using SD-OCT in one randomly selected eye per subject. Sixteen parameters (rim area, cup-to-disc area ratio, vertical cup-to-disc diameter ratio, average and quadrant RNFL thicknesses, average, minimum, and sectoral ganglion cell inner-plexiform layer [GCIPL] thicknesses) were collected and submitted to an exploratory factor analysis (EFA) followed by logistic regression with the backward elimination variable selection technique. Area under the curve (AUC) of the receiver operating characteristic (ROC), sensitivity, specificity, Akaike's information criterion (AIC), predicted probability, prediction interval length (PIL), and classification rates were used to determine the performances of the univariable and multivariable models.The multivariable model had an AUC of 0.995 with 98.6% sensitivity, 96.0% specificity, and an AIC value of 43.29. Single variable models yielded AUCs of 0.943 to 0.987, sensitivities of 82.6% to 95.7%, specificities of 88.0% to 94.0%, and AICs of 113.16 to 59.64 (smaller is preferred). The EFA logistic regression model correctly classified 91.67% of cases with a median PIL of 0.050 in the validation set. Univariable models correctly classified 80.62% to 90.48% of cases with median PILs 1.9 to 3.0 times larger.The multivariable model was successful in predicting glaucoma with early visual field loss and outperformed univariable models in terms of AUC, AIC, PILs, and classification rates.Diagnostic performance of optical coherence tomography ganglion cell--inner plexiform layer thickness measurements in early glaucoma.To evaluate the glaucoma diagnostic performance of ganglion cell inner-plexiform layer (GCIPL) parameters used individually and in combination with retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) or optic nerve head (ONH) parameters measured with Cirrus HD-OCT (Carl Zeiss Meditec, Inc, Dublin, CA).Prospective cross-sectional study.Fifty patients with early perimetric glaucoma and 49 age-matched healthy subjects.Three peripapillary RNFL and 3 macular GCIPL scans were obtained in 1 eye of each participant. A patient was considered glaucomatous if at least 2 of the 3 RNFL or GCIPL scans had the average or at least 1 sector measurement flagged at 1% to 5% or less than 1%. The diagnostic performance was determined for each GCIPL, RNFL, and ONH parameter as well as for binary or-logic and and-logic combinations of GCIPL with RNFL or ONH parameters.Sensitivity, specificity, positive likelihood ratio (PLR), and negative likelihood ratio (NLR).Among GCIPL parameters, the minimum had the best diagnostic performance (sensitivity, 82.0%; specificity, 87.8%; PLR, 6.69; and NLR, 0.21). Inferior quadrant was the best RNFL parameter (sensitivity, 74%; specificity, 95.9%; PLR, 18.13; and NLR, 0.27), as was rim area (sensitivity, 68%; specificity, 98%; PLR, 33.3; and NLR, 0.33) among ONH parameters. The or-logic combination of minimum GCIPL and average RNFL provided the overall best diagnostic performance (sensitivity, 94%; specificity, 85.7%; PRL, 6.58; and NLR, 0.07) as compared with the best RNFL, best ONH, and best and-logic combination (minimum GCIPL and inferior quadrant RNFL; sensitivity, 64%; specificity, 100%; PLR, infinity; and NPR, 0.36).The binary or-logic combination of minimum GCIPL and average RNFL or rim area provides better diagnostic performances than those of and-logic combinations or best single GCIPL, RNFL, or ONH parameters. This finding may be clinically valuable for the diagnosis of early glaucoma.Ability of optical coherence tomography-determined ganglion cell complex thickness to total retinal thickness ratio to diagnose glaucoma.To evaluate the usefulness of the spectral-domain optical coherence tomography (SD OCT)-determined ganglion cell complex thickness to total retinal thickness ratio (G/T ratio) in diagnosing glaucoma.A total of 99 eyes with primary open-angle glaucoma and 35 normal eyes were enrolled in the study. SD OCT (RTVue-100) was used to measure the macular ganglion cell complex thickness, total retinal thickness, outer retinal thickness, and circumpapillary retinal nerve fiber layer (RNFL) thickness. A new macular parameter, the G/T ratio, was also calculated. The ability of each parameter to diagnose glaucoma was examined by analyzing the area under the receiver operating characteristics curve (AUROC) and the sensitivity at fixed specificity.The G/T ratio was 36.0 ± 1.5% in normal eyes, 31.8 ± 1.7% in early glaucoma, and 30.2 ± 2.6% in advanced glaucoma. These decreases in the ratio were statistically significant. For the AUROC, the individual SD OCT parameters were 0.982 for the G/T ratio, 0.968 for the macular ganglion cell complex thickness, 0.942 for the RNFL thickness, and 0.841 for the total retinal thickness. The AUROC for the G/T ratio was significantly higher than that seen for the total retinal and RNFL thicknesses (P<0.05). Analyses of the sensitivity at a specificity of >90% indicated that the G/T ratio (sensitivity, 93.94%) was the best diagnostic parameter.Decreases in the G/T ratio occur during the early stages of glaucoma. When using SD OCT to diagnose glaucoma, the G/T ratio may improve the diagnostic ability of the macular parameter.